three years,
two years,
seven months,
six months,
five months,
four months,
three months,
two months,
one month,
or even a fortnight. When a fortnight has passed, we shall go forth. Your destiny shall be ours.”
“A fortnight is too long, sirs. I cannot wait that long.
Who knows what will happen to the living?
We are heading to the next life. We must think about this and wake up! We must do what’s good and lead the spiritual life, for no-one born can escape death.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness.”
“Well then, sir, please wait for a week, so that we can instruct our sons and brothers in kingship. When a week has passed, we shall go forth. Your destiny shall be ours.”
“A week is not too long, sirs. I will wait that long.”
Informing the Brahmins
Then the Great Steward also went to the seven well-to-do brahmins and seven hundred bathed initiates and said,
“Sirs, please now find another teacher to teach you to recite the hymns.
I wish to go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness.”
“Please don’t go forth from the lay life to homelessness!
The life of one gone forth is of little influence or profit,
whereas the life of a brahmin is of great influence and profit.”
“Please, sirs, don’t say that.
Who has greater influence and profit than myself?
For now I am like a king to kings, like Brahmā to brahmins, like a deity to householders.
Giving up all that, I shall go forth.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness.”
“If the Steward is going forth from the lay life to homelessness, we shall do so too. Your destiny shall be ours.”
Informing the Wives
Then the Great Steward went to his forty equal wives and said,
“Ladies, please do whatever you wish, whether returning to your own families, or finding another husband.
I wish to go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
As I understand what Brahmā says about carrion-stench, it’s not easy to quell while living at home.
I shall go forth from the lay life to homelessness.”
“You are the only family we want! You are the only husband we want!
If you are going forth from the lay life to homelessness, we shall do so too. Your destiny shall be ours.”
The Great Steward Goes Forth
When a week had passed, the Great Steward shaved off his hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
And when he had gone forth, the seven anointed aristocrat kings, the seven brahmins with seven hundred initiates, the forty equal wives, and many thousands of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and many harem women shaved off their hair and beards, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Escorted by that assembly, the Great Steward wandered on tour among the villages, towns, and capital cities.
And at that time, whenever he arrived at a village or town, he was like a king to kings, like Brahmā to brahmins, like a deity to householders.
And whenever people sneezed or tripped over
they’d say:
“Homage to the Great Steward! Homage to the high priest for the seven!”
And the Great Steward meditated spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, he spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
He meditated spreading a heart full of compassion …
rejoicing …
equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth. In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, he spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
And he taught his disciples the path to rebirth in the company of Brahmā.
Those of his disciples who completely understood the Great Steward’s instructions,
at the breaking up of the body, after death, were reborn in the Brahmā realm.
Of those disciples who only partly understood the Great Steward’s instructions, some were reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others,
while some were reborn in the company of the Gods Who Love to Create,
or the Joyful Gods,
or the Gods of Yama,
or the Gods of the Thirty-Three,
or the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
And at the very least they swelled the hosts of the fairies.
And so the going forth of all those gentlemen was not in vain, was not wasted, but was fruitful and fertile.’
Do you remember this, Blessed One?”
“I remember, Pañcasikha.
I myself was the brahmin Great Steward at that time.
And I taught those disciples the path to rebirth in the company of Brahmā.
But that spiritual path of mine doesn’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment. It only leads as far as rebirth in the Brahmā realm.
But this spiritual path does lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
And what is the spiritual path that leads to extinguishment?
It is simply this noble eightfold path, that is:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
This is the spiritual path that leads to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
Those of my disciples who completely understand my instructions realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
Of those disciples who only partly understand my instructions, some, with the ending of the five lower fetters, become reborn spontaneously. They are extinguished there, and are not liable to return from that world.
Some, with the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion, become once-returners. They come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
And some, with the ending of three fetters, become stream-enterers, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
And so the going forth of all those gentlemen was not in vain, was not wasted, but was fruitful and fertile.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Delighted, the fairy Pañcasikha approved and agreed with what the Buddha said. He bowed and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before vanishing right there.
Long Discourses
Advice to Sigālaka
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels’ feeding ground.
Now at that time the householder’s son Sigālaka rose early and left Rājagaha. With his clothes and hair all wet, he raised his joined palms to revere the quarters—
east, south, west, north, below, and above.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Rājagaha for alms.
He saw Sigālaka revering the quarters
and said to him,
“Householder’s son, why are you revering the quarters in this way?”
“Sir, on his deathbed my father said to me:
‘My dear, please revere the quarters.’
Honoring, respecting, and venerating my father’s words, I rose early and left Rājagaha and, with my clothes and hair all wet, raised my joined palms to revere the quarters—
east, south, west, north, below, and above.”
The Six Quarters
“Householder’s son, that’s not how the six quarters should be revered in the training of the Noble One.”
“But sir, how should the six quarters be revered in the training of the Noble One?
Sir, please teach me this.”
“Well then, householder’s son, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Sigālaka.
The Buddha said this:
“Householder’s son, a noble disciple gives up four corrupt deeds, doesn’t do bad deeds on four grounds, and avoids six drains on wealth. When they’ve left these fourteen bad things behind they have the six quarters covered.
They’re practicing to win in both worlds, and they succeed in this world and the next.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
Four Corrupt Deeds
What four corrupt deeds have they given up?
Killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, and lying: these are corrupt deeds.
These are the four corrupt deeds they’ve given up.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Killing, stealing,
telling lies,
and committing adultery:
astute people don’t praise these things.”
Four Grounds
“On what four grounds do they not do bad deeds?
One does bad deeds prejudiced by favoritism, hostility, stupidity, and cowardice.
When a noble disciple is not prejudiced by favoritism, hostility, stupidity, and cowardice,
they don’t do bad deeds on these four grounds.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“If you act against the teaching
out of favoritism, hostility, cowardice, or stupidity,
your fame shrinks,
like the moon in the waning fortnight.
If you don’t act against the teaching
out of favoritism, hostility, cowardice, and stupidity,
your fame swells,
like the moon in the waxing fortnight.”
Six Drains on Wealth
“What six drains on wealth do they avoid?
Habitually engaging in the following things is a drain on wealth: drinking alcohol; roaming the streets at night; frequenting festivals; gambling; bad friends; laziness.
Six Drawbacks of Drinking
There are these six drawbacks of habitually drinking alcohol.
Immediate loss of wealth, promotion of quarrels, susceptibility to illness, disrepute, indecent exposure; and weakened wisdom is the sixth thing.
These are the six drawbacks of habitually drinking alcohol.
Six Drawbacks of Roaming the Streets at Night
There are these six drawbacks of roaming the streets at night.
Yourself, your partners and children, and your property are all left unguarded. You’re suspected of bad deeds. Untrue rumors spread about you. You’re at the forefront of many things that entail suffering.
These are the six drawbacks of roaming the streets at night.
Six Drawbacks of Festivals
There are these six drawbacks of frequenting festivals.
You’re always thinking: ‘Where’s the dancing? Where’s the singing? Where’s the music? Where are the stories? Where’s the applause? Where are the kettledrums?’
These are the six drawbacks of frequenting festivals.
Six Drawbacks of Gambling
There are these six drawbacks of habitually gambling.
Victory breeds enmity. The loser mourns their money. There is immediate loss of wealth. A gambler’s word carries no weight in public assembly. Friends and colleagues treat them with contempt. And no-one wants to marry a gambler, for they think:
‘This individual is a gambler—they’re not able to support a partner.’
These are the six drawbacks of habitually gambling.
Six Drawbacks of Bad Friends
There are these six drawbacks of bad friends.
You become friends and companions with those who are addicts, carousers, drunkards, frauds, swindlers, and thugs.
These are the six drawbacks of bad friends.
Six Drawbacks of Laziness
There are these six drawbacks of habitual laziness.
You don’t get your work done because you think: ‘It’s too cold! It’s too hot. It’s too late! It’s too early! I’m too hungry! I’m too full!’
By dwelling on so many excuses for not working, you don’t make any more money, and the money you already have runs out.
These are the six drawbacks of habitual laziness.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Some are just drinking buddies,
some call you their dear, dear friend,
but a true friend is one
who stands by you in need.
Sleeping late, adultery,
making enemies, harmfulness,
bad friends, and avarice:
these six grounds ruin a person.
With bad friends, bad companions,
bad behavior and alms-resort,
a man falls to ruin
in both this world and the next.
Dice, women, drink, song and dance;
sleeping by day and roaming at night;
bad friends, and avarice:
these six grounds ruin a person.
They play dice and drink liquor,
and consort with women loved by others.
Associating with the worse, not the better,
they diminish like the waning moon.
A drunkard, broke, and destitute,
thirsty, drinking in the bar,
drowning in debt,
will quickly lose their way.
When you’re in the habit of sleeping late,
seeing night as time to rise,
and always getting drunk,
you can’t keep up the household life.
‘Too cold, too hot,
too late,’ they say.
When the young neglect their work like this,
riches pass them by.
But one who considers heat and cold
as nothing more than blades of grass—
he does his duties as a man,
and happiness never fails.”
Fake Friends
“Householder’s son, you should recognize these four enemies disguised as friends:
the taker, the talker, the flatterer, the spender.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s all take on four grounds.
Your possessions end up theirs.
Giving little, they expect a lot.
They do their duty out of fear.
They associate for their own advantage.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s all take on these four grounds.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s all talk on four grounds.
They’re hospitable in the past. They’re hospitable in the future. They’re full of meaningless pleasantries. When something needs doing in the present they point to their own misfortune.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s all talk on these four grounds.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s a flatterer on four grounds.
They support you equally in doing bad and doing good. They praise you to your face, and put you down behind your back.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s a flatterer on these four grounds.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s a spender on four grounds.
They accompany you when drinking, roaming the streets at night, frequenting festivals, and gambling.
You can recognize a fake friend who’s a spender on these four grounds.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“One friend is all take,
another all talk;
one’s just a flatterer,
and one’s a friend who spends.
An astute person understands
these four enemies for what they are
and keeps them at a distance,
as they’d shun a risky road.”
Good-Hearted Friends
“Householder’s son, you should recognize these four good-hearted friends:
the helper, the friend in good times and bad, the counselor, and the one who’s compassionate.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s a helper on four grounds.
They guard you when you’re negligent. They guard your property when you’re negligent. They keep you safe in times of danger. When something needs doing, they supply you with twice the money you need.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s a helper on these four grounds.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s the same in good times and bad on four grounds.
They tell you secrets. They keep your secrets. They don’t abandon you in times of trouble. They’d even give their life for your welfare.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s the same in good times and bad on these four grounds.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s a counselor on four grounds.
They keep you from doing bad. They support you in doing good. They teach you what you do not know. They explain the path to heaven.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s a counselor on these four grounds.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s compassionate on four grounds.
They don’t delight in your misfortune. They delight in your good fortune. They keep others from criticizing you. They encourage praise of you.
You can recognize a good-hearted friend who’s compassionate on these four grounds.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“A friend who’s a helper,
one the same in both pleasure and pain,
a friend of good counsel,
and one of compassion;
an astute person understands
these four friends for what they are
and carefully looks after them,
like a mother the child at her breast.
The astute and virtuous
shine like a burning flame.
They pick up riches as bees
roaming round pick up pollen.
And their riches proceed to grow,
like an ant-hill piling up.
In gathering wealth like this,
a householder does enough for their family.
And they’d hold on to friends
by dividing their wealth in four.
One portion is to enjoy.
Two parts invest in work.
And the fourth should be kept
for times of trouble.”
Covering the Six Quarters
“And how, householder’s son, does a noble disciple cover the six quarters?
These six quarters should be recognized:
parents as the east, teachers as the south, partner and children as the west, friends and colleagues as the north, bondservants and workers as beneath, and ascetics and brahmins as above.
A child should serve their parents as the eastern quarter in five ways, thinking:
‘I will support those who supported me. I’ll do my duty for them. I’ll maintain the family traditions. I’ll take care of the inheritance. When they have passed away, I’ll make an offering on their behalf.’
Parents served by the children in these five ways show compassion to them in five ways.
They keep them from doing bad. They support them in doing good. They train them in a profession. They connect them with a suitable partner. They transfer the inheritance in due time.
Parents served by their children in these five ways show compassion to them in these five ways.
And that’s how the eastern quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.
A student should serve their teacher as the southern quarter in five ways:
by rising for them, by serving them, by listening well, by looking after them, and by carefully learning their profession.
Teachers served by their students in these five ways show compassion to them in five ways.
They make sure they’re well trained and well educated. They clearly explain all the knowledge of the profession. They introduce them to their friends and colleagues. They provide protection in every region.
Teachers served by their students in these five ways show compassion to them in these five ways.
And that’s how the southern quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.
A husband should serve his wife as the western quarter in five ways:
by treating her with honor, by not looking down on her, by not being unfaithful, by relinquishing authority to her, and by presenting her with adornments.
A wife served by her husband in these five ways shows compassion to him in five ways.
She’s well-organized in her work. She manages the domestic help. She’s not unfaithful. She preserves his earnings. She’s deft and tireless in all her duties.
A wife served by her husband in these five ways shows compassion to him in these five ways.
And that’s how the western quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.
A gentleman should serve his friends and colleagues as the northern quarter in five ways:
giving, kindly words, taking care, equality, and not using tricky words.
Friends and colleagues served by a gentleman in these five ways show compassion to him in five ways.
They guard him when they’re negligent. They guard his property when they’re negligent. They keep him safe in times of danger. They don’t abandon him in times of trouble. They honor his descendants.
Friends and colleagues served by a gentleman in these five ways show compassion to him in these five ways.
And that’s how the northern quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.
A master should serve their bondservants and workers as the lower quarter in five ways:
by organizing work according to ability, by paying food and wages, by nursing them when sick, by sharing special treats, and by giving time off work.
Bondservants and workers served by a master in these five ways show compassion to him in five ways.
They get up first, and go to bed last. They don’t steal. They do their work well. And they promote a good reputation.
Bondservants and workers served by a master in these five ways show compassion to him in these five ways.
And that’s how the lower quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.
A gentleman should serve ascetics and brahmins as the upper quarter in five ways:
by loving deeds of body, speech, and mind, by not turning them away at the gate, and by providing them with material needs.
Ascetics and brahmins served by a gentleman in these five ways show compassion to him in five ways.
They keep him from doing bad. They support him in doing good. They think of him with kindly thoughts. They teach him what he does not know. They clarify what he’s already learned. They explain the path to heaven.
Ascetics and brahmins served by a gentleman in these five ways show compassion to him in these five ways.
And that’s how the upper quarter is covered, kept safe and free of peril.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Then the Holy One, the Teacher, went on to say:
“Parents are the east,
teachers the south,
wives and child the west,
friends and colleagues the north,
servants and workers below,
and ascetics and brahmins above.
By honoring these quarters
a householder does enough for their family.
The astute and the virtuous,
the gentle and the articulate,
the humble and the kind:
they’re the kind who win glory.
The diligent, not lazy,
those not disturbed by troubles,
those consistent in conduct, the intelligent:
they’re the kind who win glory.
The inclusive, the makers of friends,
the kind, those rid of stinginess,
those who lead, train, and persuade:
they’re the kind who win glory.
Giving and kindly words,
taking care here,
and treating equally in worldly conditions,
as befits them in each case;
these ways of being inclusive in the world
are like a moving chariot’s linchpin.
If there were no such ways of being inclusive,
neither mother nor father
would be respected and honored
for what they’ve done for their children.
But since these ways of being inclusive do exist,
the astute do regard them well,
so they achieve greatness
and are praised.”
When this was said, Sigālaka the householder’s son said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Long Discourses
The Fruits of the Ascetic Life
A Discussion With the King’s Ministers
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha in the Mango Grove of Jīvaka Komārabhacca, together with a large Saṅgha of 1,250 mendicants.
Now, at that time it was the sabbath—the Komudi full moon on the fifteenth day of the fourth month—and King Ajātasattu Vedehiputta of Magadha was sitting upstairs in the royal longhouse surrounded by his ministers.
Then Ajātasattu expressed this heartfelt sentiment,
“Oh, sirs, this moonlit night is so very delightful, so beautiful, so glorious, so lovely, so striking.
Now, what ascetic or brahmin might I pay homage to today, paying homage to whom my mind might find peace?”
When he had spoken, one of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Pūraṇa Kassapa leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
Another of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Makkhali Gosāla leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
Another of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Ajita Kesakambala leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
Another of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Pakudha Kaccāyana leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
Another of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
Another of the king’s ministers said to him,
“Sire, Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta leads an order and a community, and teaches a community. He’s a well-known and famous religious founder, regarded as holy by many people. He is of long standing, long gone forth; he is advanced in years and has reached the final stage of life.
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
But when he had spoken, the king kept silent.
A Discussion With Jīvaka Komārabhacca
Now at that time Jīvaka Komārabhacca was sitting silently not far from the king.
Then the king said to him,
“But my dear Jīvaka, why are you silent?”
“Sire, the Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha is staying in my mango grove together with a large Saṅgha of 1,250 mendicants.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
Let Your Majesty pay homage to him.
Hopefully in so doing your mind will find peace.”
“Well then, my dear Jīvaka, have the elephants readied.”
“Yes, Your Majesty,” replied Jīvaka. He had around five hundred female elephants readied, in addition to the king’s bull elephant for riding. Then he informed the king,
“The elephants are ready, sire.
Please go at your convenience.”
Then King Ajātasattu had women mounted on each of the five hundred female elephants, while he mounted his bull elephant. With attendants carrying torches, he set out in full royal pomp from Rājagaha to Jīvaka’s mango grove.
But as he drew near the mango grove, the king became frightened, scared, his hair standing on end.
He said to Jīvaka,
“My dear Jīvaka, I hope you’re not deceiving me!
I hope you’re not betraying me!
I hope you’re not turning me over to my enemies!
For how on earth can there be no sound of coughing or clearing throats or any noise in such a large Saṅgha of 1,250 mendicants?”
“Do not fear, great king, do not fear!
I am not deceiving you,
or betraying you,
or turning you over to your enemies.
Go forward, great king, go forward! Those are lamps shining in the pavilion.”
The Question About the Fruits of the Ascetic Life
Then King Ajātasattu rode on the elephant as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the pavilion door on foot, where he asked Jīvaka,
“But my dear Jīvaka, where is the Buddha?”
“That is the Buddha, great king, that is the Buddha!
He’s sitting against the central column facing east, in front of the Saṅgha of mendicants.”
Then the king went up to the Buddha and stood to one side.
He looked around the Saṅgha of monks, who were so very silent, like a still, clear lake, and expressed this heartfelt sentiment,
“May my son, Prince Udāyibhadda, be blessed with such peace as the Saṅgha of mendicants now enjoys!”
“Has your mind gone to one you love, great king?”
“I love my son, sir, Prince Udāyibhadda.
May he be blessed with such peace as the Saṅgha of mendicants now enjoys!”
Then the king bowed to the Buddha, raised his joined palms toward the Saṅgha, and sat down to one side.
He said to the Buddha,
“Sir, I’d like to ask you about a certain point, if you’d take the time to answer.”
“Ask what you wish, great king.”
“Sir, there are many different professional fields.
These include elephant riders, cavalry, charioteers, archers, bannermen, adjutants, food servers, warrior-chiefs, princes, chargers, great warriors, heroes, leather-clad soldiers, and sons of bondservants.
They also include bakers, barbers, bathroom attendants, cooks, garland-makers, dyers, weavers, basket-makers, potters, accountants, finger-talliers, or those following any similar professions. All these live off the fruits of their profession which are apparent in the present life.
With that they bring happiness and joy to themselves, their parents, their children and partners, and their friends and colleagues. And they establish an uplifting religious donation for ascetics and brahmins that’s conducive to heaven, ripens in happiness, and leads to heaven.
Sir, can you point out a fruit of the ascetic life that’s likewise apparent in the present life?”
“Great king, do you recall having asked this question of other ascetics and brahmins?”
“I do, sir.”
“If you wouldn’t mind, great king, tell me how they answered.”
“It’s no trouble when someone such as the Blessed One is sitting here.”
“Well, speak then, great king.”
The Doctrine of Pūraṇa Kassapa
“One time, sir, I approached Pūraṇa Kassapa and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
He said to me:
‘Great king, the one who acts does nothing wrong when they punish, mutilate, torture, aggrieve, oppress, intimidate, or when they encourage others to do the same.
They do nothing wrong when they kill, steal, break into houses, plunder wealth, steal from isolated buildings, commit highway robbery, commit adultery, and lie. If you were to reduce all the living creatures of this earth to one heap and mass of flesh with a razor-edged chakram, no evil comes of that, and no outcome of evil.
If you were to go along the south bank of the Ganges killing, mutilating, and torturing, and encouraging others to do the same, no evil comes of that, and no outcome of evil.
If you were to go along the north bank of the Ganges giving and sacrificing and encouraging others to do the same, no merit comes of that, and no outcome of merit.
In giving, self-control, restraint, and truthfulness there is no merit or outcome of merit.’
And so, when I asked Pūraṇa Kassapa about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with the doctrine of inaction.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Pūraṇa Kassapa.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Doctrine of Makkhali Gosāla
One time, sir, I approached Makkhali Gosāla and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
‘Great king, there is no cause or condition for the corruption of sentient beings. Sentient beings are corrupted without cause or condition.
There’s no cause or condition for the purification of sentient beings.
Sentient beings are purified without cause or condition.
One does not act of one’s own volition, one does not act of another’s volition, one does not act from a person’s volition. There is no power, no energy, no human strength or vigor.
All sentient beings, all living creatures, all beings, all souls lack control, power, and energy. Molded by destiny, circumstance, and nature, they experience pleasure and pain in the six classes of rebirth.
There are 1.4 million main wombs, and 6,000, and 600. There are 500 deeds, and five, and three. There are deeds and half-deeds. There are 62 paths, 62 sub-eons, six classes of rebirth, and eight stages in a person’s life. There are 4,900 Ājīvaka ascetics, 4,900 wanderers, and 4,900 naked ascetics. There are 2,000 faculties, 3,000 hells, and 36 realms of dust. There are seven percipient embryos, seven non-percipient embryos, and seven embryos without attachments. There are seven gods, seven humans, and seven goblins. There are seven lakes, seven winds, 700 winds, seven cliffs, and 700 cliffs. There are seven dreams and 700 dreams. There are 8.4 million great eons through which the foolish and the astute transmigrate before making an end of suffering.
And here there is no such thing as this: “By this precept or observance or mortification or spiritual life I shall force unripened deeds to bear their fruit, or eliminate old deeds by experiencing their results little by little,” for that cannot be.
Pleasure and pain are allotted. Transmigration lasts only for a limited period, so there’s no increase or decrease, no getting better or worse.
It’s like how, when you toss a ball of string, it rolls away unraveling.
In the same way, after transmigrating the foolish and the astute will make an end of suffering.’
And so, when I asked Makkhali Gosāla about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with the doctrine of purification through transmigration.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Makkhali Gosāla.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Doctrine of Ajita Kesakambala
One time, sir, I approached Ajita Kesakambala and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
‘Great king, there is no meaning in giving, sacrifice, or offerings. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds. There’s no afterlife. There’s no obligation to mother and father. No beings are reborn spontaneously. And there’s no ascetic or brahmin who is well attained and practiced, and who describes the afterlife after realizing it with their own insight.
This person is made up of the four primary elements. When they die, the earth in their body merges and coalesces with the main mass of earth. The water in their body merges and coalesces with the main mass of water. The fire in their body merges and coalesces with the main mass of fire. The air in their body merges and coalesces with the main mass of air. The faculties are transferred to space.
Four men with a bier carry away the corpse.
Their footprints show the way to the cemetery.
The bones become bleached. Offerings dedicated to the gods end in ashes.
Giving is a doctrine of morons.
When anyone affirms a positive teaching it’s just hollow, false nonsense.
Both the foolish and the astute are annihilated and destroyed when their body breaks up, and don’t exist after death.’
And so, when I asked Ajita Kesakambala about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with the doctrine of annihilationism.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Ajita Kesakambala.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Doctrine of Pakudha Kaccāyana
One time, sir, I approached Pakudha Kaccāyana and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
‘Great king, these seven substances are not made, not derived, not created, without a creator, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They don’t move or deteriorate or obstruct each other. They’re unable to cause pleasure, pain, or neutral feeling to each other.
What seven?
The substances of earth, water, fire, air; pleasure, pain, and the soul is the seventh.
These seven substances are not made, not derived, not created, without a creator, barren, steady as a mountain peak, standing firm like a pillar.
They don’t move or deteriorate or obstruct each other. They’re unable to cause pleasure, pain, or neutral feeling to each other.
And here there is no-one who kills or who makes others kill; no-one who learns or who educates others; no-one who understands or who helps others understand.
If you chop off someone’s head with a sharp sword, you don’t take anyone’s life.
The sword simply passes through the gap between the seven substances.’
And so, when I asked Pakudha Kaccāyana about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with something else entirely.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Pakudha Kaccāyana.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Doctrine of Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta
One time, sir, I approached Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
‘Great king, consider a Jain ascetic who is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
And how is a Jain ascetic restrained in the fourfold restraint?
It’s when a Jain ascetic is obstructed by all water, devoted to all water, shaking off all water, pervaded by all water.
That’s how a Jain ascetic is restrained in the fourfold restraint.
When a Jain ascetic is restrained in the fourfold restraint,
they’re called a knotless one who is self-realized, self-controlled, and steadfast.’
And so, when I asked Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with the fourfold restraint.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Nigaṇṭha Nāṭaputta.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Doctrine of Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta
One time, sir, I approached Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, I sat down to one side, and asked him the same question.
‘Suppose you were to ask me whether there is another world. If I believed there was, I would say so.
But I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.
Suppose you were to ask me whether there is no other world …
whether there both is and is not another world …
whether there neither is nor is not another world …
whether there are beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there are no beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there both are and are not beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there neither are nor are not beings who are reborn spontaneously …
whether there is fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there is no fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there both is and is not fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether there neither is nor is not fruit and result of good and bad deeds …
whether a Realized One exists after death …
whether a Realized One doesn’t exist after death …
whether a Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death …
whether a Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death. If I believed there was, I would say so.
But I don’t say it’s like this. I don’t say it’s like that. I don’t say it’s otherwise. I don’t say it’s not so. And I don’t deny it’s not so.’
And so, when I asked Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life, he answered with evasiveness.
It was like someone who, when asked about a mango, answered with a breadfruit, or when asked about a breadfruit, answered with a mango.
I thought:
‘This is the most foolish and stupid of all these ascetics and brahmins!
How on earth can he answer with evasiveness when asked about the fruits of the ascetic life apparent in the present life?’
I thought:
‘How could one such as I presume to rebuke an ascetic or brahmin living in my realm?’
So I neither approved nor dismissed that statement of Sañjaya Belaṭṭhiputta.
I was displeased, but did not express my displeasure. Neither accepting what he said nor contradicting it, I got up from my seat and left.
The Fruits of the Ascetic Life
The First Fruit of the Ascetic Life
And so I ask the Buddha:
Sir, there are many different professional fields.
These include elephant riders, cavalry, charioteers, archers, bannermen, adjutants, food servers, warrior-chiefs, princes, chargers, great warriors, heroes, leather-clad soldiers, and sons of bondservants.
They also include bakers, barbers, bathroom attendants, cooks, garland-makers, dyers, weavers, basket-makers, potters, accountants, finger-talliers, or those following any similar professions. All these live off the fruits of their profession which are apparent in the present life.
With that they bring happiness and joy to themselves, their parents, their children and partners, and their friends and colleagues. And they establish an uplifting religious donation for ascetics and brahmins that’s conducive to heaven, ripens in happiness, and leads to heaven.
Sir, can you point out a fruit of the ascetic life that’s likewise apparent in the present life?”
“I can, great king.
Well then, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
What do you think, great king?
Suppose you had a person who was a bondservant, a worker. They get up before you and go to bed after you, and are obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely, and gazing up at your face.
They’d think:
‘The outcome and result of good deeds is just so incredible, so amazing!
For this King Ajātasattu is a human being, and so am I.
Yet he amuses himself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation as if he were a god.
Whereas I’m his bondservant, his worker. I get up before him and go to bed after him, and am obliging, behaving nicely and speaking politely, and gazing up at his face.
I should do good deeds.
Why don’t I shave off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness?’
After some time, that is what they do.
Having gone forth they’d live restrained in body, speech, and mind, living content with nothing more than food and clothes, delighting in seclusion.
And suppose your men were to report all this to you.
Would you say to them:
‘Bring that person to me! Let them once more be my bondservant, my worker’?”
Rather, I would bow to them, rise in their presence, and offer them a seat. I’d invite them to accept robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick. And I’d organize their lawful guarding and protection.”
“What do you think, great king?
If this is so, is there a fruit of the ascetic life apparent in the present life or not?”
“Clearly, sir, there is.”
“This is the first fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life, which I point out to you.”
The Second Fruit of the Ascetic Life
“But sir, can you point out another fruit of the ascetic life that’s likewise apparent in the present life?”
“I can, great king.
Well then, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
What do you think, great king?
Suppose you had a person who was a farmer, a householder, a hard worker, someone who builds up their capital.
They’d think:
‘The outcome and result of good deeds is just so incredible, so amazing!
For this King Ajātasattu is a human being, and so am I.
Yet he amuses himself, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation as if he were a god.
Whereas I’m a farmer, a householder, a hard worker, someone who builds up their capital.
I should do good deeds.
Why don’t I shave off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness?’
After some time they give up a large or small fortune, and a large or small family circle. They’d shave off hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Having gone forth they’d live restrained in body, speech, and mind, living content with nothing more than food and clothes, delighting in seclusion.
And suppose your men were to report all this to you.
Would you say to them:
‘Bring that person to me! Let them once more be a farmer, a householder, a hard worker, someone who builds up their capital’?”
Rather, I would bow to them, rise in their presence, and offer them a seat. I’d invite them to accept robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick. And I’d organize their lawful guarding and protection.”
“What do you think, great king?
If this is so, is there a fruit of the ascetic life apparent in the present life or not?”
“Clearly, sir, there is.”
“This is the second fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life, which I point out to you.”
The Finer Fruits of the Ascetic Life
“But sir, can you point out a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than these?”
“I can, great king.
Well then, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” replied the king.
The Buddha said this:
“Consider when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
A householder hears that teaching, or a householder’s child, or someone reborn in some clan.
They gain faith in the Realized One,
and reflect:
‘Living in a house is cramped and dirty, but the life of one gone forth is wide open.
It’s not easy for someone living at home to lead the spiritual life utterly full and pure, like a polished shell.
Why don’t I shave off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness?’
After some time they give up a large or small fortune, and a large or small family circle. They shave off hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Once they’ve gone forth, they live restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken. They act skillfully by body and speech. They’re purified in livelihood and accomplished in ethical conduct. They guard the sense doors, have mindfulness and situational awareness, and are content.
Ethics
The Shorter Section on Ethics
And how, great king, is a mendicant accomplished in ethics?
It’s when a mendicant gives up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword.
They’re scrupulous and kind, living full of compassion for all living beings.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up stealing. They take only what’s given, and expect only what’s given. They keep themselves clean by not thieving.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up unchastity. They are celibate, set apart, avoiding the common practice of sex.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up lying. They speak the truth and stick to the truth. They’re honest and trustworthy, and don’t trick the world with their words.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up divisive speech.
They don’t repeat in one place what they heard in another so as to divide people against each other. Instead, they reconcile those who are divided, supporting unity, delighting in harmony, loving harmony, speaking words that promote harmony.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up harsh speech. They speak in a way that’s mellow, pleasing to the ear, lovely, going to the heart, polite, likable and agreeable to the people.
This pertains to their ethics.
They give up talking nonsense. Their words are timely, true, and meaningful, in line with the teaching and training. They say things at the right time which are valuable, reasonable, succinct, and beneficial.
This pertains to their ethics.
They refrain from injuring plants and seeds.
They eat in one part of the day, abstaining from eating at night and food at the wrong time.
They avoid dancing, singing, music, and seeing shows.
They refrain from beautifying and adorning themselves with garlands, fragrance, and makeup.
They avoid high and luxurious beds.
They avoid receiving gold and money,
raw grains,
women and girls,
male and female bondservants,
goats and sheep,
chickens and pigs,
elephants, cows, horses, and mares,
and fields and land.
They refrain from running errands and messages;
buying and selling;
falsifying weights, metals, or measures;
bribery, fraud, cheating, and duplicity;
mutilation, murder, abduction, banditry, plunder, and violence.
This pertains to their ethics.
The shorter section on ethics is finished.
The Middle Section on Ethics
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in injuring plants and seeds.
These include plants propagated from roots, stems, cuttings, or joints; and those from regular seeds as the fifth. They refrain from such injury to plants and seeds.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in storing up goods for their own use.
This includes such things as food, drink, clothes, vehicles, bedding, fragrance, and material possessions.
They refrain from storing up such goods.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in seeing shows.
This includes such things as dancing, singing, music, performances, and storytelling; clapping, gongs, and kettledrums; art exhibitions and acrobatic displays; battles of elephants, horses, buffaloes, bulls, goats, rams, chickens, and quails; staff-fights, boxing, and wrestling; combat, roll calls of the armed forces, battle-formations, and regimental reviews.
They refrain from such shows.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in gambling that causes negligence.
This includes such things as checkers, draughts, checkers in the air, hopscotch, spillikins, board-games, tip-cat, drawing straws, dice, leaf-flutes, toy plows, somersaults, pinwheels, toy measures, toy carts, toy bows, guessing words from syllables, and guessing another’s thoughts.
They refrain from such gambling.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still make use of high and luxurious bedding.
This includes such things as sofas, couches, woolen covers—shag-piled, colorful, white, embroidered with flowers, quilted, embroidered with animals, double-or single-fringed—and silk covers studded with gems, as well as silken sheets, woven carpets, rugs for elephants, horses, or chariots, antelope hide rugs, and spreads of fine deer hide, with a canopy above and red cushions at both ends.
They refrain from such bedding.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in beautifying and adorning themselves with garlands, fragrance, and makeup.
This includes such things as applying beauty products by anointing, massaging, bathing, and rubbing; mirrors, ointments, garlands, fragrances, and makeup; face-powder, foundation, bracelets, headbands, fancy walking-sticks or containers, rapiers, parasols, fancy sandals, turbans, jewelry, chowries, and long-fringed white robes.
They refrain from such beautification and adornment.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in unworthy talk.
This includes such topics as talk about kings, bandits, and ministers; talk about armies, threats, and wars; talk about food, drink, clothes, and beds; talk about garlands and fragrances; talk about family, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and heroes; street talk and well talk; talk about the departed; motley talk; tales of land and sea; and talk about being reborn in this or that state of existence.
They refrain from such unworthy talk.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in arguments.
They say such things as: ‘You don’t understand this teaching and training. I understand this teaching and training. What, you understand this teaching and training? You’re practicing wrong. I’m practicing right. I stay on topic, you don’t. You said last what you should have said first. You said first what you should have said last. What you’ve thought so much about has been disproved. Your doctrine is refuted. Go on, save your doctrine! You’re trapped; get yourself out of this—if you can!’
They refrain from such argumentative talk.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in running errands and messages.
This includes running errands for rulers, ministers, aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or princes who say: ‘Go here, go there. Take this, bring that from there.’
They refrain from such errands.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still engage in deceit, flattery, hinting, and belittling, and using material possessions to chase after other material possessions.
They refrain from such deceit and flattery.
This pertains to their ethics.
The middle section on ethics is finished.
The Long Section on Ethics
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes such fields as limb-reading, omenology, divining celestial portents, interpreting dreams, divining bodily marks, divining holes in cloth gnawed by mice, fire offerings, ladle offerings, offerings of husks, rice powder, rice, ghee, or oil; offerings from the mouth, blood sacrifices, palmistry; geomancy for building sites, fields, and cemeteries; exorcisms, earth magic, snake charming, poisons; the crafts of the scorpion, the rat, the bird, and the crow; prophesying life span, chanting for protection, and animal cries.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes reading the marks of gems, cloth, clubs, swords, spears, arrows, weapons, women, men, boys, girls, male and female bondservants, elephants, horses, buffaloes, bulls, cows, goats, rams, chickens, quails, monitor lizards, rabbits, tortoises, or deer.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making predictions that the king will march forth or march back; or that our king will attack and the enemy king will retreat, or vice versa; or that our king will triumph and the enemy king will be defeated, or vice versa; and so there will be victory for one and defeat for the other.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making predictions that there will be an eclipse of the moon, or sun, or stars; that the sun, moon, and stars will be in conjunction or in opposition; that there will be a meteor shower, a fiery sky, an earthquake, thunder; that there will be a rising, a setting, a darkening, a brightening of the moon, sun, and stars. And it also includes making predictions about the results of all such phenomena.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes predicting whether there will be plenty of rain or drought; plenty to eat or famine; an abundant harvest or a bad harvest; security or peril; sickness or health. It also includes such occupations as computing, accounting, calculating, poetry, and cosmology.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes making arrangements for giving and taking in marriage; for engagement and divorce; and for scattering rice inwards or outwards at the wedding ceremony. It also includes casting spells for good or bad luck, curses to prevent conception, bind the tongue, or lock the jaws; charms for the hands and ears; questioning a mirror, a girl, or a god as an oracle; worshiping the sun, worshiping the Great One, breathing fire, and invoking Siri, the goddess of luck.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who, while enjoying food given in faith, still earn a living by unworthy branches of knowledge, by wrong livelihood.
This includes rites for propitiation, for granting wishes, for ghosts, for the earth, for rain, for property settlement, and for preparing and consecrating house sites, and rites involving rinsing and bathing, and oblations. It also includes administering emetics, purgatives, expectorants, and phlegmagogues; administering ear-oils, eye restoratives, nasal medicine, ointments, and counter-ointments; surgery with needle and scalpel, treating children, prescribing root medicines, and binding on herbs.
They refrain from such unworthy branches of knowledge, such wrong livelihood.
This pertains to their ethics.
A mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
It’s like a king who has defeated his enemies. He sees no danger from his foes in any quarter.
In the same way, a mendicant thus accomplished in ethics sees no danger in any quarter in regards to their ethical restraint.
When they have this entire spectrum of noble ethics, they experience a blameless happiness inside themselves.
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics.
The longer section on ethics is finished.
Immersion
Sense Restraint
And how does a mendicant guard the sense doors?
When a noble disciple sees a sight with their eyes, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of sight were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of sight, and achieving its restraint.
When they hear a sound with their ears …
When they smell an odor with their nose …
When they taste a flavor with their tongue …
When they feel a touch with their body …
When they know a thought with their mind, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of mind were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of mind, and achieving its restraint.
When they have this noble sense restraint, they experience an unsullied bliss inside themselves.
That’s how a mendicant guards the sense doors.
Mindfulness and Situational Awareness
And how does a mendicant have mindfulness and situational awareness?
It’s when a mendicant acts with situational awareness when going out and coming back; when looking ahead and aside; when bending and extending the limbs; when bearing the outer robe, bowl and robes; when eating, drinking, chewing, and tasting; when urinating and defecating; when walking, standing, sitting, sleeping, waking, speaking, and keeping silent.
That’s how a mendicant has mindfulness and situational awareness.
Contentment
And how is a mendicant content?
It’s when a mendicant is content with robes to look after the body and alms-food to look after the belly.
Wherever they go, they set out taking only these things.
They’re like a bird: wherever it flies, wings are its only burden.
In the same way, a mendicant is content with robes to look after the body and alms-food to look after the belly.
Wherever they go, they set out taking only these things.
That’s how a mendicant is content.
Giving Up the Hindrances
When they have this noble spectrum of ethics, this noble sense restraint, this noble mindfulness and situational awareness, and this noble contentment,
they frequent a secluded lodging—a wilderness, the root of a tree, a hill, a ravine, a mountain cave, a charnel ground, a forest, the open air, a heap of straw.
After the meal, they return from alms-round, sit down cross-legged with their body straight, and establish mindfulness right there.
Giving up desire for the world, they meditate with a heart rid of desire, cleansing the mind of desire.
Giving up ill will and malevolence, they meditate with a mind rid of ill will, full of compassion for all living beings, cleansing the mind of ill will.
Giving up dullness and drowsiness, they meditate with a mind rid of dullness and drowsiness, perceiving light, mindful and aware, cleansing the mind of dullness and drowsiness.
Giving up restlessness and remorse, they meditate without restlessness, their mind peaceful inside, cleansing the mind of restlessness and remorse.
Giving up doubt, they meditate having gone beyond doubt, not undecided about skillful qualities, cleansing the mind of doubt.
Suppose a man who has gotten into debt were to apply himself to work,
and his efforts proved successful.
He would pay off the original loan and have enough left over to support his partner.
Thinking about this,
he’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose there was a person who was sick, suffering, gravely ill. They’d lose their appetite and get physically weak.
But after some time they’d recover from that illness, and regain their appetite and their strength.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose a person was imprisoned in a jail.
But after some time they were released from jail, safe and sound, with no loss of wealth.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose a person was a bondservant. They belonged to someone else and were unable to go where they wish.
But after some time they’d be freed from servitude and become their own master, an emancipated individual able to go where they wish.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
Suppose there was a person with wealth and property who was traveling along a desert road, which was perilous, with nothing to eat.
But after some time they crossed over the desert safely, reaching the neighborhood of a village, a sanctuary free of peril.
Thinking about this,
they’d be filled with joy and happiness.
In the same way, as long as these five hindrances are not given up inside themselves, a mendicant regards them thus as a debt, a disease, a prison, slavery, and a desert crossing.
But when these five hindrances are given up inside themselves, a mendicant regards this as freedom from debt, good health, release from prison, emancipation, and sanctuary.
Seeing that the hindrances have been given up in them, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
First Absorption
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, they enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
They drench, steep, fill, and spread their body with rapture and bliss born of seclusion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of seclusion.
It’s like when a deft bathroom attendant or their apprentice pours bath powder into a bronze dish, sprinkling it little by little with water. They knead it until the ball of bath powder is soaked and saturated with moisture, spread through inside and out; yet no moisture oozes out.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with rapture and bliss born of seclusion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of seclusion.
This, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Second Absorption
Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without applying the mind and keeping it connected.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with rapture and bliss born of immersion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of immersion.
It’s like a deep lake fed by spring water. There’s no inlet to the east, west, north, or south, and no rainfall to replenish it from time to time.
But the stream of cool water welling up in the lake drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads throughout the lake. There’s no part of the lake that’s not spread through with cool water.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with rapture and bliss born of immersion. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with rapture and bliss born of immersion.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Third Absorption
Furthermore, with the fading away of rapture, a mendicant enters and remains in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
They drench, steep, fill, and spread their body with bliss free of rapture. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with bliss free of rapture.
It’s like a pool with blue water lilies, or pink or white lotuses. Some of them sprout and grow in the water without rising above it, thriving underwater. From the tip to the root they’re drenched, steeped, filled, and soaked with cool water. There’s no part of them that’s not soaked with cool water.
In the same way, a mendicant drenches, steeps, fills, and spreads their body with bliss free of rapture. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with bliss free of rapture.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Fourth Absorption
Furthermore, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, a mendicant enters and remains in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
It’s like someone sitting wrapped from head to foot with white cloth. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread over with white cloth.
In the same way, they sit spreading their body through with pure bright mind. There’s no part of the body that’s not spread with pure bright mind.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
The Eight Knowledges
Knowledge and Vision
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge and vision.
They understand:
‘This body of mine is physical. It’s made up of the four primary elements, produced by mother and father, built up from rice and porridge, liable to impermanence, to wearing away and erosion, to breaking up and destruction.
And this consciousness of mine is attached to it, tied to it.’
Suppose there was a beryl gem that was naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it was strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.
And someone with good eyesight were to take it in their hand and check it:
‘This beryl gem is naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it’s strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge and vision.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Mind-Made Body
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward the creation of a mind-made body.
From this body they create another body, physical, mind-made, complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
Suppose a person was to draw a reed out from its sheath.
They’d think:
‘This is the reed, this is the sheath. The reed and the sheath are different things. The reed has been drawn out from the sheath.’
Or suppose a person was to draw a sword out from its scabbard.
They’d think:
‘This is the sword, this is the scabbard. The sword and the scabbard are different things. The sword has been drawn out from the scabbard.’
Or suppose a person was to draw a snake out from its slough.
They’d think:
‘This is the snake, this is the slough.
The snake and the slough are different things. The snake has been drawn out from the slough.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward the creation of a mind-made body.
From this body they create another body, physical, mind-made, complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Psychic Powers
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward psychic power.
They wield the many kinds of psychic power: multiplying themselves and becoming one again; going unimpeded through a wall, a rampart, or a mountain as if through space; diving in and out of the earth as if it were water; walking on water as if it were earth; flying cross-legged through the sky like a bird; touching and stroking with the hand the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful; controlling the body as far as the Brahmā realm.
Suppose an expert potter or their apprentice had some well-prepared clay. They could produce any kind of pot that they like.
Or suppose a deft ivory-carver or their apprentice had some well-prepared ivory. They could produce any kind of ivory item that they like.
Or suppose a deft goldsmith or their apprentice had some well-prepared gold. They could produce any kind of gold item that they like.
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward psychic power.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Clairaudience
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward clairaudience.
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, they hear both kinds of sounds, human and divine, whether near or far.
Suppose there was a person traveling along the road.
They’d hear the sound of drums, clay drums, horns, kettledrums, and tom-toms.
They’d think:
‘That’s the sound of drums,’ and ‘that’s the sound of clay-drums,’ and ‘that’s the sound of horns, kettledrums, and tom-toms.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward clairaudience.
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, they hear both kinds of sounds, human and divine, whether near or far.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Comprehending the Minds of Others
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward comprehending the minds of others.
They understand the minds of other beings and individuals, having comprehended them with their own mind.
They understand mind with greed as ‘mind with greed’,
and mind without greed as ‘mind without greed’.
They understand mind with hate …
mind without hate …
mind with delusion …
mind without delusion …
constricted mind …
scattered mind …
expansive mind …
unexpansive mind …
mind that is not supreme …
mind that is supreme …
immersed mind …
unimmersed mind …
freed mind …
They understand unfreed mind as ‘unfreed mind’.
Suppose there was a woman or man who was young, youthful, and fond of adornments, and they check their own reflection in a clean bright mirror or a clear bowl of water. If they had a spot they’d know ‘I have a spot,’ and if they had no spots they’d know ‘I have no spots.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward comprehending the minds of others.
They understand the minds of other beings and individuals, having comprehended them with their own mind.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Recollection of Past Lives
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward recollection of past lives.
They recollect many kinds of past lives, that is, one, two, three, four, five, ten, twenty, thirty, forty, fifty, a hundred, a thousand, a hundred thousand rebirths; many eons of the world contracting, many eons of the world expanding, many eons of the world contracting and expanding.
They remember: ‘There, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn somewhere else. There, too, I was named this, my clan was that, I looked like this, and that was my food. This was how I felt pleasure and pain, and that was how my life ended. When I passed away from that place I was reborn here.’ And so they recollect their many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
Suppose a person was to leave their home village and go to another village.
From that village they’d go to yet another village.
And from that village they’d return to their home village. They’d think:
‘I went from my home village to another village. There I stood like this, sat like that, spoke like this, or kept silent like that. From that village I went to yet another village. There too I stood like this, sat like that, spoke like this, or kept silent like that. And from that village I returned to my home village.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward recollection of past lives.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Clairvoyance
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds:
‘These dear beings did bad things by way of body, speech, and mind.
They spoke ill of the noble ones; they had wrong view; and they acted out of that wrong view.
When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
These dear beings, however, did good things by way of body, speech, and mind. They never spoke ill of the noble ones; they had right view; and they acted out of that right view. When their body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.’ And so, with clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
Suppose there was a stilt longhouse at the central square.
A person with good eyesight standing there might see people entering and leaving a house, walking along the streets and paths, and sitting at the central square.
They’d think:
‘These are people entering and leaving a house, walking along the streets and paths, and sitting at the central square.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend and project it toward knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
Ending of Defilements
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the ending of defilements.
They truly understand: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.
They truly understand: ‘These are defilements’ … ‘This is the origin of defilements’ … ‘This is the cessation of defilements’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of defilements’.
Knowing and seeing like this, their mind is freed from the defilements of sensuality, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
When they’re freed, they know they’re freed.
They understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’
Suppose that in a mountain glen there was a lake that was transparent, clear, and unclouded.
A person with good eyesight standing on the bank would see the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.
They’d think:
‘This lake is transparent, clear, and unclouded.
And here are the mussel shells, gravel and pebbles, and schools of fish swimming about or staying still.’
In the same way, when their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge of the ending of defilements.
This too, great king, is a fruit of the ascetic life that’s apparent in the present life which is better and finer than the former ones.
And, great king, there is no other fruit of the ascetic life apparent in the present life which is better and finer than this.”
Ajātasattu Declares Himself a Lay Follower
When the Buddha had spoken, King Ajātasattu said to him,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
I have made a mistake, sir. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of me to take the life of my father, a just and principled king, for the sake of authority.
Please, sir, accept my mistake for what it is, so I will restrain myself in future.”
“Indeed, great king, you made a mistake. It was foolish, stupid, and unskillful of you to take the life of your father, a just and principled king, for the sake of sovereignty.
But since you have recognized your mistake for what it is, and have dealt with it properly, I accept it.
For it is growth in the training of the Noble One to recognize a mistake for what it is, deal with it properly, and commit to restraint in the future.”
When the Buddha had spoken, King Ajātasattu said to him,
“Well, now, sir, I must go. I have many duties, and much to do.”
“Please, great king, go at your convenience.”
Then the king, having approved and agreed with what the Buddha said, got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled him, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
Soon after the king had left, the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“The king is broken, mendicants,
he is ruined.
If he had not taken the life of his father, a just and principled king, the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma would have arisen in him in that very seat.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Longer Discourse on Mindfulness Meditation
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Kurus, near the Kuru town named Kammāsadamma.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, the four kinds of mindfulness meditation are the path to convergence. They are in order to purify sentient beings, to get past sorrow and crying, to make an end of pain and sadness, to end the cycle of suffering, and to realize extinguishment.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of the mind—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
Observing the Body
Mindfulness of Breathing
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of the body?
It’s when a mendicant—gone to a wilderness, or to the root of a tree, or to an empty hut—sits down cross-legged, with their body straight, and focuses their mindfulness right there.
Just mindful, they breathe in. Mindful, they breathe out.
When breathing in heavily they know: ‘I’m breathing in heavily.’ When breathing out heavily they know: ‘I’m breathing out heavily.’
When breathing in lightly they know: ‘I’m breathing in lightly.’ When breathing out lightly they know: ‘I’m breathing out lightly.’
They practice breathing in experiencing the whole body. They practice breathing out experiencing the whole body.
They practice breathing in stilling the body’s motion. They practice breathing out stilling the body’s motion.
It’s like a deft carpenter or carpenter’s apprentice. When making a deep cut they know: ‘I’m making a deep cut,’ and when making a shallow cut they know: ‘I’m making a shallow cut.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the body as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that the body exists, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
The Postures
Furthermore, when a mendicant is walking they know: ‘I am walking.’ When standing they know: ‘I am standing.’ When sitting they know: ‘I am sitting.’ And when lying down they know: ‘I am lying down.’
Whatever posture their body is in, they know it.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the body as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that the body exists, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Situational Awareness
Furthermore, a mendicant acts with situational awareness when going out and coming back; when looking ahead and aside; when bending and extending the limbs; when bearing the outer robe, bowl, and robes; when eating, drinking, chewing, and tasting; when urinating and defecating; when walking, standing, sitting, sleeping, waking, speaking, and keeping silent.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally …
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Focusing on the Repulsive
Furthermore, a mendicant examines their own body, up from the soles of the feet and down from the tips of the hairs, wrapped in skin and full of many kinds of filth.
‘In this body there is head hair, body hair, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, sinews, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, diaphragm, spleen, lungs, intestines, mesentery, undigested food, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, grease, saliva, snot, synovial fluid, urine.’
It’s as if there were a bag with openings at both ends, filled with various kinds of grains, such as fine rice, wheat, mung beans, peas, sesame, and ordinary rice.
And someone with good eyesight were to open it and examine the contents:
‘These grains are fine rice, these are wheat, these are mung beans, these are peas, these are sesame, and these are ordinary rice.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally …
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Focusing on the Elements
Furthermore, a mendicant examines their own body, whatever its placement or posture, according to the elements:
‘In this body there is the earth element, the water element, the fire element, and the air element.’
It’s as if a deft butcher or butcher’s apprentice were to kill a cow and sit down at the crossroads with the meat cut into portions.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally …
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
The Charnel Ground Contemplations
Furthermore, suppose a mendicant were to see a corpse discarded in a charnel ground. And it had been dead for one, two, or three days, bloated, livid, and festering.
They’d compare it with their own body:
‘This body is also of that same nature, that same kind, and cannot go beyond that.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally …
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Furthermore, suppose they were to see a corpse discarded in a charnel ground being devoured by crows, hawks, vultures, herons, dogs, tigers, leopards, jackals, and many kinds of little creatures.
They’d compare it with their own body:
‘This body is also of that same nature, that same kind, and cannot go beyond that.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally …
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Furthermore, suppose they were to see a corpse discarded in a charnel ground, a skeleton with flesh and blood, held together by sinews …
A skeleton without flesh but smeared with blood, and held together by sinews …
A skeleton rid of flesh and blood, held together by sinews …
Bones without sinews, scattered in every direction. Here a hand-bone, there a foot-bone, here a shin-bone, there a thigh-bone, here a hip-bone, there a rib-bone, here a back-bone, there an arm-bone, here a neck-bone, there a jaw-bone, here a tooth, there the skull …
White bones, the color of shells …
Decrepit bones, heaped in a pile …
Bones rotted and crumbled to powder.
They’d compare it with their own body:
‘This body is also of that same nature, that same kind, and cannot go beyond that.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the body internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the body as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that the body exists, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That too is how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body.
Observing the Feelings
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of feelings?
It’s when a mendicant who feels a pleasant feeling knows: ‘I feel a pleasant feeling.’
When they feel a painful feeling, they know: ‘I feel a painful feeling.’
When they feel a neutral feeling, they know: ‘I feel a neutral feeling.’
When they feel a material pleasant feeling, they know: ‘I feel a material pleasant feeling.’
When they feel a spiritual pleasant feeling, they know: ‘I feel a spiritual pleasant feeling.’
When they feel a material painful feeling, they know: ‘I feel a material painful feeling.’
When they feel a spiritual painful feeling, they know: ‘I feel a spiritual painful feeling.’
When they feel a material neutral feeling, they know: ‘I feel a material neutral feeling.’
When they feel a spiritual neutral feeling, they know: ‘I feel a spiritual neutral feeling.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of feelings internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing feelings as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that feelings exist, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of feelings.
Observing the Mind
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of the mind?
It’s when a mendicant understands mind with greed as ‘mind with greed,’
and mind without greed as ‘mind without greed.’
They understand mind with hate as ‘mind with hate,’
and mind without hate as ‘mind without hate.’
They understand mind with delusion as ‘mind with delusion,’
and mind without delusion as ‘mind without delusion.’
They know constricted mind as ‘constricted mind,’
and scattered mind as ‘scattered mind.’
They know expansive mind as ‘expansive mind,’
and unexpansive mind as ‘unexpansive mind.’
They know mind that is not supreme as ‘mind that is not supreme,’
and mind that is supreme as ‘mind that is supreme.’
They know mind immersed in meditation as ‘mind immersed in meditation,’
and mind not immersed in meditation as ‘mind not immersed in meditation.’
They know freed mind as ‘freed mind,’
and unfreed mind as ‘unfreed mind.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of the mind internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the mind as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that the mind exists, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the mind.
Observing Principles
The Hindrances
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five hindrances.
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five hindrances?
It’s when a mendicant who has sensual desire in them understands: ‘I have sensual desire in me.’ When they don’t have sensual desire in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have sensual desire in me.’ They understand how sensual desire arises; how, when it’s already arisen, it’s given up; and how, once it’s given up, it doesn’t arise again in the future.
When they have ill will in them, they understand: ‘I have ill will in me.’ When they don’t have ill will in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have ill will in me.’ They understand how ill will arises; how, when it’s already arisen, it’s given up; and how, once it’s given up, it doesn’t arise again in the future.
When they have dullness and drowsiness in them, they understand: ‘I have dullness and drowsiness in me.’ When they don’t have dullness and drowsiness in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have dullness and drowsiness in me.’ They understand how dullness and drowsiness arise; how, when they’ve already arisen, they’re given up; and how, once they’re given up, they don’t arise again in the future.
When they have restlessness and remorse in them, they understand: ‘I have restlessness and remorse in me.’ When they don’t have restlessness and remorse in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have restlessness and remorse in me.’ They understand how restlessness and remorse arise; how, when they’ve already arisen, they’re given up; and how, once they’re given up, they don’t arise again in the future.
When they have doubt in them, they understand: ‘I have doubt in me.’ When they don’t have doubt in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have doubt in me.’ They understand how doubt arises; how, when it’s already arisen, it’s given up; and how, once it’s given up, it doesn’t arise again in the future.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of principles internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the principles as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that principles exist, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five hindrances.
The Aggregates
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five grasping aggregates.
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five grasping aggregates?
It’s when a mendicant contemplates:
Such is form, such is the origin of form, such is the ending of form.
Such is feeling, such is the origin of feeling, such is the ending of feeling.
Such is perception, such is the origin of perception, such is the ending of perception.
Such are choices, such is the origin of choices, such is the ending of choices.
Such is consciousness, such is the origin of consciousness, such is the ending of consciousness.’
And so they meditate observing an aspect of principles internally …
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the five grasping aggregates.
The Sense Fields
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the six interior and exterior sense fields.
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles with respect to the six interior and exterior sense fields?
It’s when a mendicant understands the eye, sights, and the fetter that arises dependent on both of these. They understand how the fetter that has not arisen comes to arise; how the arisen fetter comes to be abandoned; and how the abandoned fetter comes to not rise again in the future.
They understand the ear, sounds, and the fetter …
They understand the nose, smells, and the fetter …
They understand the tongue, tastes, and the fetter …
They understand the body, touches, and the fetter …
They understand the mind, thoughts, and the fetter that arises dependent on both of these. They understand how the fetter that has not arisen comes to arise; how the arisen fetter comes to be abandoned; and how the abandoned fetter comes to not rise again in the future.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of principles internally …
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the six internal and external sense fields.
The Awakening Factors
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the seven awakening factors.
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles with respect to the seven awakening factors?
It’s when a mendicant who has the awakening factor of mindfulness in them understands: ‘I have the awakening factor of mindfulness in me.’ When they don’t have the awakening factor of mindfulness in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have the awakening factor of mindfulness in me.’ They understand how the awakening factor of mindfulness that has not arisen comes to arise; and how the awakening factor of mindfulness that has arisen becomes fulfilled by development.
When they have the awakening factor of investigation of principles …
tranquility …
immersion …
equanimity in them, they understand: ‘I have the awakening factor of equanimity in me.’ When they don’t have the awakening factor of equanimity in them, they understand: ‘I don’t have the awakening factor of equanimity in me.’ They understand how the awakening factor of equanimity that has not arisen comes to arise; and how the awakening factor of equanimity that has arisen becomes fulfilled by development.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of principles internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the principles as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that principles exist, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the seven awakening factors.
The Truths
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the four noble truths.
And how does a mendicant meditate observing an aspect of principles with respect to the four noble truths?
It’s when a mendicant truly understands: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.’
The first recitation section is finished.
The Truth of Suffering
And what is the noble truth of suffering?
Rebirth is suffering; old age is suffering; death is suffering; sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress are suffering; association with the disliked is suffering; separation from the liked is suffering; not getting what you wish for is suffering. In brief, the five grasping aggregates are suffering.
And what is rebirth?
The rebirth, inception, conception, reincarnation, manifestation of the sets of phenomena, and acquisition of the sense fields of the various sentient beings in the various orders of sentient beings.
This is called rebirth.
And what is old age?
The old age, decrepitude, broken teeth, grey hair, wrinkly skin, diminished vitality, and failing faculties of the various sentient beings in the various orders of sentient beings.
This is called old age.
And what is death?
The passing away, perishing, disintegration, demise, mortality, death, decease, breaking up of the aggregates, laying to rest of the corpse, and cutting off of the life faculty of the various sentient beings in the various orders of sentient beings.
This is called death.
And what is sorrow?
The sorrow, sorrowing, state of sorrow, inner sorrow, inner deep sorrow in someone who has undergone misfortune, who has experienced suffering.
This is called sorrow.
And what is lamentation?
The wail, lament, wailing, lamenting, state of wailing and lamentation in someone who has undergone misfortune, who has experienced suffering.
This is called lamentation.
And what is pain?
Physical pain, physical displeasure, the painful, unpleasant feeling that’s born from physical contact.
This is called pain.
And what is sadness?
Mental pain, mental displeasure, the painful, unpleasant feeling that’s born from mental contact.
This is called sadness.
And what is distress?
The stress, distress, state of stress and distress in someone who has undergone misfortune, who has experienced suffering.
This is called distress.
And what is meant by ‘association with the disliked is suffering’?
There are sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts that are unlikable, undesirable, and disagreeable. And there are those who want to harm, injure, disturb, and threaten you. The coming together with these, the joining, inclusion, mixing with them:
this is what is meant by ‘association with the disliked is suffering’.
And what is meant by ‘separation from the liked is suffering’?
There are sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts that are likable, desirable, and agreeable. And there are those who want to benefit, help, comfort, and protect you. The division from these, the disconnection, segregation, and parting from them:
this is what is meant by ‘separation from the liked is suffering’.
And what is meant by ‘not getting what you wish for is suffering’?
In sentient beings who are liable to be reborn, such a wish arises:
‘Oh, if only we were not liable to be reborn! If only rebirth would not come to us!’
But you can’t get that by wishing.
This is what is meant by ‘not getting what you wish for is suffering.’
In sentient beings who are liable to grow old …
fall ill …
experience sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress, such a wish arises: ‘Oh, if only we were not liable to experience sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress! If only sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress would not come to us!’
But you can’t get that by wishing.
This is what is meant by ‘not getting what you wish for is suffering.’
And what is meant by ‘in brief, the five grasping aggregates are suffering’?
They are the grasping aggregates that consist of form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness.
This is what is meant by ‘in brief, the five grasping aggregates are suffering’.
This is called the noble truth of suffering.
The Origin of Suffering
And what is the noble truth of the origin of suffering?
It’s the craving that leads to future rebirth, mixed up with relishing and greed, looking for enjoyment in various different realms. That is,
craving for sensual pleasures, craving for continued existence, and craving to end existence.
But where does that craving arise and where does it settle?
Whatever in the world seems nice and pleasant, it is there that craving arises and settles.
And what in the world seems nice and pleasant?
The eye in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
mind in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
thoughts in the world seem nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Eye consciousness …
ear consciousness …
nose consciousness …
tongue consciousness …
body consciousness …
mind consciousness in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Eye contact …
ear contact …
nose contact …
tongue contact …
body contact …
mind contact in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Feeling born of eye contact …
feeling born of ear contact …
feeling born of nose contact …
feeling born of tongue contact …
feeling born of body contact …
feeling born of mind contact in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Perception of sights …
perception of sounds …
perception of smells …
perception of tastes …
perception of touches …
perception of thoughts in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Intention regarding sights …
intention regarding sounds …
intention regarding smells …
intention regarding tastes …
intention regarding touches …
intention regarding thoughts in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Craving for sights …
craving for sounds …
craving for smells …
craving for tastes …
craving for touches …
craving for thoughts in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Thoughts about sights …
thoughts about sounds …
thoughts about smells …
thoughts about tastes …
thoughts about touches …
thoughts about thoughts in the world seem nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
Considerations regarding sights …
considerations regarding sounds …
considerations regarding smells …
considerations regarding tastes …
considerations regarding touches …
considerations regarding thoughts in the world seem nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving arises and settles.
This is called the noble truth of the origin of suffering.
The Cessation of Suffering
And what is the noble truth of the cessation of suffering?
It’s the fading away and cessation of that very same craving with nothing left over; giving it away, letting it go, releasing it, and not adhering to it.
Whatever in the world seems nice and pleasant, it is there that craving is given up and ceases.
And what in the world seems nice and pleasant?
The eye in the world seems nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving is given up and ceases. …
Considerations regarding thoughts in the world seem nice and pleasant, and it is there that craving is given up and ceases.
This is called the noble truth of the cessation of suffering.
The Path
And what is the noble truth of the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering?
It is simply this noble eightfold path, that is:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
And what is right view?
Knowing about suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.
This is called right view.
And what is right thought?
Thoughts of renunciation, good will, and harmlessness.
This is called right thought.
And what is right speech?
The refraining from lying, divisive speech, harsh speech, and talking nonsense.
This is called right speech.
And what is right action?
Refraining from killing living creatures, stealing, and sexual misconduct.
This is called right action.
And what is right livelihood?
It’s when a noble disciple gives up wrong livelihood and earns a living by right livelihood.
This is called right livelihood.
And what is right effort?
It’s when a mendicant generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives so that bad, unskillful qualities don’t arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen are given up.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have arisen remain, are not lost, but increase, mature, and are completed by development.
This is called right effort.
And what is right mindfulness?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of the mind—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
This is called right mindfulness.
And what is right immersion?
It’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
And with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
Giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
This is called right immersion.
This is called the noble truth of the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.
And so they meditate observing an aspect of principles internally, externally, and both internally and externally.
They meditate observing the principles as liable to originate, as liable to vanish, and as liable to both originate and vanish.
Or mindfulness is established that principles exist, to the extent necessary for knowledge and mindfulness. They meditate independent, not grasping at anything in the world.
That’s how a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of principles with respect to the four noble truths.
Anyone who develops these four kinds of mindfulness meditation in this way for seven years can expect one of two results:
enlightenment in the present life, or if there’s something left over, non-return.
Let alone seven years,
anyone who develops these four kinds of mindfulness meditation in this way for six years …
five years …
four years …
three years …
two years …
one year …
seven months …
six months …
five months …
four months …
three months …
two months …
one month …
a fortnight …
Let alone a fortnight,
anyone who develops these four kinds of mindfulness meditation in this way for seven days can expect one of two results:
enlightenment in the present life, or if there’s something left over, non-return.
‘The four kinds of mindfulness meditation are the path to convergence. They are in order to purify sentient beings, to get past sorrow and crying, to make an end of pain and sadness, to end the cycle of suffering, and to realize extinguishment.’
That’s what I said, and this is why I said it.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
With Poṭṭhapāda
On the Wanderer Poṭṭhapāda
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
Now at that time the wanderer Poṭṭhapāda was residing together with three hundred wanderers in Mallikā’s single-halled monastery for group debates, set among the flaking pale-moon ebony trees.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Sāvatthī for alms.
Then it occurred to him,
“It’s too early to wander for alms in Sāvatthī.
Why don’t I go to Mallikā’s monastery to visit the wanderer Poṭṭhapāda?”
So that’s what he did.
Now at that time, Poṭṭhapāda was sitting together with a large assembly of wanderers making an uproar, a dreadful racket. They engaged in all kinds of unworthy talk, such as
talk about kings, bandits, and ministers; talk about armies, threats, and wars; talk about food, drink, clothes, and beds; talk about garlands and fragrances; talk about family, vehicles, villages, towns, cities, and countries; talk about women and heroes; street talk and well talk; talk about the departed; motley talk; tales of land and sea; and talk about being reborn in this or that state of existence.
Poṭṭhapāda saw the Buddha coming off in the distance,
and hushed his own assembly,
“Be quiet, good sirs, don’t make a sound.
Here comes the ascetic Gotama.
The venerable likes quiet and praises quiet.
Hopefully if he sees that our assembly is quiet he’ll see fit to approach.”
Then those wanderers fell silent.
Then the Buddha approached Poṭṭhapāda,
who said to him,
“Come, Blessed One!
Welcome, Blessed One!
It’s been a long time since you took the opportunity to come here.
Please, sir, sit down, this seat is ready.”
The Buddha sat on the seat spread out,
while Poṭṭhapāda took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Poṭṭhapāda, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
On the Cessation of Perception
When he said this, the wanderer Poṭṭhapāda said to the Buddha,
“Sir, leave aside what we were sitting talking about just now.
It won’t be hard for you to hear about that later.
Sir, a few days ago several ascetics and brahmins who follow various other paths were sitting together at the debating hall, and this discussion came up among them:
‘How does the cessation of perception happen?’
Some of them said:
‘A person’s perceptions arise and cease without cause or reason.
When they arise, you become percipient.
When they cease, you become non-percipient.’
That’s how some describe the cessation of perception.
But someone else says:
‘That’s not how it is, gentlemen !
Perception is a person’s self,
When it enters, you become percipient.
When it departs, you become non-percipient.’
That’s how some describe the cessation of perception.
But someone else says:
‘That’s not how it is, gentlemen !
There are ascetics and brahmins of great power and might.
They insert and extract a person’s perception.
When they insert it, you become percipient.
When they extract it, you become non-percipient.’
That’s how some describe the cessation of perception.
But someone else says:
‘That’s not how it is, gentlemen !
There are deities of great power and might.
They insert and extract a person’s perception.
When they insert it, you become percipient.
When they extract it, you become non-percipient.’
That’s how some describe the cessation of perception.
That reminded me of the Buddha:
‘Surely it must be the Blessed One, the Holy One who is so skilled in such matters.’
The Buddha is skilled and well-versed in the cessation of perception.
How does the cessation of perception happen?”
Perception Arises With a Cause
“Regarding this, Poṭṭhapāda, those ascetics and brahmins who say that
a person’s perceptions arise and cease without cause or reason are wrong from the start.
Why is that?
Because a person’s perceptions arise and cease with cause and reason.
With training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And what is that training?” said the Buddha.
“It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
Seeing that the hindrances have been given up in them, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, they enter and remain in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
The sensual perception that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of the rapture and bliss born of seclusion.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
The subtle and true perception of the rapture and bliss born of seclusion that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of the rapture and bliss born of immersion.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, with the fading away of rapture, a mendicant enters and remains in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
The subtle and true perception of the rapture and bliss born of immersion that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of equanimous bliss.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, a mendicant enters and remains in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
The subtle and true perception of equanimous bliss that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of neutral feeling.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
The perception of luminous form that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of the dimension of infinite space.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
The subtle and true perception of the dimension of infinite space that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Furthermore, a mendicant, going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, enters and remains in the dimension of nothingness.
The subtle and true perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness that they had previously ceases.
At that time they have a subtle and true perception of the dimension of nothingness.
That’s how, with training, certain perceptions arise and certain perceptions cease.
And this is that training,” said the Buddha.
“Poṭṭhapāda, from the time a mendicant here takes responsibility for their own perception, they proceed from one stage to the next, gradually reaching the peak of perception.
Standing on the peak of perception they think,
‘Intentionality is bad for me, it’s better to be free of it.
For if I were to intend and choose, these perceptions would cease in me, and other coarser perceptions would arise.
Why don’t I neither make a choice nor form an intention?’
They neither make a choice nor form an intention.
Those perceptions cease in them, and other coarser perceptions don’t arise.
They touch cessation.
And that, Poṭṭhapāda, is how the gradual cessation of perception is attained with awareness.
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
Have you ever heard of this before?”
This is how I understand what the Buddha said:
‘From the time a mendicant here takes responsibility for their own perception, they proceed from one stage to the next, gradually reaching the peak of perception.
Standing on the peak of perception they think,
“Intentionality is bad for me, it’s better to be free of it.
For if I were to intend and choose, these perceptions would cease in me, and other coarser perceptions would arise.
Why don’t I neither make a choice nor form an intention?”
Those perceptions cease in them, and other coarser perceptions don’t arise.
They touch cessation.
And that is how the gradual cessation of perception is attained with awareness.’”
“That’s right, Poṭṭhapāda.”
“Does the Buddha describe just one peak of perception, or many?”
“I describe the peak of perception as both one and many.”
“But sir, how do you describe it as one peak and as many?”
“I describe the peak of perception according to the specific manner in which one touches cessation.
That’s how I describe the peak of perception as both one and many.”
“But sir, does perception arise first and knowledge afterwards? Or does knowledge arise first and perception afterwards? Or do they both arise at the same time?”
“Perception arises first and knowledge afterwards. The arising of perception leads to the arising of knowledge.
They understand,
‘My knowledge arose from a specific condition.’
That is a way to understand how
perception arises first and knowledge afterwards; that the arising of perception leads to the arising of knowledge.”
Perception and the Self
“Sir, is perception a person’s self, or are perception and self different things?”
“But Poṭṭhapāda, do you believe in a self?”
“I believe in a substantial self, sir, which is physical, made up of the four primary elements, and consumes solid food.”
“Suppose there were such a substantial self, Poṭṭhapāda.
In that case, perception would be one thing, the self another.
Here is another way to understand how perception and self are different things.
So long as that substantial self remains, still some perceptions arise in a person and others cease.
That is a way to understand how perception and self are different things.”
“Sir, I believe in a mind-made self which is complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.”
“Suppose there were such a mind-made self, Poṭṭhapāda. In that case, perception would be one thing, the self another.
Here is another way to understand how perception and self are different things.
So long as that mind-made self remains, still some perceptions arise in a person and others cease.
That too is a way to understand how perception and self are different things.”
“Sir, I believe in a non-physical self which is made of perception.”
“Suppose there were such a non-physical self, Poṭṭhapāda. In that case, perception would be one thing, the self another.
Here is another way to understand how perception and self are different things.
So long as that non-physical self remains, still some perceptions arise in a person and others cease.
That too is a way to understand how perception and self are different things.”
“But, sir, am I able to know whether
perception is a person’s self, or whether perception and self are different things?”
“It’s hard for you to understand this, since you have a different view, creed, preference, practice, and tradition.”
“Well, if that’s the case, sir,
then is this right: ‘The cosmos is eternal. This is the only truth, anything else is wrong’?”
“This has not been declared by me, Poṭṭhapāda.”
“Then is this right: ‘The cosmos is not eternal. This is the only truth, anything else is wrong’?”
“This too has not been declared by me.”
“Then is this right: ‘The cosmos is finite …’ …
‘The cosmos is infinite …’ …
‘The soul and the body are the same thing …’ …
‘The soul and the body are different things …’ …
‘A Realized One exists after death …’ …
‘A Realized One doesn’t exist after death …’ …
‘A Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death …’ …
‘A Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death. This is the only truth, anything else is wrong’?”
“This too has not been declared by me.”
“Why haven’t these things been declared by the Buddha?”
“Because they’re not beneficial or relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life. They don’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
That’s why I haven’t declared them.”
“Then what has been declared by the Buddha?”
“I have declared this: ‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.”
“Why have these things been declared by the Buddha?”
“Because they are beneficial and relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life. They lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
That’s why I have declared them.”
“That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
Please, sir, go at your convenience.”
Then the Buddha got up from his seat and left.
Soon after the Buddha left, those wanderers gave Poṭṭhapāda a comprehensive tongue-lashing,
“No matter what the ascetic Gotama says, Poṭṭhapāda agrees with him:
‘That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!’
We understand that the ascetic Gotama didn’t make any definitive statement at all regarding whether the cosmos is eternal and so on.”
When they said this, Poṭṭhapāda said to them,
“I too understand that the ascetic Gotama didn’t make any definitive statement at all regarding whether the cosmos is eternal and so on.
Nevertheless, the practice that he describes is true, real, and accurate. It is the regularity of natural principles, the invariance of natural principles.
So how could a sensible person such as I not agree that what was well spoken by the ascetic Gotama was in fact well spoken?”
On Citta Hatthisāriputta
Then after two or three days had passed, Citta Hatthisāriputta and Poṭṭhapāda went to see the Buddha. Citta Hatthisāriputta bowed and sat down to one side.
But the wanderer Poṭṭhapāda exchanged greetings with the Buddha, and when the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side.
Poṭṭhapāda told the Buddha what had happened after he left. The Buddha said:
“All those wanderers, Poṭṭhapāda, are blind and sightless.
You are the only one who sees.
For I have taught and pointed out both things that are definitive
and things that are not definitive.
And what things have I taught and pointed out that are not definitive?
‘The cosmos is eternal’ …
‘The cosmos is not eternal’ …
‘The cosmos is finite’ …
‘The cosmos is infinite’ …
‘The soul is the same thing as the body’ …
‘The soul and the body are different things’ …
‘A Realized One exists after death’ …
‘A Realized One doesn’t exist after death’ …
‘A Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death’ …
‘A Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death.’
And why haven’t I taught and pointed out such things that are not definitive?
Because those things aren’t beneficial or relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life. They don’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
That’s why I haven’t taught and pointed them out.
Things That Are Definitive
And what things have I taught and pointed out that are definitive?
‘This is suffering’ … ‘This is the origin of suffering’ … ‘This is the cessation of suffering’ … ‘This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering’.”
And why have I taught and pointed out such things that are definitive?
Because they are beneficial and relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life. They lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
That’s why I have taught and pointed them out.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘The self is exclusively happy and is sound after death.’
I go up to them and say,
‘Is it really true that this is the venerables’ view?’
And they answer, ‘Yes’.
I say to them,
‘But do you meditate knowing and seeing an exclusively happy world?’
Asked this, they say, ‘No.’
I say to them,
‘But have you perceived an exclusively happy self for a single day or night, or even half a day or night?’
Asked this, they say, ‘No.’
I say to them,
‘But do you know
a path and a practice to realize an exclusively happy world?’
Asked this, they say, ‘No.’
I say to them,
‘But have you ever heard the voice of the deities reborn in an exclusively happy world saying,
“Practice well, dear sirs, practice directly so as to realize an exclusively happy world.
For this is how we practiced, and we were reborn in an exclusively happy world”?’
Asked this, they say, ‘No.’
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
This being so, doesn’t what they say turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“Suppose, Poṭṭhapāda, a man were to say:
‘Whoever the finest lady in the land is, it is her that I want, her that I desire!’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that finest lady in the land who you desire—do you know whether she’s an aristocrat, a brahmin, a merchant, or a worker?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that finest lady in the land who you desire—do you know her name or clan? Whether she’s tall or short or medium? Whether her skin is black, brown, or tawny? What village, town, or city she comes from?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, do you desire someone who you’ve never even known or seen?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘Yes.’
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
This being so, doesn’t that man’s statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“In the same way, the ascetics and brahmins who have those various doctrines and views …
Doesn’t what they say turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“Suppose a man was to build a ladder at the crossroads for climbing up to a stilt longhouse.
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that stilt longhouse that you’re building a ladder for—do you know whether it’s to the north, south, east, or west? Or whether it’s tall or short or medium?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, are you building a ladder for a longhouse that you’ve never even known or seen?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘Yes.’
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
This being so, doesn’t that man’s statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“In the same way, the ascetics and brahmins who have those various doctrines and views …
Doesn’t what they say turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
Three Kinds of Reincarnation
“Poṭṭhapāda, there are these three kinds of reincarnation:
a substantial reincarnation, a mind-made reincarnation, and a non-physical reincarnation.
And what is a substantial reincarnation?
It is physical, made up of the four primary elements, and consumes solid food.
What is a mind-made reincarnation?
It is physical, mind-made, complete in all its various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
What is a non-physical reincarnation?
It is non-physical, made of perception.
I teach the Dhamma for the giving up of these three kinds of reincarnation:
‘When you practice accordingly, corrupting qualities will be given up in you and cleansing qualities will grow. You’ll enter and remain in the fullness and abundance of wisdom, having realized it with your own insight in this very life.’
Poṭṭhapāda, you might think:
‘Corrupting qualities will be given up and cleansing qualities will grow. One will enter and remain in the fullness and abundance of wisdom, having realized it with one’s own insight in this very life. But such a life is suffering.’
But you should not see it like this.
Corrupting qualities will be given up and cleansing qualities will grow. One will enter and remain in the fullness and abundance of wisdom, having realized it with one’s own insight in this very life. And there will be only joy and happiness, tranquility, mindfulness and awareness. Such a life is blissful.
If others should ask us,
‘But reverends, what is that substantial reincarnation?’ We’d answer like this,
‘This is that substantial reincarnation.’
If others should ask us,
‘But reverends, what is that mind-made reincarnation?’ We’d answer like this,
‘This is that mind-made reincarnation.’
If others should ask us,
‘But reverends, what is that non-physical reincarnation?’ We’d answer like this,
‘This is that non-physical reincarnation.’
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
This being so, doesn’t that statement turn out to have a demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“Suppose a man were to build a ladder for climbing up to a stilt longhouse right underneath that longhouse.
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that stilt longhouse that you’re building a ladder for—do you know whether it’s to the north, south, east, or west? Or whether it’s tall or short or medium?’
‘This is that stilt longhouse for which I’m building a ladder, right underneath it.’
What do you think, Poṭṭhapāda?
This being so, doesn’t that man’s statement turn out to have a demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
When the Buddha had spoken, Citta Hatthisāriputta said,
“Sir, while in a substantial reincarnation, are the mind-made and non-physical reincarnations fictitious,
and only the substantial reincarnation real?
While in a mind-made reincarnation, are the substantial and non-physical reincarnations fictitious,
and only the mind-made reincarnation real?
While in a non-physical reincarnation, are the substantial and mind-made reincarnations fictitious,
and only the non-physical reincarnation real?”
“While in a substantial reincarnation, it’s not referred to as a mind-made or non-physical reincarnation,
only as a substantial reincarnation.
While in a mind-made reincarnation, it’s not referred to as a substantial or non-physical reincarnation,
only as a mind-made reincarnation.
While in a non-physical reincarnation, it’s not referred to as a substantial or mind-made reincarnation,
only as a non-physical reincarnation.
Citta, suppose they were to ask you,
‘Did you exist in the past?
Will you exist in the future?
Do you exist now?’
How would you answer?”
“Sir, if they were to ask me this,
I’d answer like this,
‘I existed in the past.
I will exist in the future.
I exist now.’
That’s how I’d answer.”
“But Citta, suppose they were to ask you,
‘Is the reincarnation you had in the past your only real one, and those of the future and present fictitious?
Is the reincarnation you will have in the future your only real one, and those of the past and present fictitious?
Is the reincarnation you have now your only real one, and those of the past and future fictitious?’
How would you answer?”
“Sir, if they were to ask me this,
I’d answer like this,
‘The reincarnation I had in the past was real at that time, and those of the future and present fictitious.
The reincarnation I will have in the future will be real at the time, and those of the past and present fictitious.
The reincarnation I have now is real at this time, and those of the past and future fictitious.’
That’s how I’d answer.”
“In the same way, while in any one of the three reincarnations, it’s not referred to as the other two, only under its own name.
From a cow comes milk, from milk comes curds, from curds come butter, from butter comes ghee, and from ghee comes cream of ghee. And the cream of ghee is said to be the best of these.
While it’s milk, it’s not referred to as curds, butter, ghee, or cream of ghee.
It’s only referred to as milk.
While it’s curd
or cream of ghee, it’s not referred to as anything else,
only under its own name.
In the same way, while in any one of the three reincarnations, it’s not referred to as the other two, only under its own name.
These are the world’s usages, terms, expressions, and descriptions, which the Realized One uses without misapprehending them.”
When he had spoken, the wanderer Poṭṭhapāda said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, so too the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may the Buddha remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
The Ordination of Citta Hatthisāriputta
But Citta Hatthisāriputta said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, so too the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to the Buddha, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
Sir, may I receive the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence?”
And Citta Hatthisāriputta received the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha’s presence.
Not long after his ordination, Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta, living alone, withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, soon realized the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He lived having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
He understood: “Rebirth is ended; the spiritual journey has been completed; what had to be done has been done; there is no return to any state of existence.”
And Venerable Citta Hatthisāriputta became one of the perfected.
Long Discourses
The Three Knowledges
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants when he arrived at a village of the Kosalan brahmins named Manasākaṭa.
He stayed in a mango grove on a bank of the river Aciravatī to the north of Manasākaṭa.
Now at that time several very well-known well-to-do brahmins were residing in Manasākaṭa. They included
the brahmins Caṅkī, Tārukkha, Pokkharasāti, Jāṇussoṇi, Todeyya, and others.
Then as the students Vāseṭṭha and Bhāradvāja were going for a walk they began a discussion regarding the variety of paths.
Vāseṭṭha said this:
“This is the only straight path, the direct route that leads someone who practices it to the company of Brahmā; namely, that explained by the brahmin Pokkharasāti.”
Bhāradvāja said this:
“This is the only straight path, the direct route that leads someone who practices it to the company of Brahmā; namely, that explained by the brahmin Tārukkha.”
But neither was able to persuade the other.
So Vāseṭṭha said to Bhāradvāja,
“Bhāradvāja, the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—is staying in a mango grove on a bank of the river Aciravatī to the north of Manasākaṭa.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
Come, let’s go to see him and ask him about this matter.
As he answers, so we’ll remember it.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Bhāradvāja.
The Variety of Paths
So they went to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they sat down to one side and Vāseṭṭha told him of their conversation, adding:
“In this matter we have a dispute, a disagreement, a difference of opinion.”
“So, Vāseṭṭha, it seems that you say that
the straight path is that explained by Pokkharasāti,
while Bhāradvāja says that
the straight path is that explained by Tārukkha.
But what exactly is your disagreement about?”
“About the variety of paths, Master Gotama.
Even though brahmins describe different paths—the Addhariya brahmins, the Tittiriya brahmins, the Chandoka brahmins, and the Bavhadija brahmins—all of them lead someone who practices them to the company of Brahmā.
It’s like a village or town that has many different roads nearby, yet all of them meet at that village.
In the same way, even though brahmins describe different paths—the Addhariya brahmins, the Tittiriya brahmins, the Chandoka brahmins, and the Bavhadija brahmins—all of them lead someone who practices them to the company of Brahmā.”
Questioning Vāseṭṭha
“Do you say, ‘they lead someone’, Vāseṭṭha?”
“I do, Master Gotama.”
“Do you say, ‘they lead someone’, Vāseṭṭha?”
“I do, Master Gotama.”
“Do you say, ‘they lead someone’, Vāseṭṭha?”
“I do, Master Gotama.”
“Well, of the brahmins who are proficient in the three Vedas, Vāseṭṭha, is there even a single one who has seen Brahmā with their own eyes?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Well, has even a single one of their teachers seen Brahmā with their own eyes?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Well, has even a single one of their teachers’ teachers seen Brahmā with their own eyes?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Well, has anyone back to the seventh generation of teachers seen Brahmā with their own eyes?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Well, what of the ancient hermits of the brahmins, namely Aṭṭhaka, Vāmaka, Vāmadeva, Vessāmitta, Yamadaggi, Aṅgīrasa, Bhāradvāja, Vāseṭṭha, Kassapa, and Bhagu? They were the authors and propagators of the hymns. Their hymnal was sung and propagated and compiled in ancient times; and these days, brahmins continue to sing and chant it, chanting what was chanted and teaching what was taught.
Did they say:
‘We know and see where Brahmā is or what way he lies’?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“So it seems that none of the brahmins have seen Brahmā with their own eyes,
and not even the ancient hermits
claimed to know where he is.
Yet the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas say:
‘We teach the path to the company of that which we neither know nor see.
This is the only straight path, the direct route that leads someone who practices it to the company of Brahmā.’
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
This being so, doesn’t their statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha.
For it is impossible that they should teach the path to that which they neither know nor see.
Suppose there was a queue of blind men, each holding the one in front: the first one does not see, the middle one does not see, and the last one does not see.
In the same way, it seems to me that the brahmins’ statement turns out to be comparable to a queue of blind men: the first one does not see, the middle one does not see, and the last one does not see.
Their statement turns out to be a joke—mere words, void and hollow.
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Do the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas see the sun and moon just as other folk do? And do they pray to them and beseech them, following their course from where they rise to where they set with joined palms held in worship?”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Though this is so, are the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas able to teach the path to the company of the sun and moon, saying:
‘This is the only straight path, the direct route that leads someone who practices it to the company of the sun and moon’?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“So it seems that even though the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas see the sun and moon, they are not able to teach the path to the company of the sun and moon.
But it seems that even though they have not seen Brahmā with their own eyes,
they still claim
to teach the path to the company of that which they neither know nor see.
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
This being so, doesn’t their statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha. For it is impossible that they should teach the path to that which they neither know nor see.
The Simile of the Finest Lady in the Land
Suppose a man were to say,
‘Whoever the finest lady in the land is, it is her that I want, her that I desire!’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that finest lady in the land who you desire—do you know whether
she’s an aristocrat, a brahmin, a merchant, or a worker?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that finest lady in the land who you desire—do you know her name or clan? Whether she’s tall or short or medium? Whether her skin is black, brown, or tawny? What village, town, or city she comes from?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, do you desire someone who you’ve never even known or seen?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘Yes.’
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
This being so, doesn’t that man’s statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“In the same way,
doesn’t the statement of those brahmins turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha. For it is impossible that they should teach the path to that which they neither know nor see.
The Simile of the Ladder
Suppose a man was to build a ladder at the crossroads for climbing up to a stilt longhouse.
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, that stilt longhouse that you’re building a ladder for—do you know whether it’s to the north, south, east, or west? Or whether it’s tall or short or medium?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘No.’
They’d say to him,
‘Mister, are you building a ladder for a longhouse that you’ve never even known or seen?’
Asked this, he’d say, ‘Yes.’
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
This being so, doesn’t that man’s statement turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, sir.”
“In the same way,
doesn’t the statement of those brahmins turn out to have no demonstrable basis?”
“Clearly that’s the case, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha.
For it is impossible that they should teach the path to that which they neither know nor see.
The Simile of the River Aciravatī
Suppose the river Aciravatī was full to the brim so a crow could drink from it.
Then along comes a person who wants to cross over to the far shore.
Standing on the near shore, they’d call out to the far shore,
‘Come here, far shore! Come here, far shore!’
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Would the far shore of the Aciravatī river come over to the near shore because of that man’s call, request, desire, or expectation?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“In the same way, Vāseṭṭha, the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas proceed having given up those things that make one a true brahmin, and having undertaken those things that make one not a true brahmin. Yet they say:
‘We call upon Indra! We call upon Soma! We call upon Īsāna! We call upon Pajāpati! We call upon Brahmā! We call upon Mahiddhi! We call upon Yama!’
So long as they proceed in this way it’s impossible that they will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā.
Suppose the river Aciravatī was full to the brim so a crow could drink from it.
Then along comes a person who wants to cross over to the far shore.
But while still on the near shore, their arms are tied tightly behind their back with a strong chain.
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Could that person cross over to the far shore?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“In the same way, the five kinds of sensual stimulation are called ‘chains’ and ‘fetters’ in the training of the Noble One.
What five?
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
These are the five kinds of sensual stimulation that are called ‘chains’ and ‘fetters’ in the training of the Noble One.
The brahmins proficient in the three Vedas enjoy these five kinds of sensual stimulation tied, infatuated, attached, blind to the drawbacks, and not understanding the escape.
So long as they enjoy them it’s impossible that they will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā.
Suppose the river Aciravatī was full to the brim so a crow could drink from it.
Then along comes a person who wants to cross over to the far shore.
But they’d lie down wrapped in cloth from head to foot.
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Could that person cross over to the far shore?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“In the same way, the five hindrances are called ‘obstacles’ and ‘hindrances’ and ‘coverings’ and ‘shrouds’ in the training of the Noble One.
What five?
The hindrances of sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
These five hindrances are called ‘obstacles’ and ‘hindrances’ and ‘coverings’ and ‘shrouds’ in the training of the Noble One.
The brahmins proficient in the three Vedas are hindered, obstructed, covered, and shrouded by these five hindrances.
So long as they are so obstructed it’s impossible that they will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā.
Converging
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Have you heard that the brahmins who are elderly and senior, the teachers of teachers, say whether Brahmā is possessive or not?”
“That he is not, Master Gotama.”
“Is his heart full of enmity or not?”
“It is not.”
“Is his heart full of ill will or not?”
“It is not.”
“Is his heart corrupted or not?”
“It is not.”
“Does he wield power or not?”
“He does.”
“What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Are the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas possessive or not?”
“They are.”
“Are their hearts full of enmity or not?”
“They are.”
“Are their hearts full of ill will or not?”
“They are.”
“Are their hearts corrupted or not?”
“They are.”
“Do they wield power or not?”
“They do not.”
“So it seems that the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas are possessive, but Brahmā is not.
But would brahmins who are possessive come together and converge with Brahmā, who isn’t possessive?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha! It’s impossible that the brahmins who are possessive will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā, who isn’t possessive.
And it seems that the brahmins have enmity,
corruption,
and do not wield power, while Brahmā is the opposite in all these things. But would brahmins who are opposite to Brahmā in all things come together and converge with him?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha! It’s impossible that such brahmins will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā.
But here the brahmins proficient in the three Vedas sink down where they have sat, only to be torn apart; all the while imagining that they’re crossing over to drier ground.
That’s why the three Vedas of the brahmins are called a ‘salted land’ and a ‘barren land’ and a ‘disaster’.”
When he said this, Vāseṭṭha said to the Buddha,
“I have heard, Master Gotama, that you know the path to company with Brahmā.”
“What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Is the village of Manasākaṭa nearby?”
“Yes it is.”
“What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
Suppose a person was born and raised in Manasākaṭa.
And as soon as they left the town some people asked them for the road to Manasākaṭa.
Would they be slow or hesitant to answer?”
“No, Master Gotama.
Why is that?
Because they were born and raised in Manasākaṭa. They’re well acquainted with all the roads to the village.”
“Still, it’s possible they might be slow or hesitant to answer. But the Realized One is never slow or hesitant when questioned about the Brahmā realm or the practice that leads to the Brahmā realm.
I understand Brahmā, the Brahmā realm, and the practice that leads to the Brahmā realm, practicing in accordance with which one is reborn in the Brahmā realm.”
When he said this, Vāseṭṭha said to the Buddha,
“I have heard, Master Gotama, that you teach the path to company with Brahmā.
Please teach us that path and elevate this generation of brahmins.”
“Well then, Vāseṭṭha, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Vāseṭṭha.
Teaching the Path to Brahmā
The Buddha said this:
“It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
Seeing that the hindrances have been given up in them, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, they feel bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
They meditate spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Suppose there was a powerful horn blower. They’d easily make themselves heard in the four directions.
In the same way, when the heart’s release by love has been developed and cultivated like this, any limited deeds they’ve done don’t remain or persist there.
This is a path to companionship with Brahmā.
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates spreading a heart full of compassion …
They meditate spreading a heart full of rejoicing …
They meditate spreading a heart full of equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Suppose there was a powerful horn blower. They’d easily make themselves heard in the four directions.
In the same way, when the heart’s release by equanimity has been developed and cultivated like this, any limited deeds they’ve done don’t remain or persist there.
This too is a path to companionship with Brahmā.
What do you think, Vāseṭṭha?
When a mendicant meditates like this, are they possessive or not?”
“They are not.”
“Is their heart full of enmity or not?”
“It is not.”
“Is their heart full of ill will or not?”
“It is not.”
“Is their heart corrupted or not?”
“It is not.”
“Do they wield power or not?”
“They do.”
“So it seems that that mendicant is not possessive, and neither is Brahmā.
Would a mendicant who is not possessive come together and converge with Brahmā, who isn’t possessive?”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha! It’s possible that a mendicant who is not possessive will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā, who isn’t possessive.
And it seems that that mendicant has no enmity,
corruption,
and does wield power, while Brahmā is the same in all these things. Would a mendicant who is the same as Brahmā in all things come together and converge with him?”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“Good, Vāseṭṭha! It’s possible that that mendicant will, when the body breaks up, after death, be reborn in the company of Brahmā.”
When he had spoken, Vāseṭṭha and Bhāradvāja said to him,
“Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Gotama has made the teaching clear in many ways.
We go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember us as lay followers who have gone for refuge for life.”
Long Discourses
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Campā on the banks of the Gaggarā Lotus Pond together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants.
There Sāriputta addressed the mendicants:
“Reverends, mendicants!”
“Reverend,” they replied.
Sāriputta said this:
“I will relate the teachings
up to ten for attaining extinguishment,
for making an end of suffering,
the release from all ties.
Groups of One
Reverends, one thing is helpful, one thing should be developed, one thing should be completely understood, one thing should be given up, one thing makes things worse, one thing leads to distinction, one thing is hard to comprehend, one thing should be produced, one thing should be directly known, one thing should be realized.
What one thing is helpful?
Diligence in skillful qualities.
What one thing should be developed?
Mindfulness of the body that is full of pleasure.
What one thing should be completely understood?
Contact, which is accompanied by defilements and is prone to being grasped.
What one thing should be given up?
What one thing makes things worse?
Improper attention.
What one thing leads to distinction?
Proper attention.
What one thing is hard to comprehend?
The heart’s immersion of immediate result.
What one thing should be produced?
Unshakable knowledge.
What one thing should be directly known?
All sentient beings are sustained by food.
What one thing should be realized?
The unshakable release of the heart.
So these ten things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Two
Two things are helpful, two things should be developed, two things should be completely understood, two things should be given up, two things make things worse, two things lead to distinction, two things are hard to comprehend, two things should be produced, two things should be directly known, two things should be realized.
What two things are helpful?
Mindfulness and situational awareness.
What two things should be developed?
Serenity and discernment.
What two things should be completely understood?
Name and form.
What two things should be given up?
Ignorance and craving for continued existence.
What two things make things worse?
Being hard to admonish and having bad friends.
What two things lead to distinction?
Being easy to admonish and having good friends.
What two things are hard to comprehend?
What are the causes and conditions for the corruption of sentient beings, and what are the causes and conditions for the purification of sentient beings.
What two things should be produced?
Two knowledges:
knowledge of ending, and knowledge of non-arising.
What two things should be directly known?
Two elements:
the conditioned element and the unconditioned element.
What two things should be realized?
Knowledge and freedom.
So these twenty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Three
Three things are helpful, etc.
What three things are helpful?
Associating with good people, listening to the true teaching, and practicing in line with the teaching.
What three things should be developed?
Three kinds of immersion.
Immersion with placing the mind and keeping it connected. Immersion without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. Immersion without placing the mind or keeping it connected.
What three things should be completely understood?
Three feelings:
pleasant, painful, and neutral.
What three things should be given up?
Three cravings:
craving for sensual pleasures, craving for continued existence, and craving to end existence.
What three things make things worse?
Three unskillful roots:
greed, hate, and delusion.
What three things lead to distinction?
Three skillful roots:
non-greed, non-hate, and non-delusion.
What three things are hard to comprehend?
Three elements of escape.
Renunciation is the escape from sensual pleasures. The formless is the escape from form. Cessation is the escape from whatever is created, conditioned, and dependently originated.
What three things should be produced?
Three knowledges:
regarding the past, future, and present.
What three things should be directly known?
Three elements:
sensuality, form, and formlessness.
What three things should be realized?
Three knowledges:
recollection of past lives, knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings, and knowledge of the ending of defilements.
So these thirty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Four
Four things are helpful, etc.
What four things are helpful?
Four situations:
living in a suitable region, relying on good people, being rightly resolved in oneself, and past merit.
What four things should be developed?
The four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
A mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
What four things should be completely understood?
Four foods:
solid food, whether coarse or fine; contact is the second, mental intention the third, and consciousness the fourth.
What four things should be given up?
Four floods:
sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
What four things make things worse?
Four bonds:
sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
What four things lead to distinction?
Four kinds of detachment:
detachment from the bonds of sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
What four things are hard to comprehend?
Four kinds of immersion:
immersion liable to decline, stable immersion, immersion that leads to distinction, and immersion that leads to penetration.
What four things should be produced?
Four knowledges:
knowledge of the present phenomena, inferential knowledge, knowledge of others’ minds, and conventional knowledge.
What four things should be directly known?
The four noble truths:
suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.
What four things should be realized?
Four fruits of the ascetic life:
stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection.
So these forty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Five
Five things are helpful, etc.
What five things are helpful?
Five factors that support meditation.
A mendicant has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They are rarely ill or unwell. Their stomach digests well, being neither too hot nor too cold, but just right, and fit for meditation.
They’re not devious or deceitful. They reveal themselves honestly to the Teacher or sensible spiritual companions.
They live with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They’re strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
They’re wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
What five things should be developed?
Right immersion with five factors:
pervaded with rapture, pervaded with pleasure, pervaded with mind, pervaded with light, and the foundation for reviewing.
What five things should be completely understood?
Five grasping aggregates:
form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness.
What five things should be given up?
Five hindrances:
sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
What five things make things worse?
Five kinds of emotional barrenness.
Firstly, a mendicant has doubts about the Teacher. They’re uncertain, undecided, and lacking confidence.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the first kind of emotional barrenness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has doubts about the teaching …
the Saṅgha …
the training …
A mendicant is angry and upset with their spiritual companions, resentful and closed off.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the fifth kind of emotional barrenness.
What five things lead to distinction?
Five faculties:
faith, energy, mindfulness, immersion, and wisdom.
What five things are hard to comprehend?
Five elements of escape.
A mendicant focuses on sensual pleasures, but their mind isn’t eager, confident, settled, and decided about them.
But when they focus on renunciation, their mind is eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
Their mind is in a good state, well developed, well risen, well freed, and well detached from sensual pleasures.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of sensual pleasures, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from sensual pleasures is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on ill will, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on good will, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from ill will.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of ill will, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from ill will is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on harming, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on compassion, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from harming.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of harming, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from harming is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on form, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on the formless, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from forms.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of form, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from forms is explained.
Take a case where a mendicant focuses on identity, but their mind isn’t eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
But when they focus on the ending of identity, their mind is eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
Their mind is in a good state, well developed, well risen, well freed, and well detached from identity.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of identity, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from identity is explained.
What five things should be produced?
Right immersion with five knowledges.
The following knowledges arise for you personally: ‘This immersion is blissful now, and results in bliss in the future.’
‘This immersion is noble and spiritual.’
‘This immersion is not cultivated by sinners.’
‘This immersion is peaceful and sublime and tranquil and unified, not held in place by forceful suppression.’
‘I mindfully enter into and emerge from this immersion.’
What five things should be directly known?
Five opportunities for freedom.
Firstly, the Teacher or a respected spiritual companion teaches Dhamma to a mendicant.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how the Teacher or a respected spiritual companion teaches it.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the first opportunity for freedom.
Furthermore, it may be that neither the Teacher nor a respected spiritual companion teaches Dhamma to a mendicant. But the mendicant teaches Dhamma in detail to others as they learned and memorized it.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how they teach it in detail to others as they learned and memorized it.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the second opportunity for freedom.
Furthermore, it may be that neither the Teacher nor … the mendicant teaches Dhamma.
But the mendicant recites the teaching in detail as they learned and memorized it.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how they recite it in detail as they learned and memorized it.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the third opportunity for freedom.
Furthermore, it may be that neither the Teacher nor … the mendicant teaches Dhamma … nor does the mendicant recite the teaching.
But the mendicant thinks about and considers the teaching in their heart, examining it with the mind as they learned and memorized it.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how they think about and consider it in their heart, examining it with the mind as they learned and memorized it.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the fourth opportunity for freedom.
Furthermore, it may be that neither the Teacher nor … the mendicant teaches Dhamma … nor does the mendicant recite the teaching … or think about it.
But a meditation subject as a foundation of immersion is properly grasped, attended, borne in mind, and comprehended with wisdom.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how a meditation subject as a foundation of immersion is properly grasped, attended, borne in mind, and comprehended with wisdom.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the fifth opportunity for freedom.
What five things should be realized?
Five spectrums of the teaching:
ethics, immersion, wisdom, freedom, and knowledge and vision of freedom.
So these fifty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Six
Six things are helpful, etc.
What six things are helpful?
Six warm-hearted qualities.
Firstly, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with bodily kindness, both in public and in private.
This warm-hearted quality makes for fondness and respect, conducing to inclusion, harmony, and unity, without quarreling.
Furthermore, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with verbal kindness.
Furthermore, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with mental kindness.
Furthermore, a mendicant shares without reservation any material possessions they have gained by legitimate means, even the food placed in the alms-bowl, using them in common with their ethical spiritual companions.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives according to the precepts shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private. Those precepts are unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives according to the view shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private. That view is noble and emancipating, and leads one who practices it to the complete ending of suffering.
This warm-hearted quality makes for fondness and respect, conducing to inclusion, harmony, and unity, without quarreling.
What six things should be developed?
Six topics for recollection:
the recollection of the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, ethics, generosity, and the deities.
What six things should be completely understood?
Six interior sense fields:
eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
What six things should be given up?
Six classes of craving:
craving for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts.
What six things make things worse?
Six kinds of disrespect.
A mendicant lacks respect and reverence for the Teacher, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, the training, diligence, and hospitality.
What six things lead to distinction?
Six kinds of respect.
A mendicant has respect and reverence for the Teacher, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, the training, diligence, and hospitality.
What six things are hard to comprehend?
Six elements of escape.
Take a mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by love. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow ill will still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! Don’t say that.
Don’t misrepresent the Buddha, for misrepresentation of the Buddha is not good. And the Buddha would not say that.
It’s impossible, reverend, it cannot happen that the heart’s release by love has been developed and properly implemented,
yet somehow ill will still occupies the mind.
For it is the heart’s release by love that is the escape from ill will.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by compassion. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow the thought of harming still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by compassion that is the escape from thoughts of harming.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by rejoicing. …
Yet somehow negativity still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by rejoicing that is the escape from negativity.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by equanimity. …
Yet somehow desire still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by equanimity that is the escape from desire.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the signless release of the heart. …
Yet somehow my consciousness still follows after signs.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the signless release of the heart that is the escape from all signs.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’m rid of the conceit “I am”. And I don’t regard anything as “I am this”.
Yet somehow the dart of doubt and indecision still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! Don’t say that. Don’t misrepresent the Buddha, for misrepresentation of the Buddha is not good. And the Buddha would not say that.
It’s impossible, reverend, it cannot happen that the conceit “I am” has been done away with, and nothing is regarded as “I am this”,
yet somehow the dart of doubt and indecision still occupy the mind.
For it is the uprooting of the conceit “I am” that is the escape from the dart of doubt and indecision.’
What six things should be produced?
Six consistent responses.
A mendicant, seeing a sight with their eyes, is neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
Hearing a sound with their ears …
Smelling an odor with their nose …
Tasting a flavor with their tongue …
Feeling a touch with their body …
Knowing a thought with their mind, they’re neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
What six things should be directly known?
Six unsurpassable things:
the unsurpassable seeing, listening, acquisition, training, service, and recollection.
What six things should be realized?
Six direct knowledges.
A mendicant wields the many kinds of psychic power: multiplying themselves and becoming one again; appearing and disappearing; going unimpeded through a wall, a rampart, or a mountain as if through space; diving in and out of the earth as if it were water; walking on water as if it were earth; flying cross-legged through the sky like a bird; touching and stroking with the hand the sun and moon, so mighty and powerful; controlling the body as far as the Brahmā realm.
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, they hear both kinds of sounds, human and divine, whether near or far.
They understand the minds of other beings and individuals, having comprehended them with their own mind.
They recollect many kinds of past lives, with features and details.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see sentient beings passing away and being reborn—inferior and superior, beautiful and ugly, in a good place or a bad place. They understand how sentient beings are reborn according to their deeds.
They realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
So these sixty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Seven
Seven things are helpful, etc.
What seven things are helpful?
Seven kinds of wealth of noble ones:
the wealth of faith, ethical conduct, conscience, prudence, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
What seven things should be developed?
Seven awakening factors:
mindfulness, investigation of principles, energy, rapture, tranquility, immersion, and equanimity.
What seven things should be completely understood?
Seven planes of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fifth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the sixth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the seventh plane of consciousness.
What seven things should be given up?
Seven underlying tendencies:
sensual desire, repulsion, views, doubt, conceit, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
What seven things make things worse?
Seven bad qualities:
a mendicant is faithless, shameless, imprudent, uneducated, lazy, unmindful, and witless.
What seven things lead to distinction?
Seven good qualities:
a mendicant is faithful, conscientious, prudent, learned, energetic, mindful, and wise.
What seven things are hard to comprehend?
Seven aspects of the teachings of the good persons:
a mendicant knows the teachings, knows the meaning, knows themselves, knows moderation, knows the right time, knows assemblies, and knows people.
What seven things should be produced?
Seven perceptions:
the perception of impermanence, the perception of not-self, the perception of ugliness, the perception of drawbacks, the perception of giving up, the perception of fading away, and the perception of cessation.
What seven things should be directly known?
Seven qualifications for graduation.
A mendicant has a keen enthusiasm to undertake the training …
to examine the teachings …
to get rid of desires …
for retreat …
to rouse up energy …
for mindfulness and alertness …
to penetrate theoretically. And they don’t lose these desires in the future.
What seven things should be realized?
Seven powers of one who has ended the defilements.
Firstly, a mendicant with defilements ended has clearly seen with right wisdom all conditions as truly impermanent.
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has clearly seen with right wisdom that sensual pleasures are truly like a pit of glowing coals. …
Furthermore, the mind of a mendicant with defilements ended slants, slopes, and inclines to seclusion. They’re withdrawn, loving renunciation, and they’ve totally done with defiling influences. …
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the four kinds of mindfulness meditation. …
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the five faculties. …
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the seven awakening factors. …
Furthermore, a mendicant with defilements ended has well developed the noble eightfold path. …
This is a power that a mendicant who has ended the defilements relies on to claim:
‘My defilements have ended.’
So these seventy things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
The first recitation section is finished.
Groups of Eight
Eight things are helpful, etc.
What eight things are helpful?
There are eight causes and reasons that lead to acquiring the wisdom fundamental to the spiritual life, and to its increase, growth, development, and fulfillment once it has been acquired.
What eight?
It’s when a mendicant lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role. And they set up a keen sense of conscience and prudence for them, with warmth and respect.
This is the first cause.
When a mendicant lives relying on the Teacher or a spiritual companion in a teacher’s role—with a keen sense of conscience and prudence for them, with warmth and respect—from time to time they go and ask them questions:
‘Why, sir, does it say this?
What does that mean?’
Those venerables clarify what is unclear, reveal what is obscure, and dispel doubt regarding the many doubtful matters.
This is the second cause.
After hearing that teaching they perfect withdrawal of both body and mind.
This is the third cause.
Furthermore, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is the fourth cause.
Furthermore, a mendicant is very learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned.
These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reinforcing them by recitation, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
This is the fifth cause.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This is the sixth cause.
Furthermore, a mendicant is mindful.
They have utmost mindfulness and alertness, and can remember and recall what was said and done long ago.
This is the seventh cause.
Furthermore, a mendicant meditates observing rise and fall in the five grasping aggregates.
‘Such is form, such is the origin of form, such is the ending of form.
Such is feeling, such is the origin of feeling, such is the ending of feeling.
Such is perception, such is the origin of perception, such is the ending of perception.
Such are choices, such is the origin of choices, such is the ending of choices.
Such is consciousness, such is the origin of consciousness, such is the ending of consciousness.’
This is the eighth cause.
What eight things should be developed?
The noble eightfold path, that is:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
What eight things should be completely understood?
Eight worldly conditions:
gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, pleasure and pain.
What eight things should be given up?
Eight wrong ways:
wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong immersion.
What eight things make things worse?
Eight grounds for laziness.
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do.
They think:
‘I have some work to do. But while doing it my body will get tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work. But while working my body got tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the second ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey. But while walking my body will get tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the third ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey. But while walking my body got tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the fourth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is tired and unfit for work. I’d better have a lie down.’…
This is the fifth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is heavy, unfit for work, like I’ve just eaten a load of beans. I’d better have a lie down.’…
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the sixth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick. They think:
‘I feel a little sick. Lying down would be good for me. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the seventh ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness. My body is weak and unfit for work. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the eighth ground for laziness.
What eight things lead to distinction?
Eight grounds for arousing energy.
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do. They think:
‘I have some work to do. While working it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work. While I was working I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the second ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey. While walking it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the third ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey. While I was walking I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the fourth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is light and fit for work. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the fifth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is strong and fit for work. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the sixth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick.
They think:
‘I feel a little sick. It’s possible this illness will worsen. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’…
This is the seventh ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness. It’s possible the illness will come back. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the eighth ground for arousing energy.
What eight things are hard to comprehend?
Eight lost opportunities for spiritual practice.
Firstly, a Realized One has arisen in the world. He teaches the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
But a person has been reborn in hell.
This is the first lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the animal realm.
This is the second lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the ghost realm.
This is the third lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But person has been reborn in one of the long-lived orders of gods.
This is the fourth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the borderlands, among strange barbarian tribes, where monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen do not go.
This is the fifth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
And a person is reborn in a central country. But they have wrong view and distorted perspective:
‘There’s no meaning in giving, sacrifice, or offerings. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds. There’s no afterlife. There are no duties to mother and father. No beings are reborn spontaneously. And there’s no ascetic or brahmin who is well attained and practiced, and who describes the afterlife after realizing it with their own insight.’
This is the sixth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
And a person is reborn in a central country. But they’re witless, dull, stupid, and unable to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the seventh lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But he doesn’t teach the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as announced by the Holy One. And a person is reborn in a central country. And they’re wise, bright, clever, and able to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the eighth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
What eight things should be produced?
Eight thoughts of a great man.
‘This teaching is for those of few wishes, not those of many wishes.
It’s for the contented, not those who lack contentment.
It’s for the secluded, not those who enjoy company.
It’s for the energetic, not the lazy.
It’s for the mindful, not the unmindful.
It’s for those with immersion, not those without immersion.
It’s for the wise, not the witless.
This teaching is for those who don’t enjoy proliferating, not for those who enjoy proliferating.’
What eight things should be directly known?
Eight dimensions of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the first dimension of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the second dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the third dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fourth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
They’re like a flax flower that’s blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fifth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
They’re like a champak flower that’s yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the sixth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
They’re like a scarlet mallow flower that’s red, with red color, red hue, and red tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the seventh dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
They’re like the morning star that’s white, with white color, white hue, and white tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the eighth dimension of mastery.
What eight things should be realized?
Eight liberations.
Having physical form, they see visions.
This is the first liberation.
Not perceiving physical form internally, someone see visions externally.
This is the second liberation.
They’re focused only on beauty.
This is the third liberation.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fourth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the fifth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth liberation.
So these eighty things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Nine
Nine things are helpful, etc.
What nine things are helpful?
Nine things rooted in proper attention. When you attend properly, joy springs up. When you’re joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, you feel bliss. And when you’re blissful, the mind becomes immersed. When your mind is immersed, you truly know and see. When you truly know and see, you grow disillusioned. Being disillusioned, desire fades away. When desire fades away you’re freed.
What nine things should be developed?
Nine factors of trying to be pure.
The factors of trying to be pure in ethics, mind, view, overcoming doubt, knowledge and vision of the variety of paths, knowledge and vision of the practice, knowledge and vision, wisdom, and freedom.
What nine things should be completely understood?
Nine abodes of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are non-percipient and do not experience anything, such as the gods who are non-percipient beings.
This is the fifth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the sixth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the seventh abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the eighth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of nothingness. They have been reborn in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the ninth abode of sentient beings.
What nine things should be given up?
Nine things rooted in craving.
Craving is a cause of seeking. Seeking is a cause of gaining material possessions. Gaining material possessions is a cause of assessing. Assessing is a cause of desire and lust. Desire and lust is a cause of attachment. Attachment is a cause of possessiveness. Possessiveness is a cause of stinginess. Stinginess is a cause of safeguarding. Owing to safeguarding, many bad, unskillful things come to be: taking up the rod and the sword, quarrels, arguments, fights, accusations, divisive speech, and lies.
What nine things make things worse?
Nine grounds for resentment.
Thinking: ‘They did wrong to me,’ you harbor resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are doing wrong to me’ …
‘They will do wrong to me’ …
‘They did wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They are doing wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They will do wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike,’ you harbor resentment.
What nine things lead to distinction?
Nine methods to get rid of resentment.
Thinking: ‘They did wrong to me, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are doing wrong to me …’ …
‘They will do wrong to me …’ …
‘They did wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They are doing wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They will do wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike …’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike …’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
What nine things are hard to comprehend?
Nine kinds of diversity.
Diversity of elements gives rise to diversity of contacts. Diversity of contacts gives rise to diversity of feelings. Diversity of feelings gives rise to diversity of perceptions. Diversity of perceptions gives rise to diversity of intentions. Diversity of intentions gives rise to diversity of desires. Diversity of desires gives rise to diversity of passions. Diversity of passions gives rise to diversity of searches. Diversity of searches gives rise to diversity of gains.
What nine things should be produced?
Nine perceptions:
the perceptions of ugliness, death, repulsiveness in food, dissatisfaction with the whole world, impermanence, suffering in impermanence, not-self in suffering, giving up, and fading away.
What nine things should be directly known?
Nine progressive meditations.
A mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption …
second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
What nine things should be realized?
Nine progressive cessations.
For someone who has attained the first absorption, sensual perceptions have ceased.
For someone who has attained the second absorption, the placing of the mind and keeping it connected have ceased.
For someone who has attained the third absorption, rapture has ceased.
For someone who has attained the fourth absorption, breathing has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite space, the perception of form has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite consciousness, the perception of the dimension of infinite space has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of nothingness, the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, the perception of the dimension of nothingness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
So these ninety things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.
Groups of Ten
Ten things are helpful, ten things should be developed, ten things should be completely understood, ten things should be given up, ten things make things worse, ten things lead to distinction, ten things are hard to comprehend, ten things should be produced, ten things should be directly known, ten things should be realized.
What ten things are helpful?
Ten qualities that serve as protector.
First, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is learned.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is easy to admonish, having qualities that make them easy to admonish. They’re patient, and take instruction respectfully.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is deft and tireless in a diverse spectrum of duties for their spiritual companions, understanding how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant loves the teachings and is a delight to converse with, being full of joy in the teaching and training.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is content with any kind of robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is energetic.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is mindful. They have utmost mindfulness and alertness, and can remember and recall what was said and done long ago.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
What ten things should be developed?
Ten universal dimensions of meditation.
Someone perceives the meditation on universal earth above, below, across, non-dual and limitless.
They perceive the meditation on universal water …
the meditation on universal fire …
the meditation on universal air …
the meditation on universal blue …
the meditation on universal yellow …
the meditation on universal red …
the meditation on universal white …
the meditation on universal space …
They perceive the meditation on universal consciousness above, below, across, non-dual and limitless.
What ten things should be completely understood?
Ten sense fields:
eye and sights, ear and sounds, nose and smells, tongue and tastes, body and touches.
What ten things should be given up?
Ten wrong ways:
wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong immersion, wrong knowledge, and wrong freedom.
What ten things make things worse?
Ten ways of doing unskillful deeds:
killing living creatures, stealing, and sexual misconduct; speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; covetousness, ill will, and wrong view.
What ten things lead to distinction?
Ten ways of doing skillful deeds:
refraining from killing living creatures, stealing, and sexual misconduct; avoiding speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; contentment, good will, and right view.
What ten things are hard to comprehend?
Ten noble abodes.
A mendicant has given up five factors, possesses six factors, has a single guard, has four supports, has eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth, has totally given up searching, has unsullied intentions, has stilled the physical process, and is well freed in mind and well freed by wisdom.
And how has a mendicant given up five factors?
It’s when a mendicant has given up sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
That’s how a mendicant has given up five factors.
And how does a mendicant possess six factors?
A mendicant, seeing a sight with their eyes, is neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
Hearing a sound with their ears …
Smelling an odor with their nose …
Tasting a flavor with their tongue …
Feeling a touch with their body …
Knowing a thought with their mind, they’re neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
That’s how a mendicant possesses six factors.
And how does a mendicant have a single guard?
It’s when a mendicant’s heart is guarded by mindfulness.
That’s how a mendicant has a single guard.
And how does a mendicant have four supports?
After appraisal, a mendicant uses some things, endures some things, avoids some things, and gets rid of some things.
That’s how a mendicant has four supports.
And how has a mendicant eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth?
Different ascetics and brahmins have different idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth. A mendicant has dispelled, eliminated, thrown out, rejected, let go of, given up, and relinquished all these.
That’s how a mendicant has eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth.
And how has a mendicant totally given up searching?
It’s when they’ve given up searching for sensual pleasures, for continued existence, and for a spiritual path.
That’s how a mendicant has totally given up searching.
And how does a mendicant have unsullied intentions?
It’s when they’ve given up sensual, malicious, and cruel intentions.
That’s how a mendicant has unsullied intentions.
And how has a mendicant stilled the physical process?
Giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
That’s how a mendicant has stilled the physical process.
And how is a mendicant well freed in mind?
It’s when a mendicant’s mind is freed from greed, hate, and delusion.
That’s how a mendicant is well freed in mind.
And how is a mendicant well freed by wisdom?
It’s when a mendicant understands: ‘I’ve given up greed, hate, and delusion, cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so they’re unable to arise in the future.’
That’s how a mendicant’s mind is well freed by wisdom.
What ten things should be produced?
Ten perceptions:
the perceptions of ugliness, death, repulsiveness in food, dissatisfaction with the whole world, impermanence, suffering in impermanence, not-self in suffering, giving up, fading away, and cessation.
What ten things should be directly known?
Ten grounds for wearing away.
For one of right view, wrong view is worn away.
And the many bad, unskillful qualities that arise because of wrong view are worn away.
For one of right intention, wrong intention is worn away. …
For one of right speech, wrong speech is worn away. …
For one of right action, wrong action is worn away. …
For one of right livelihood, wrong livelihood is worn away. …
For one of right effort, wrong effort is worn away. …
For one of right mindfulness, wrong mindfulness is worn away. …
For one of right immersion, wrong immersion is worn away. …
For one of right knowledge, wrong knowledge is worn away. …
For one of right freedom, wrong freedom is worn away.
And the many bad, unskillful qualities that arise because of wrong freedom are worn away.
What ten things should be realized?
Ten qualities of an adept:
an adept’s right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right immersion, right knowledge, and right freedom.
So these hundred things that are true, real, and accurate, not unreal, not otherwise were rightly awakened to by the Realized One.”
This is what Venerable Sāriputta said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what Sāriputta said.
The Long Discourses are completed.
Long Discourses
Reciting in Concert
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Mallas together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants when he arrived at a Mallian town named Pāvā.
There he stayed in Cunda the smith’s mango grove.
Now at that time a new town hall named Ubbhaṭaka had recently been constructed for the Mallas of Pāvā. It had not yet been occupied by an ascetic or brahmin or any person at all.
The Mallas of Pāvā also heard that the Buddha had arrived and was staying in Cunda’s mango grove.
Then they went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, a new town hall named Ubbhaṭaka has recently been constructed for the Mallas of Pāvā. It has not yet been occupied by an ascetic or brahmin or any person at all.
May the Buddha be the first to use it, and only then will the Mallas of Pāvā use it.
That would be for the lasting welfare and happiness of the Mallas of Pāvā.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, the Mallas got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right. Then they went to the new town hall, where they spread carpets all over, prepared seats, set up a water jar, and placed a lamp. Then they went back to the Buddha,
bowed, stood to one side,
and told him of their preparations, saying,
“Please, sir, come at your convenience.”
Then the Buddha robed up and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the new town hall together with the Saṅgha of mendicants. Having washed his feet he entered the town hall and sat against the central column facing east.
The Saṅgha of mendicants also washed their feet, entered the town hall, and sat against the west wall facing east, with the Buddha right in front of them.
The Mallas of Pāvā also washed their feet, entered the town hall, and sat against the east wall facing west, with the Buddha right in front of them.
The Buddha spent most of the night educating, encouraging, firing up, and inspiring the Mallas with a Dhamma talk. Then he dismissed them,
“The night is getting late, Vāseṭṭhas.
Please go at your convenience.”
“Yes, sir,” replied the Mallas. They got up from their seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right, before leaving.
Soon after they left, the Buddha looked around the Saṅgha of monks, who were so very silent. He addressed Venerable Sāriputta,
“Sāriputta, the Saṅgha of mendicants is rid of dullness and drowsiness.
Give them some Dhamma talk as you feel inspired.
My back is sore,
I’ll stretch it.”
“Yes, sir,” Sāriputta replied.
And then the Buddha spread out his outer robe folded in four and laid down in the lion’s posture—on the right side, placing one foot on top of the other—mindful and aware, and focused on the time of getting up.
Now at that time the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta had recently passed away at Pāvā.
With his passing the Jain ascetics split, dividing into two factions, arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words:
“You don’t understand this teaching and training.
I understand this teaching and training.
What, you understand this teaching and training? You’re practicing wrong.
I’m practicing right.
I stay on topic, you don’t. You said last what you should have said first. You said first what you should have said last. What you’ve thought so much about has been disproved. Your doctrine is refuted. Go on, save your doctrine! You’re trapped; get yourself out of this—if you can!”
You’d think there was nothing but slaughter going on among the Jain ascetics.
And the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta’s white-clothed lay disciples were disillusioned, dismayed, and disappointed in the Jain ascetics. They were equally disappointed with a teaching and training so poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha, with broken monument and without a refuge.
Then Sāriputta told the mendicants about these things. He went on to say,
“That’s what happens, reverends, when a teaching and training is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
But this teaching is well explained and well propounded to us by the Blessed One, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
You should all recite this in concert, without disputing, so that this spiritual path may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
And what is that teaching?
There are teachings grouped by one that have been rightly explained by the Blessed One, who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert, without disputing, so that this spiritual path may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
What are the teachings grouped by one?
‘All sentient beings are sustained by food.’
‘All sentient beings are sustained by conditions.’
These are the teachings grouped by one that have been rightly explained by the Blessed One, who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert, without disputing, so that this spiritual path may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
There are teachings grouped by two that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by two?
Name and form.
Ignorance and craving for continued existence.
Views favoring continued existence and views favoring ending existence.
Lack of conscience and prudence.
Conscience and prudence.
Being hard to admonish and having bad friends.
Being easy to admonish and having good friends.
Skill in offenses and skill in rehabilitation from offenses.
Skill in meditative attainments and skill in emerging from those attainments.
Skill in the elements and skill in attention.
Skill in the sense fields and skill in dependent origination.
Skill in what is possible and skill in what is impossible.
Integrity and scrupulousness.
Patience and gentleness.
Friendliness and hospitality.
Harmlessness and purity.
Lack of mindfulness and lack of situational awareness.
Mindfulness and situational awareness.
Not guarding the sense doors and eating too much.
Guarding the sense doors and moderation in eating.
The power of reflection and the power of development.
The power of mindfulness and the power of immersion.
Serenity and discernment.
The foundation of serenity and the foundation of exertion.
Exertion, and not being distracted.
Failure in ethics and failure in view.
Accomplishment in ethics and accomplishment in view.
Purification of ethics and purification of view.
Purification of view and making an effort in line with that view.
Inspiration, and making a suitable effort when inspired by inspiring places.
To never be content with skillful qualities, and to never stop trying.
Knowledge and freedom.
Knowledge of ending and knowledge of non-arising.
These are the teachings grouped by two that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by three that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by three?
Three unskillful roots:
greed, hate, and delusion.
Three skillful roots:
non-greed, non-hate, and non-delusion.
Three ways of performing bad conduct:
by body, speech, and mind.
Three ways of performing good conduct:
by body, speech, and mind.
Three unskillful thoughts:
sensuality, malice, and cruelty.
Three skillful thoughts:
renunciation, good will, and harmlessness.
Three unskillful intentions:
sensuality, malice, and cruelty.
Three skillful intentions:
renunciation, good will, and harmlessness.
Three unskillful perceptions:
sensuality, malice, and cruelty.
Three skillful perceptions:
renunciation, good will, and harmlessness.
Three unskillful elements:
sensuality, malice, and cruelty.
Three skillful elements:
renunciation, good will, and harmlessness.
Another three elements:
sensuality, form, and formlessness.
Another three elements:
form, formlessness, and cessation.
Another three elements:
lower, middle, and higher.
Three cravings:
for sensual pleasures, to continue existence, and to end existence.
Another three cravings:
sensuality, form, and formlessness.
Another three cravings:
form, formlessness, and cessation.
Three fetters:
identity view, doubt, and misapprehension of precepts and observances.
Three defilements:
sensuality, desire for continued existence, and ignorance.
Three realms of existence:
sensual, form, and formless.
Three searches:
for sensual pleasures, for continued existence, and for a spiritual path.
Three kinds of discrimination:
‘I’m better’, ‘I’m equal’, and ‘I’m worse’.
Three periods:
past, future, and present.
identity, the origin of identity, and the cessation of identity.
Three feelings:
pleasure, pain, and neutral.
Three forms of suffering:
the suffering inherent in painful feeling, the suffering inherent in conditions, and the suffering inherent in perishing.
inevitability regarding the wrong way, inevitability regarding the right way, and lack of inevitability.
one is doubtful, uncertain, undecided, and lacking confidence about the past, future, and present.
Three things a Realized One need not hide.
The Realized One’s behavior by way of body, speech, and mind is pure. He has no misconduct in these three ways that need be hidden, thinking:
‘May others not know this of me.’
Three possessions:
greed, hate, and delusion.
greed, hate, and delusion.
Another three fires:
a fire for those worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, a fire for householders, and a fire for those worthy of a religious donation.
A threefold classification of the physical:
visible and resistant, invisible and resistant, and invisible and non-resistant.
Three choices:
good choices, bad choices, and imperturbable choices.
Three individuals:
a trainee, an adept, and one who is neither a trainee nor an adept.
Three seniors:
a senior by birth, a senior in the teaching, and a senior by convention.
Three grounds for making merit:
giving, ethical conduct, and meditation.
Three grounds for accusations:
what is seen, heard, and suspected.
Three kinds of sensual rebirth.
There are sentient beings who desire what is present. They fall under the sway of presently arisen sensual pleasures. Namely, humans, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first kind of sensual rebirth.
There are sentient beings who desire to create. Having repeatedly created, they fall under the sway of sensual pleasures. Namely, the Gods Who Love to Create.
This is the second kind of sensual rebirth.
There are sentient beings who desire what is created by others. They fall under the sway of sensual pleasures created by others. Namely, the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others.
This is the third kind of sensual rebirth.
Three kinds of pleasant rebirth.
There are sentient beings who, having repeatedly given rise to it, dwell in pleasure. Namely, the gods of Brahmā’s Host.
This is the first pleasant rebirth.
There are sentient beings who are drenched, steeped, filled, and soaked with pleasure.
Every so often they feel inspired to exclaim:
‘Oh, what bliss! Oh, what bliss!’ Namely, the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the second pleasant rebirth.
There are sentient beings who are drenched, steeped, filled, and soaked with pleasure.
Since they’re truly content, they experience pleasure. Namely, the gods replete with glory.
This is the third pleasant rebirth.
Three kinds of wisdom:
the wisdom of a trainee, the wisdom of an adept, and the wisdom of one who is neither a trainee nor an adept.
Another three kinds of wisdom:
wisdom produced by thought, learning, and meditation.
Three weapons:
learning, seclusion, and wisdom.
Three faculties:
the faculty of understanding that one’s enlightenment is imminent, the faculty of enlightenment, and the faculty of one who is enlightened.
Three eyes:
the eye of the flesh, the eye of clairvoyance, and the eye of wisdom.
Three trainings:
in higher ethics, higher mind, and higher wisdom.
Three kinds of development:
the development of physical endurance, the development of the mind, and the development of wisdom.
Three unsurpassable things:
unsurpassable seeing, practice, and freedom.
Three kinds of immersion.
Immersion with placing the mind and keeping it connected. Immersion without placing the mind, but just keeping it connected. Immersion without placing the mind or keeping it connected.
Another three kinds of immersion:
emptiness, signless, and undirected.
Three purities:
purity of body, speech, and mind.
Three kinds of sagacity:
sagacity of body, speech, and mind.
Three skills:
skill in progress, skill in regress, and skill in means.
the vanity of health, the vanity of youth, and the vanity of life.
Three ways of putting something in charge:
putting oneself, the world, or the teaching in charge.
Three topics of discussion.
You might discuss the past:
‘That is how it was in the past.’
You might discuss the future:
‘That is how it will be in the future.’
Or you might discuss the present:
‘This is how it is at present.’
Three knowledges:
recollection of past lives, knowledge of the death and rebirth of sentient beings, and knowledge of the ending of defilements.
Three meditative abidings:
the meditation of the gods, the meditation of Brahmā, and the meditation of the noble ones.
Three demonstrations:
a demonstration of psychic power, a demonstration of revealing, and an instructional demonstration.
These are the teachings grouped by three that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by four that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by four?
Four kinds of mindfulness meditation.
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
Four right efforts.
A mendicant generates enthusiasm, tries, makes an effort, exerts the mind, and strives so that bad, unskillful qualities don’t arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen are given up.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities arise.
They generate enthusiasm, try, make an effort, exert the mind, and strive so that skillful qualities that have arisen remain, are not lost, but increase, mature, and are completed by development.
Four bases of psychic power.
A mendicant develops the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort.
Four absorptions.
A mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
And with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
Giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
Four ways of developing immersion further.
There is a way of developing immersion further that leads to blissful meditation in the present life.
There is a way of developing immersion further that leads to gaining knowledge and vision.
There is a way of developing immersion further that leads to mindfulness and awareness.
There is a way of developing immersion further that leads to the ending of defilements.
And what is the way of developing immersion further that leads to blissful meditation in the present life?
It’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption …
fourth absorption.
This is the way of developing immersion further that leads to blissful meditation in the present life.
And what is the way of developing immersion further that leads to gaining knowledge and vision?
A mendicant focuses on the perception of light, concentrating on the perception of day regardless of whether it is night or day.
And so, with an open and unenveloped heart, they develop a mind that’s full of radiance.
This is the way of developing immersion further that leads to gaining knowledge and vision.
And what is the way of developing immersion further that leads to mindfulness and awareness?
A mendicant knows feelings as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
They know perceptions as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
They know thoughts as they arise, as they remain, and as they go away.
This is the way of developing immersion further that leads to mindfulness and awareness.
And what is the way of developing immersion further that leads to the ending of defilements?
A mendicant meditates observing rise and fall in the five grasping aggregates.
‘Such is form, such is the origin of form, such is the ending of form.
Such are feelings …
perceptions …
consciousness, such is the origin of consciousness, such is the ending of consciousness.’
This is the way of developing immersion further that leads to the ending of defilements.
Four immeasurables.
A mendicant meditates spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
They meditate spreading a heart full of compassion …
rejoicing …
equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
Four formless states.
A mendicant, going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, enters and remains in the dimension of infinite space.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Four supports.
After appraisal, a mendicant uses some things, endures some things, avoids some things, and gets rid of some things.
Four noble traditions.
A mendicant is content with any kind of robe, and praises such contentment. They don’t try to get hold of a robe in an improper way. They don’t get upset if they don’t get a robe. And if they do get a robe, they use it untied, uninfatuated, unattached, seeing the drawback, and understanding the escape. And on account of that they don’t glorify themselves or put others down.
A mendicant who is deft, tireless, aware, and mindful in this is said to stand in the ancient, primordial noble tradition.
Furthermore, a mendicant is content with any kind of alms-food …
Furthermore, a mendicant is content with any kind of lodgings …
Furthermore, a mendicant enjoys giving up and loves to give up. They enjoy meditation and love to meditate. But they don’t glorify themselves or put down others on account of their love for giving up and meditation.
A mendicant who is deft, tireless, aware, and mindful in this is said to stand in the ancient, primordial noble tradition.
Four efforts.
The efforts to restrain, to give up, to develop, and to preserve.
And what is the effort to restrain?
When a mendicant sees a sight with their eyes, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of sight were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of sight, and achieving its restraint.
When they hear a sound with their ears …
When they smell an odor with their nose …
When they taste a flavor with their tongue …
When they feel a touch with their body …
When they know a thought with their mind, they don’t get caught up in the features and details.
If the faculty of mind were left unrestrained, bad unskillful qualities of desire and aversion would become overwhelming. For this reason, they practice restraint, protecting the faculty of mind, and achieving its restraint.
This is called the effort to restrain.
And what is the effort to give up?
It’s when a mendicant doesn’t tolerate a sensual,
malicious,
or cruel thought that’s arisen, but gives it up, gets rid of it, eliminates it, and obliterates it.
They don’t tolerate any bad, unskillful qualities that have arisen, but give them up, get rid of them, eliminate them, and obliterate them.
This is called the effort to give up.
And what is the effort to develop?
It’s when a mendicant develops the awakening factors of mindfulness,
investigation of principles,
tranquility,
immersion,
and equanimity, which rely on seclusion, fading away, and cessation, and ripen as letting go.
This is called the effort to develop.
And what is the effort to preserve?
It’s when a mendicant preserves a meditation subject that’s a fine foundation of immersion: the perception of a skeleton, a worm-infested corpse, a livid corpse, a split open corpse, or a bloated corpse.
This is called the effort to preserve.
Four knowledges:
knowledge of the present phenomena, inferential knowledge, knowledge of others’ minds, and conventional knowledge.
Another four knowledges:
knowing about suffering, the origin of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.
Four factors of stream-entry:
associating with good people, listening to the true teaching, proper attention, and practicing in line with the teaching.
Four factors of a stream-enterer.
A noble disciple has experiential confidence in the Buddha:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They have experiential confidence in the teaching:
‘The teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.’
They have experiential confidence in the Saṅgha:
‘The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is practicing the way that’s good, direct, methodical, and proper. It consists of the four pairs, the eight individuals. This is the Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples that is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.’
And a noble disciple’s ethical conduct is loved by the noble ones, unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
Four fruits of the ascetic life:
stream-entry, once-return, non-return, and perfection.
Four elements:
earth, water, fire, and air.
Four foods:
solid food, whether coarse or fine; contact is the second, mental intention the third, and consciousness the fourth.
Four bases for consciousness to remain.
As long as consciousness remains, it remains involved with form, supported by form, founded on form. And with a sprinkle of relishing, it grows, increases, and matures.
Or consciousness remains involved with feeling …
Or consciousness remains involved with perception …
Or as long as consciousness remains, it remains involved with choices, supported by choices, grounded on choices. And with a sprinkle of relishing, it grows, increases, and matures.
Four prejudices:
making decisions prejudiced by favoritism, hostility, stupidity, and cowardice.
Four things that give rise to craving.
Craving arises in a mendicant for the sake of robes,
alms-food,
or rebirth in this or that state.
Four ways of practice:
painful practice with slow insight, painful practice with swift insight, pleasant practice with slow insight, and pleasant practice with swift insight.
Another four ways of practice:
impatient practice, patient practice, taming practice, and calming practice.
Four basic principles:
contentment, good will, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
Four ways of taking up practices.
There is a way of taking up practices that is painful now and results in future pain.
There is a way of taking up practices that is painful now but results in future pleasure.
There is a way of taking up practices that is pleasant now but results in future pain.
There is a way of taking up practices that is pleasant now and results in future pleasure.
Four spectrums of the teaching:
ethics, immersion, wisdom, and freedom.
Four powers:
energy, mindfulness, immersion, and wisdom.
Four foundations:
the foundations of wisdom, truth, generosity, and peace.
Four ways of answering questions.
There is a question that should be answered definitively. There is a question that should be answered analytically. There is a question that should be answered with a counter-question. There is a question that should be set aside.
Four deeds.
There are deeds that are dark with dark result.
There are deeds that are bright with bright result.
There are deeds that are dark and bright with dark and bright result.
There are neither dark nor bright deeds with neither dark nor bright results, which lead to the end of deeds.
Four things to be realized.
Past lives are to be realized with recollection.
The passing away and rebirth of sentient beings is to be realized with vision.
The eight liberations are to be realized with direct meditative experience.
The ending of defilements is to be realized with wisdom.
Four floods:
sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
Four bonds:
sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
Four detachments:
detachment from the bonds of sensuality, desire for rebirth, views, and ignorance.
Four ties:
the personal ties to covetousness, ill will, misapprehension of precepts and observances, and the insistence that this is the only truth.
Four kinds of grasping:
grasping at sensual pleasures, views, precepts and observances, and theories of a self.
Four kinds of reproduction:
reproduction for creatures born from an egg, from a womb, from moisture, or spontaneously.
Four kinds of conception.
Someone is unaware when conceived in their mother’s womb, unaware as they remain there, and unaware as they emerge. This is the first kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, but unaware as they remain there, and unaware as they emerge. This is the second kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, aware as they remain there, but unaware as they emerge. This is the third kind of conception.
Furthermore, someone is aware when conceived in their mother’s womb, aware as they remain there, and aware as they emerge. This is the fourth kind of conception.
Four kinds of reincarnation.
There is a reincarnation where only one’s own intention is effective, not that of others.
There is a reincarnation where only the intention of others is effective, not one’s own.
There is a reincarnation where both one’s own and others’ intentions are effective.
There is a reincarnation where neither one’s own nor others’ intentions are effective.
Four ways of purifying a religious donation.
There’s a religious donation that’s purified by the giver, not the recipient.
There’s a religious donation that’s purified by the recipient, not the giver.
There’s a religious donation that’s purified by neither the giver nor the recipient.
There’s a religious donation that’s purified by both the giver and the recipient.
Four ways of being inclusive:
giving, kindly words, taking care, and equality.
Four ignoble expressions:
speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical.
Four noble expressions:
refraining from speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical.
Another four ignoble expressions:
saying you’ve seen, heard, thought, or known something, but you haven’t.
Another four noble expressions:
saying you haven’t seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you haven’t.
Another four ignoble expressions:
saying you haven’t seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you have.
Another four noble expressions:
saying you’ve seen, heard, thought, or known something, and you have.
Four persons.
One person mortifies themselves, committed to the practice of mortifying themselves.
One person mortifies others, committed to the practice of mortifying others.
One person mortifies themselves and others, committed to the practice of mortifying themselves and others.
One person doesn’t mortify either themselves or others, committed to the practice of not mortifying themselves or others.
They live without wishes in the present life, extinguished, cooled, experiencing bliss, having become holy in themselves.
Another four persons.
One person practices to benefit themselves, but not others.
One person practices to benefit others, but not themselves.
One person practices to benefit neither themselves nor others.
One person practices to benefit both themselves and others.
Another four persons:
the dark bound for darkness, the dark bound for light, the light bound for darkness, and the light bound for light.
Another four persons:
the confirmed ascetic, the white lotus ascetic, the pink lotus ascetic, and the exquisite ascetic of ascetics.
These are the teachings grouped by four that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
The first recitation section is finished.
There are teachings grouped by five that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by five?
Five aggregates:
form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness.
Five grasping aggregates:
form, feeling, perception, choices, and consciousness.
Five kinds of sensual stimulation.
Sights known by the eye that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Sounds known by the ear …
Smells known by the nose …
Tastes known by the tongue …
Touches known by the body that are likable, desirable, agreeable, pleasant, sensual, and arousing.
Five destinations:
hell, the animal realm, the ghost realm, humanity, and the gods.
Five kinds of stinginess:
stinginess with dwellings, families, material possessions, praise, and the teachings.
Five hindrances:
sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
Five lower fetters:
identity view, doubt, misapprehension of precepts and observances, sensual desire, and ill will.
Five higher fetters:
desire for rebirth in the realm of luminous form, desire for rebirth in the formless realm, conceit, restlessness, and ignorance.
Five precepts:
refraining from killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and drinking alcohol, which is a basis for negligence.
Five things that can’t be done.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately take the life of a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person.
Five losses:
loss of relatives, wealth, health, ethics, and view.
It is not because of loss of relatives, wealth, or health that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
It is because of loss of ethics or view that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
Five endowments:
endowment with relatives, wealth, health, ethics, and view.
It is not because of endowment with family, wealth, or health that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
It is because of endowment with ethics or view that sentient beings, when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
Five drawbacks for an unethical person because of their failure in ethics.
Firstly, an unethical person loses substantial wealth on account of negligence.
This is the first drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person gets a bad reputation.
This is the second drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person enters any kind of assembly timid and embarrassed, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person feels lost when they die.
This is the fourth drawback.
Furthermore, an unethical person, when their body breaks up, after death, is reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
This is the fifth drawback.
Five benefits for an ethical person because of their accomplishment in ethics.
Firstly, an ethical person gains substantial wealth on account of diligence.
This is the first benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person gets a good reputation.
This is the second benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person enters any kind of assembly bold and self-assured, whether it’s an assembly of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, or ascetics.
This is the third benefit.
Furthermore, an ethical person dies not feeling lost.
This is the fourth benefit.
Furthermore, when an ethical person’s body breaks up, after death, they’re reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
This is the fifth benefit.
A mendicant who wants to accuse another should first establish five things in themselves.
I will speak at the right time, not at the wrong time.
I will speak truthfully, not falsely.
I will speak gently, not harshly.
I will speak beneficially, not harmfully.
I will speak lovingly, not from secret hate.
A mendicant who wants to accuse another should first establish these five things in themselves.
Five factors that support meditation.
A mendicant has faith in the Realized One’s awakening:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They are rarely ill or unwell. Their stomach digests well, being neither too hot nor too cold, but just right, and fit for meditation.
They’re not devious or deceitful. They reveal themselves honestly to the Teacher or sensible spiritual companions.
They live with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They’re strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
They’re wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
Five pure abodes:
Aviha, Atappa, the Gods Fair to See, the Fair Seeing Gods, and Akaniṭṭha.
Five non-returners:
one who is extinguished between one life and the next, one who is extinguished upon landing, one who is extinguished without extra effort, one who is extinguished with extra effort, and one who heads upstream, going to the Akaniṭṭha realm.
Five kinds of emotional barrenness.
Firstly, a mendicant has doubts about the Teacher. They’re uncertain, undecided, and lacking confidence.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving. This is the first kind of emotional barrenness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has doubts about the teaching …
the Saṅgha …
the training …
A mendicant is angry and upset with their spiritual companions, resentful and closed off.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving. This is the fifth kind of emotional barrenness.
Five emotional shackles.
Firstly, a mendicant isn’t free of greed, desire, fondness, thirst, passion, and craving for sensual pleasures.
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the first emotional shackle.
Furthermore, a mendicant isn’t free of greed for the body …
They’re not free of greed for form …
They eat as much as they like until their bellies are full, then indulge in the pleasures of sleeping, lying, and drowsing …
They lead the spiritual life hoping to be reborn in one of the orders of gods, thinking:
‘By this precept or observance or mortification or spiritual life, may I become one of the gods!’
This being so, their mind doesn’t incline toward keenness, commitment, persistence, and striving.
This is the fifth emotional shackle.
Five faculties:
eye, ear, nose, tongue, and body.
Another five faculties:
pleasure, pain, happiness, sadness, and equanimity.
Another five faculties:
faith, energy, mindfulness, immersion, and wisdom.
Five elements of escape.
Take a case where a mendicant focuses on sensual pleasures, but their mind isn’t eager, confident, settled, and decided about them.
But when they focus on renunciation, their mind is eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
Their mind is in a good state, well developed, well risen, well freed, and well detached from sensual pleasures.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of sensual pleasures, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from sensual pleasures is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on ill will, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on good will, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from ill will.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of ill will, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from ill will is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on harming, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on compassion, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from harming.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of harming, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from harming is explained.
Take another case where a mendicant focuses on form, but their mind isn’t eager …
But when they focus on the formless, their mind is eager …
Their mind is in a good state … well detached from forms.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of form, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from forms is explained.
Take a case where a mendicant focuses on identity, but their mind isn’t eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
But when they focus on the ending of identity, their mind is eager, confident, settled, and decided about it.
Their mind is in a good state, well developed, well risen, well freed, and well detached from identity.
They’re freed from the distressing and feverish defilements that arise because of identity, so they don’t experience that kind of feeling.
This is how the escape from identity is explained.
Five opportunities for freedom.
Firstly, the Teacher or a respected spiritual companion teaches Dhamma to a mendicant.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how the Teacher or a respected spiritual companion teaches it.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the first opportunity for freedom.
Furthermore, it may be that neither the Teacher nor a respected spiritual companion teaches Dhamma to a mendicant. But the mendicant teaches Dhamma in detail to others as they learned and memorized it. …
Or the mendicant recites the teaching in detail as they learned and memorized it. …
Or the mendicant thinks about and considers the teaching in their heart, examining it with the mind as they learned and memorized it. …
Or a meditation subject as a foundation of immersion is properly grasped, attended, borne in mind, and comprehended with wisdom.
That mendicant feels inspired by the meaning and the teaching in that Dhamma, no matter how a meditation subject as a foundation of immersion is properly grasped, attended, borne in mind, and comprehended with wisdom.
Feeling inspired, joy springs up. Being joyful, rapture springs up. When the mind is full of rapture, the body becomes tranquil. When the body is tranquil, one feels bliss. And when blissful, the mind becomes immersed.
This is the fifth opportunity for freedom.
Five perceptions that ripen in freedom:
the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in impermanence, the perception of not-self in suffering, the perception of giving up, and the perception of fading away.
These are the teachings grouped by five that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by six that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by six?
Six interior sense fields:
eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
Six exterior sense fields:
sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts.
Six classes of consciousness:
eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind consciousness.
Six classes of contact:
contact through the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
Six classes of feeling:
feeling born of contact through the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind.
Six classes of perception:
perceptions of sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts.
Six bodies of intention:
intention regarding sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts.
Six classes of craving:
craving for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts.
Six kinds of disrespect.
A mendicant lacks respect and reverence for the Teacher, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, the training, diligence, and hospitality.
Six kinds of respect.
A mendicant has respect and reverence for the Teacher, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, the training, diligence, and hospitality.
Six preoccupations with happiness.
Seeing a sight with the eye, one is preoccupied with a sight that’s a basis for happiness.
Hearing a sound with the ear …
Smelling an odor with the nose …
Tasting a flavor with the tongue …
Feeling a touch with the body …
Knowing a thought with the mind, one is preoccupied with a thought that’s a basis for happiness.
Six preoccupations with sadness.
Seeing a sight with the eye, one is preoccupied with a sight that’s a basis for sadness. …
Knowing a thought with the mind, one is preoccupied with a thought that’s a basis for sadness.
Six preoccupations with equanimity.
Seeing a sight with the eye, one is preoccupied with a sight that’s a basis for equanimity. …
Knowing a thought with the mind, one is preoccupied with a thought that’s a basis for equanimity.
Six warm-hearted qualities.
Firstly, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with bodily kindness, both in public and in private.
This warm-hearted quality makes for fondness and respect, conducing to inclusion, harmony, and unity, without quarreling.
Furthermore, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with verbal kindness, both in public and in private.
This too is a warm-hearted quality.
Furthermore, a mendicant consistently treats their spiritual companions with mental kindness, both in public and in private.
This too is a warm-hearted quality.
Furthermore, a mendicant shares without reservation any material possessions they have gained by legitimate means, even the food placed in the alms-bowl, using them in common with their ethical spiritual companions.
This too is a warm-hearted quality.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives according to the precepts shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private. Those precepts are unbroken, impeccable, spotless, and unmarred, liberating, praised by sensible people, not mistaken, and leading to immersion.
This too is a warm-hearted quality.
They live according to the view shared with their spiritual companions, both in public and in private. That view is noble and emancipating, and brings one who practices it to the complete ending of suffering.
This warm-hearted quality too makes for fondness and respect, conducing to inclusion, harmony, and unity, without quarreling.
Six roots of arguments.
Firstly, a mendicant is irritable and hostile.
Such a mendicant lacks respect and reverence for the Teacher, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and they don’t fulfill the training.
They create a dispute in the Saṅgha, which is for the hurt and unhappiness of the people, for the harm, hurt, and suffering of gods and humans.
If you see such a root of arguments in yourselves or others, you should try to give up this bad thing.
If you don’t see it, you should practice so that it doesn’t come up in the future.
That’s how to give up this bad root of arguments, so it doesn’t come up in the future.
Furthermore, a mendicant is offensive and contemptuous …
They’re jealous and stingy …
They’re devious and deceitful …
They have wicked desires and wrong view …
They’re attached to their own views, holding them tight, and refusing to let go.
If you see such a root of arguments in yourselves or others, you should try to give up this bad thing.
If you don’t see it, you should practice so that it doesn’t come up in the future.
That’s how to give up this bad root of arguments, so it doesn’t come up in the future.
Six elements:
earth, water, fire, air, space, and consciousness.
Six elements of escape.
Take a mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by love. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow ill will still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! Don’t say that. Don’t misrepresent the Buddha, for misrepresentation of the Buddha is not good. And the Buddha would not say that.
It’s impossible, reverend, it cannot happen that the heart’s release by love has been developed and properly implemented,
yet somehow ill will still occupies the mind.
For it is the heart’s release by love that is the escape from ill will.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by compassion. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow the thought of harming still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by compassion that is the escape from thoughts of harming.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by rejoicing. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow negativity still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by rejoicing that is the escape from negativity.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the heart’s release by equanimity. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow desire still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the heart’s release by equanimity that is the escape from desire.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’ve developed the signless release of the heart. I’ve cultivated it, made it my vehicle and my basis, kept it up, consolidated it, and properly implemented it.
Yet somehow my consciousness still follows after signs.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! …
For it is the signless release of the heart that is the escape from all signs.’
Take another mendicant who says:
‘I’m rid of the conceit “I am”. And I don’t regard anything as “I am this”.
Yet somehow the dart of doubt and indecision still occupies my mind.’
They should be told, ‘Not so, venerable! Don’t say that. Don’t misrepresent the Buddha, for misrepresentation of the Buddha is not good. And the Buddha would not say that.
It’s impossible, reverend, it cannot happen that the conceit “I am” has been done away with, and nothing is regarded as “I am this”,
yet somehow the dart of doubt and indecision still occupy the mind.
For it is the uprooting of the conceit “I am” that is the escape from the dart of doubt and indecision.’
Six unsurpassable things:
the unsurpassable seeing, listening, acquisition, training, service, and recollection.
Six topics for recollection:
the recollection of the Buddha, the teaching, the Saṅgha, ethics, generosity, and the deities.
Six consistent responses.
A mendicant, seeing a sight with their eyes, is neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
Hearing a sound with their ears … Smelling an odor with their nose … Tasting a flavor with their tongue … Feeling a touch with their body …
Knowing a thought with their mind, they’re neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
Six classes of rebirth.
Someone born into a dark class gives rise to a dark result.
Someone born into a dark class gives rise to a bright result.
Someone born into a dark class gives rise to extinguishment, which is neither dark nor bright.
Someone born into a bright class gives rise to a bright result.
Someone born into a bright class gives rise to a dark result.
Someone born into a bright class gives rise to extinguishment, which is neither dark nor bright.
Six perceptions that help penetration:
the perception of impermanence, the perception of suffering in impermanence, the perception of not-self in suffering, the perception of giving up, the perception of fading away, and the perception of cessation.
These are the teachings grouped by six that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by seven that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by seven?
Seven kinds of noble wealth:
the wealth of faith, ethical conduct, conscience, prudence, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
Seven awakening factors:
mindfulness, investigation of principles, energy, rapture, tranquility, immersion, and equanimity.
Seven prerequisites for immersion:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, and right mindfulness.
Seven bad qualities:
a mendicant is faithless, shameless, imprudent, uneducated, lazy, unmindful, and witless.
Seven good qualities:
a mendicant is faithful, conscientious, prudent, learned, energetic, mindful, and wise.
Seven aspects of the teachings of the good persons:
a mendicant knows the teachings, knows the meaning, knows themselves, knows moderation, knows the right time, knows assemblies, and knows people.
Seven qualifications for graduation.
A mendicant has a keen enthusiasm to undertake the training …
to examine the teachings …
to get rid of desires …
for retreat …
to rouse up energy …
for mindfulness and alertness …
to penetrate theoretically. And they don’t lose these desires in the future.
Seven perceptions:
the perception of impermanence, the perception of not-self, the perception of ugliness, the perception of drawbacks, the perception of giving up, the perception of fading away, and the perception of cessation.
Seven powers:
faith, energy, conscience, prudence, mindfulness, immersion, and wisdom.
Seven planes of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fifth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the sixth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the seventh plane of consciousness.
Seven persons worthy of a religious donation:
one freed both ways, one freed by wisdom, a personal witness, one attained to view, one freed by faith, a follower of the teachings, and a follower by faith.
Seven underlying tendencies:
sensual desire, repulsion, views, doubt, conceit, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
Seven fetters:
attraction, repulsion, views, doubt, conceit, desire to be reborn, and ignorance.
Seven principles for the settlement of any disciplinary issues that might arise.
Removal in the presence of those concerned is applicable. Removal by accurate recollection is applicable. Removal due to recovery from madness is applicable. The acknowledgement of the offense is applicable. The decision of a majority is applicable. A verdict of aggravated misconduct is applicable. Covering over with grass is applicable.
These are the teachings grouped by seven that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
The second recitation section is finished.
There are teachings grouped by eight that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by eight?
Eight wrong ways:
wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong immersion.
Eight right ways:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
Eight persons worthy of a religious donation.
The stream-enterer and the one practicing to realize the fruit of stream-entry. The once-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of once-return. The non-returner and the one practicing to realize the fruit of non-return. The perfected one, and the one practicing for perfection.
Eight grounds for laziness.
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do.
They think:
‘I have some work to do. But while doing it my body will get tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work. But while working my body got tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the second ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey. But while walking my body will get tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the third ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey. But while walking my body got tired. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the fourth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is tired and unfit for work. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the fifth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is heavy and unfit for work, like I’ve just eaten a load of beans. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the sixth ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick.
They think:
‘I feel a little sick. Lying down would be good for me. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy…
This is the seventh ground for laziness.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness. My body is weak and unfit for work. I’d better have a lie down.’
They lie down, and don’t rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the eighth ground for laziness.
Eight grounds for arousing energy.
Firstly, a mendicant has some work to do.
They think:
‘I have some work to do. While working it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the first ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has done some work.
They think:
‘I’ve done some work. While I was working I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the second ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has to go on a journey.
They think:
‘I have to go on a journey. While walking it’s not easy to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the third ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has gone on a journey.
They think:
‘I’ve gone on a journey. While I was walking I wasn’t able to focus on the instructions of the Buddhas. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the fourth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, but they didn’t get to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, but I didn’t get to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is light and fit for work. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the fifth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has wandered for alms, and they got to fill up on as much food as they like, rough or fine.
They think:
‘I’ve wandered for alms, and I got to fill up on as much food as I like, rough or fine. My body is strong and fit for work. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the sixth ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant feels a little sick.
They think:
‘I feel a little sick. It’s possible this illness will worsen. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy.’
They rouse up energy…
This is the seventh ground for arousing energy.
Furthermore, a mendicant has recently recovered from illness.
They think:
‘I’ve recently recovered from illness. It’s possible the illness will come back. I’d better preemptively rouse up energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.’
They rouse energy for attaining the unattained, achieving the unachieved, and realizing the unrealized.
This is the eighth ground for arousing energy.
Eight reasons to give.
A person might give a gift after insulting the recipient. Or they give out of fear. Or they give thinking, ‘They gave to me.’ Or they give thinking, ‘They’ll give to me.’ Or they give thinking, ‘It’s good to give.’ Or they give thinking, ‘I cook, they don’t. It wouldn’t be right for me to not give to them.’ Or they give thinking, ‘By giving this gift I’ll get a good reputation.’ Or they give thinking, ‘This is an adornment and requisite for the mind.’
Eight rebirths by giving.
First, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins such things as food, drink, clothing, vehicles; garlands, fragrance, and makeup; and bed, house, and lighting.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
They see an affluent aristocrat or brahmin or householder amusing themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
They think:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of well-to-do aristocrats or brahmins or householders!’
They settle on that thought, concentrate on it and develop it. As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their thought leads to rebirth there.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of the Four Great Kings are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
They think:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods of the Four Great Kings!’
They settle on that thought, concentrate on it and develop it. As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their thought leads to rebirth there.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of the Thirty-Three …
the Gods of Yama …
the Joyful Gods …
the Gods Who Love to Create …
the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
They think:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others!’
They settle on that thought, concentrate on it and develop it. As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their thought leads to rebirth there.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their purity.
Next, someone gives to ascetics or brahmins such things as food, drink, clothing, vehicles; garlands, fragrance, and makeup; and bed, house, and lighting.
Whatever they give, they expect something back.
And they’ve heard:
‘The Gods of Brahmā’s Host are long-lived, beautiful, and very happy.’
They think:
‘If only, when my body breaks up, after death, I would be reborn in the company of the Gods of Brahmā’s Host!’
They settle on that thought, concentrate on it and develop it. As they’ve settled for less and not developed further, their thought leads to rebirth there.
But I say that this is only for those of ethical conduct, not for the unethical.
And for those free of desire, not those with desire.
The heart’s wish of an ethical person succeeds because of their freedom from desire.
Eight assemblies:
the assemblies of aristocrats, brahmins, householders, and ascetics. An assembly of the gods under the Four Great Kings. An assembly of the gods under the Thirty-Three. An assembly of Māras. An assembly of Brahmās.
Eight worldly conditions:
gain and loss, fame and disgrace, praise and blame, pleasure and pain.
Eight dimensions of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the first dimension of mastery.
Perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the second dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limited, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the third dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally, limitless, both pretty and ugly. Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fourth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
They’re like a flax flower that’s blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, blue, with blue color, blue hue, and blue tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the fifth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
They’re like a champak flower that’s yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, yellow, with yellow color, yellow hue, and yellow tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the sixth dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
They’re like a scarlet mallow flower that’s red, with red color, red hue, and red tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, red, with red color, red hue, and red tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the seventh dimension of mastery.
Not perceiving form internally, someone sees visions externally that are white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
They’re like the morning star that’s white, with white color, white hue, and white tint. Or a cloth from Bāraṇasī that’s smoothed on both sides, white, with white color, white hue, and white tint.
Mastering them, they perceive: ‘I know and see.’
This is the eighth dimension of mastery.
Eight liberations.
Having physical form, they see visions.
This is the first liberation.
Not perceiving physical form internally, they see visions externally.
This is the second liberation.
They’re focused only on beauty.
This is the third liberation.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fourth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the fifth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth liberation.
These are the teachings grouped by eight that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by nine that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by nine?
Nine grounds for resentment.
Thinking: ‘They did wrong to me,’ you harbor resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are doing wrong to me’ …
‘They will do wrong to me’ …
‘They did wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They are doing wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They will do wrong by someone I love’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike,’ you harbor resentment.
Nine methods to get rid of resentment.
Thinking: ‘They did wrong to me, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
Thinking: ‘They are doing wrong to me …’ …
‘They will do wrong to me …’ …
‘They did wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They are doing wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They will do wrong by someone I love …’ …
‘They helped someone I dislike …’ …
‘They are helping someone I dislike …’ …
Thinking: ‘They will help someone I dislike, but what can I possibly do?’ you get rid of resentment.
Nine abodes of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that are non-percipient and do not experience anything, such as the gods who are non-percipient beings.
This is the fifth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the sixth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the seventh abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the eighth abode of sentient beings.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of nothingness. They have been reborn in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the ninth abode of sentient beings.
Nine lost opportunities for spiritual practice.
Firstly, a Realized One has arisen in the world. He teaches the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
But a person has been reborn in hell.
This is the first lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the animal realm.
This is the second lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the ghost realm.
This is the third lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn among the demons.
This is the fourth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in one of the long-lived orders of gods.
This is the fifth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But a person has been reborn in the borderlands, among strange barbarian tribes, where monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen do not go.
This is the sixth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
And a person is reborn in a central country.
But they have wrong view and distorted perspective:
‘There’s no meaning in giving, sacrifice, or offerings. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds. There’s no afterlife. There are no duties to mother and father. No beings are reborn spontaneously. And there’s no ascetic or brahmin who is well attained and practiced, and who describes the afterlife after realizing it with their own insight.’
This is the seventh lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
And a person is reborn in a central country.
But they’re witless, dull, stupid, and unable to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the eighth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Furthermore, a Realized One has arisen in the world.
But he doesn’t teach the Dhamma leading to peace, extinguishment, awakening, as proclaimed by the Holy One.
And a person is reborn in a central country. And they’re wise, bright, clever, and able to distinguish what is well said from what is poorly said.
This is the ninth lost opportunity for spiritual practice.
Nine progressive meditations.
A mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
And with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the third absorption, where they meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
Giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
Nine progressive cessations.
For someone who has attained the first absorption, sensual perceptions have ceased.
For someone who has attained the second absorption, the placing of the mind and keeping it connected have ceased.
For someone who has attained the third absorption, rapture has ceased.
For someone who has attained the fourth absorption, breathing has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite space, the perception of form has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of infinite consciousness, the perception of the dimension of infinite space has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of nothingness, the perception of the dimension of infinite consciousness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, the perception of the dimension of nothingness has ceased.
For someone who has attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
These are the teachings grouped by nine that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
There are teachings grouped by ten that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert.
What are the teachings grouped by ten?
Ten qualities that serve as protector.
Firstly, a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places.
Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is very learned, remembering and keeping what they’ve learned.
These teachings are good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased, describing a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure. They are very learned in such teachings, remembering them, reinforcing them by recitation, mentally scrutinizing them, and comprehending them theoretically.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant has good friends, companions, and associates.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is easy to admonish, having qualities that make them easy to admonish. They’re patient, and take instruction respectfully.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is deft and tireless in a diverse spectrum of duties for their spiritual companions, understanding how to go about things in order to complete and organize the work.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant loves the teachings and is a delight to converse with, being full of joy in the teaching and training.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is content with any kind of robes, alms-food, lodgings, and medicines and supplies for the sick.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant lives with energy roused up for giving up unskillful qualities and embracing skillful qualities. They are strong, staunchly vigorous, not slacking off when it comes to developing skillful qualities.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is mindful. They have utmost mindfulness and alertness, and can remember and recall what was said and done long ago.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Furthermore, a mendicant is wise. They have the wisdom of arising and passing away which is noble, penetrative, and leads to the complete ending of suffering.
This too is a quality that serves as protector.
Ten universal dimensions of meditation.
Someone perceives the meditation on universal earth above, below, across, non-dual and limitless.
They perceive the meditation on universal water …
the meditation on universal fire …
the meditation on universal air …
the meditation on universal blue …
the meditation on universal yellow …
the meditation on universal red …
the meditation on universal white …
the meditation on universal space …
They perceive the meditation on universal consciousness above, below, across, non-dual and limitless.
Ten ways of doing unskillful deeds:
killing living creatures, stealing, and sexual misconduct; speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; covetousness, ill will, and wrong view.
Ten ways of doing skillful deeds:
refraining from killing living creatures, stealing, and sexual misconduct; refraining from speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; contentment, good will, and right view.
Ten noble abodes.
A mendicant has given up five factors, possesses six factors, has a single guard, has four supports, has eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth, has totally given up searching, has unsullied intentions, has stilled the physical process, and is well freed in mind and well freed by wisdom.
And how has a mendicant given up five factors?
It’s when a mendicant has given up sensual desire, ill will, dullness and drowsiness, restlessness and remorse, and doubt.
That’s how a mendicant has given up five factors.
And how does a mendicant possess six factors?
A mendicant, seeing a sight with their eyes, is neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
Hearing a sound with their ears … Smelling an odor with their nose … Tasting a flavor with their tongue … Feeling a touch with their body …
Knowing a thought with their mind, they’re neither happy nor sad. They remain equanimous, mindful and aware.
That’s how a mendicant possesses six factors.
And how does a mendicant have a single guard?
It’s when a mendicant’s heart is guarded by mindfulness.
That’s how a mendicant has a single guard.
And how does a mendicant have four supports?
After appraisal, a mendicant uses some things, endures some things, avoids some things, and gets rid of some things.
That’s how a mendicant has four supports.
And how has a mendicant eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth?
Different ascetics and brahmins have different idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth. A mendicant has dispelled, eliminated, thrown out, rejected, let go of, given up, and relinquished all these.
That’s how a mendicant has eliminated idiosyncratic interpretations of the truth.
And how has a mendicant totally given up searching?
It’s when they’ve given up searching for sensual pleasures, for continued existence, and for a spiritual path.
That’s how a mendicant has totally given up searching.
And how does a mendicant have unsullied intentions?
It’s when they’ve given up sensual, malicious, and cruel intentions.
That’s how a mendicant has unsullied intentions.
And how has a mendicant stilled the physical process?
It’s when, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption, without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
That’s how a mendicant has stilled the physical process.
And how is a mendicant well freed in mind?
It’s when a mendicant’s mind is freed from greed, hate, and delusion.
That’s how a mendicant is well freed in mind.
And how is a mendicant well freed by wisdom?
It’s when a mendicant understands: ‘I’ve given up greed, hate, and delusion, cut them off at the root, made them like a palm stump, obliterated them, so they’re unable to arise in the future.’
That’s how a mendicant’s mind is well freed by wisdom.
Ten qualities of an adept:
an adept’s right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right immersion, right knowledge, and right freedom.
Reverends, these are the teachings grouped by ten that have been rightly explained by the Buddha.
You should all recite these in concert, without disputing, so that this spiritual path may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.”
Then the Buddha got up and said to Venerable Sāriputta,
“Good, good, Sāriputta!
It’s good that you’ve taught this exposition of the reciting in concert.”
That is what Venerable Sāriputta said, and the teacher approved.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what Sāriputta said.
Long Discourses
The Marks of a Great Man
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“There are thirty-two marks of a great man. A great man who possesses these has only two possible destinies, no other.
If he stays at home he becomes a king, a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extends to all four sides, he achieves stability in the country, and he possesses the seven treasures.
He has the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He has over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea, he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.
And what are the thirty-two marks?
He has well-planted feet.
On the soles of his feet there are thousand-spoked wheels, with rims and hubs, complete in every detail.
He has projecting heels.
He has long fingers.
His hands and feet are tender.
His hands and feet cling gracefully.
His feet are arched.
His calves are like those of an antelope.
When standing upright and not bending over, the palms of both hands touch the knees.
His private parts are retracted.
He is gold colored; his skin has a golden sheen.
He has delicate skin, so delicate that dust and dirt don’t stick to his body.
His hairs grow one per pore.
His hairs stand up; they’re blue-black and curl clockwise.
His body is as straight as Brahmā’s.
He has bulging muscles in seven places.
His chest is like that of a lion.
The gap between the shoulder-blades is filled in.
He has the proportional circumference of a banyan tree: the span of his arms equals the height of his body.
His torso is cylindrical.
He has an excellent sense of taste.
His jaw is like that of a lion.
He has forty teeth.
His teeth are even.
His teeth have no gaps.
His teeth are perfectly white.
He has a large tongue.
He has the voice of Brahmā, like a cuckoo’s call.
His eyes are deep blue.
He has eyelashes like a cow’s.
Between his eyebrows there grows a tuft, soft and white like cotton-wool.
His head is shaped like a turban.
These are the thirty-two marks of a great man. A great man who possesses these has only two possible destinies, no other.
Seers who are outsiders remember these marks, but they do not know
the specific deeds performed in the past to obtain each mark.
Well-Planted Feet
In some past lives, past existences, past abodes the Realized One was reborn as a human being. He firmly undertook and persisted in skillful behaviors such as good conduct by way of body, speech, and mind, giving and sharing, taking precepts, observing the sabbath, paying due respect to mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, honoring the elders in the family, and various other things pertaining to skillful behaviors.
Due to performing, accumulating, heaping up, and amassing those deeds, when his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
There he surpassed the other gods in ten respects: divine life span, beauty, happiness, glory, sovereignty, sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches.
When he passed away from there and came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark of a great man:
he has well-planted feet.
He places his foot on the ground evenly, raises it evenly, and touches the ground evenly with the whole sole of his foot.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
He has the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He has over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea—free of harassment by bandits, successful and prosperous, safe, blessed, and untroubled—he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
And what does he obtain as king?
He can’t be stopped by any human foe or enemy.
That’s what he obtains as king.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He can’t be stopped by any foe or enemy whether internal or external; nor by greed, hate, or delusion; nor by any ascetic or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or by anyone in the world.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Truth, principle, self-control, and restraint;
purity, precepts, and observing the sabbath;
giving, harmlessness, delighting in non-violence—
firmly undertaking these things, he lived accordingly.
By means of these deeds he went to heaven,
where he enjoyed happiness and merriment.
After passing away from there to here,
he steps evenly on this rich earth.
The gathered soothsayers predicted
that there is no stopping one of such even tread,
as householder or renunciate.
That’s the meaning shown by this mark.
While living at home he cannot be stopped,
he defeats his foes, and cannot be beaten.
Due to the fruit of that deed,
he cannot be stopped by any human.
But if he chooses the life gone forth,
seeing clearly, loving renunciation,
not even the best can hope to stop him;
this is the nature of the supreme person.”
Wheels on the Feet
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He brought happiness to many people, eliminating threats, terror, and danger, providing just protection and security, and giving gifts with all the trimmings.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
on the soles of his feet there are thousand-spoked wheels, with rims and hubs, complete in every detail and well divided inside.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has a large following
of brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a fully awakened Buddha.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has a large following
of monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“In olden days, in past lives,
he brought happiness to many people,
ridding them of fear, terror, and danger,
eagerly guarding and protecting them.
By means of these deeds he went to heaven,
where he enjoyed happiness and merriment.
After passing away from there to here,
wheels on his two feet are found,
all rimmed around and thousand-spoked.
The gathered soothsayers predicted,
seeing the prince with the hundred-fold mark of merits,
that he’d have a following, subduing foes,
which is why he has wheels all rimmed around.
If he doesn’t choose the life gone forth,
he’ll roll the wheel and rule the land.
The aristocrats will be his vassals,
flocking to his glory.
But if he chooses the life gone forth,
seeing clearly, loving renunciation,
the gods, humans, demons, Sakka, and monsters;
fairies and dragons, birds and beasts,
will flock to his glory,
the supreme, honored by gods and humans.”
Projecting Heels, Etc.
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He gave up killing living creatures, renouncing the rod and the sword. He was scrupulous and kind, living full of compassion for all living beings.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these three marks:
he has projecting heels, long fingers, and his body is as straight as Brahmā’s.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He’s long-lived, preserving his life for a long time. No human foe or enemy is able to take his life before his time.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He’s long-lived, preserving his life for a long time. No foes or enemies—nor any ascetic or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or anyone in the world—is able to take his life before his time.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Realizing for himself the horrors of death,
he refrained from killing other creatures.
By that good conduct he went to heaven,
where he enjoyed the fruit of deeds well done.
Passing away, on his return to here,
he obtained these three marks:
his projecting heels are full and long,
and he’s straight, beautiful, and well-formed, like Brahmā.
Fair of limb, youthful, of good posture and breeding,
his fingers are soft and tender and long.
By these three marks of an excellent man,
they indicated that the prince’s life would be long:
‘As a householder he will live long;
longer still if he goes forth, due to
mastery in the development of psychic power.
Thus this is the sign of long life.’”
Seven Bulges
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He was a donor of fine and tasty foods and drinks of all kinds, delicious and scrumptious.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark: he has bulging muscles in seven places.
He has bulges on both hands, both feet, both shoulders, and his chest.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He gets fine and tasty foods and drinks of all kinds, delicious and scrumptious.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He gets fine and tasty foods and drinks of all kinds, delicious and scrumptious.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“He used to give the very best of flavors—
scrumptious foods of every kind.
Because of that good deed,
he rejoiced long in Nandana heaven.
On returning to here, he got seven bulging muscles
and tender hands and feet are found.
The soothsayers expert in signs declared:
‘He’ll get tasty foods of all sorts
as a householder, that’s what that means.
But even if he goes forth he’ll get the same,
supreme in gaining tasty foods of all sorts,
cutting all bonds of the lay life.’”
Tender and Clinging Hands
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He brought people together using the four ways of being inclusive:
giving, kindly words, taking care, and equality.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
his hands and feet are tender, and they cling gracefully.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
His retinue is inclusive, cohesive, and well-managed. This includes brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
His retinue is inclusive, cohesive, and well-managed. This includes monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“By giving and helping others,
kindly speech, and equal treatment,
such action and conduct as brought people together,
he went to heaven due to his esteemed virtue.
Passing away, on his return to here,
the young baby prince obtained
hands and feet so tender and clinging,
lovely, graceful, and good-looking.
His retinue is loyal and manageable,
staying agreeably all over this broad land.
Speaking kindly, desiring happiness,
he practices the good qualities he’s adopted.
But if he gives up all sensual enjoyments,
as victor he speaks Dhamma to the people.
Devoted, they respond to his words;
after listening, they practice in line with the teaching.”
Arched Feet and Upright Hair
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
His speech was meaningful and principled. He educated many people, bringing welfare and happiness, offering the teaching.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
his feet are arched and his hairs stand up.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He is the foremost, best, chief, highest, and finest of those who enjoy sensual pleasures.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He is the foremost, best, chief, highest, and finest of all sentient beings.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“His word was meaningful and principled,
moving the people with his explanations.
He brought welfare and happiness to creatures,
unstintingly offering up teaching.
Because of that good deed,
he advanced to heaven and there rejoiced.
On return to here two marks are found,
of excellence and supremacy.
His hairs stand upright,
and his ankles stand out well.
Swollen with flesh and blood, and wrapped in skin,
they make it pretty above the feet.
If such a one lives in the home,
he turns into the best of those who enjoy sensual pleasures.
There’ll be none better than him;
he’ll live having mastered all India.
But going forth the peerless renunciate
turns into the best of all creatures.
There’ll be none better than him,
he’ll live having mastered the whole world.”
Antelope Calves
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He was a thorough teacher of a profession, a branch of knowledge, conduct, or action, thinking:
‘How might they quickly learn and practice, without getting exhausted?’
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
his calves are like those of an antelope.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He quickly obtains the things worthy of a king, the factors, supports, and things befitting a king.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He quickly obtains the things worthy of an ascetic, the factors, supports, and things befitting an ascetic.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“In professions, knowledge, conduct, and deeds,
he thought of how they might swiftly learn.
Things that harm no-one at all,
he quickly taught so they would not get tired.
Having done that skillful deed whose outcome is happiness,
he gains prominent and elegant calves.
Well-formed in graceful spirals,
he’s covered in fine rising hairs.
They say that person has antelope calves,
and that this is the mark of swift success.
If he desires the things of the household life,
not going forth, they’ll quickly be his.
But if he chooses the life gone forth,
seeing clearly, loving renunciation,
the peerless renunciate will quickly find
what is fitting and suitable.”
Delicate Skin
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He approached an ascetic or brahmin and asked:
‘Sirs, what is skillful? What is unskillful? What is blameworthy? What is blameless? What should be cultivated? What should not be cultivated? Doing what leads to my lasting harm and suffering? Doing what leads to my lasting welfare and happiness?’
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
he has delicate skin, so delicate that dust and dirt don’t stick to his body.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has great wisdom. Of those who enjoy sensual pleasures, none is his equal or better in wisdom.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has great wisdom, widespread wisdom, laughing wisdom, swift wisdom, sharp wisdom, and penetrating wisdom. No sentient being is his equal or better in wisdom.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“In olden days, in past lives,
eager to understand, he asked questions.
Keen to learn, he waited on renunciates,
heeding their explanation with pure intent.
Due to that deed of acquiring wisdom,
as a human being his skin is delicate.
At his birth the soothsayers expert in signs prophesied:
‘He’ll discern delicate matters.’
If he doesn’t choose the life gone forth,
he’ll roll the wheel and rule the land.
Among those with material possessions who have been educated,
none equal or better than him is found.
But if he chooses the life gone forth,
seeing clearly, loving renunciation,
gaining wisdom that’s supreme and eminent,
the one of superb, vast intelligence attains awakening.”
Golden Skin
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He wasn’t irritable or bad-tempered.
Even when heavily criticized he didn’t lose his temper, become annoyed, hostile, and hard-hearted, or display annoyance, hate, and bitterness.
He donated soft and fine mats and blankets, and fine cloths of linen, cotton, silk, and wool.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
he is gold colored; his skin has a golden sheen.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He obtains soft and fine mats and blankets, and fine cloths of linen, cotton, silk, and wool.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He obtains soft and fine mats and blankets, and fine cloths of linen, cotton, silk, and wool.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Dedicated to good will, he gave gifts.
In an earlier life he poured forth cloth
fine and soft to touch,
like a god pouring rain on this broad earth.
So doing he passed from here to heaven,
where he enjoyed the fruits of deeds well done.
Here he wins a figure of gold,
like Indra, the finest of gods.
If that man stays in the house, not wishing to go forth,
he conquers and rules this vast, broad earth.
He obtains abundant excellent cloth,
so fine and soft to touch.
He receives robes, cloth, and the finest garments
if he chooses the life gone forth.
For he still partakes of past deed’s fruit;
what’s been done is never lost.”
Retracted Privates
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He reunited long-lost and long-separated relatives, friends, loved ones, and companions.
He reunited mother with child and child with mother; father with child and child with father; brother with brother, brother with sister, sister with brother, and sister with sister, bringing them together with rejoicing.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
his private parts are retracted.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has many sons, over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has many sons, many thousands of sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“In olden days, in past lives,
he reunited long-lost
and long-separated friends and family,
bringing them together with joy.
By means of these deeds he went to heaven,
where he enjoyed happiness and merriment.
After passing away from there to here,
his private parts are retracted.
Such a one has many sons,
over a thousand descendants,
valiant and heroic, devastating foes,
a layman’s joy, speaking kindly.
But if he lives the renunciate life
he has even more sons following his word.
As householder or renunciate,
that’s the meaning shown by this mark.”
The first recitation section is finished.
Equal Proportions and Touching the Knees
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He regarded the gathered population equally. He knew what they had in common and what was their own. He knew each person, and he knew the distinctions between people.
In each case, he made appropriate distinctions between people: ‘This one deserves that; that one deserves this.’
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
he has the proportional circumference of a banyan tree; and when standing upright and not bending over, the palms of both hands touch the knees.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He is rich, affluent, and wealthy, with lots of gold and silver, lots of property and assets, lots of money and grain, and a full treasury and storehouses.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He is rich, affluent, and wealthy.
He has these kinds of wealth:
the wealth of faith, ethical conduct, conscience, prudence, learning, generosity, and wisdom.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Observing the many people in a community,
he weighed, evaluated, and judged each case:
‘This one deserves that.’
That’s how he used to draw distinctions between people.
Now standing without bending
he can touch his knees with both hands.
With the remaining ripening of the fruit of good deeds,
his circumference was that of a great tree.
Learned experts in the many different
signs and marks prophesied:
‘The young prince will obtain
many different things that householders deserve.
Here there are many suitable pleasures
for the ruler of the land to enjoy as householder.
But if he gives up all sensual enjoyments,
he will gain the supreme, highest peak of wealth.’”
A Lion’s Chest, Etc.
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He desired the good, the welfare, the comfort, and sanctuary of the people, thinking:
‘How might they flourish in faith, ethics, learning, generosity, teachings, and wisdom; in wealth and grain, fields and land, birds and beasts, children and partners; in bondservants, workers, and staff; in family, friends, and kin?’
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these three marks:
his chest is like that of a lion; the gap between the shoulder-blades is filled in; and his torso is cylindrical.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He’s not liable to decline. He doesn’t decline in wealth and grain, fields and land, birds and beasts, children and partners; in bondservants, workers, and staff; in family, friends, and kin. He doesn’t decline in any of his accomplishments.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He’s not liable to decline. He doesn’t decline in faith, ethics, learning, generosity, and wisdom. He doesn’t decline in any of his accomplishments.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“His wish was this: ‘How may others not decline
in faith, ethics, learning, and intelligence,
in generosity, teachings, and much good else,
in coin and corn, fields and lands,
in children, partners, and livestock,
in family, friends, and kin,
in health, and both beauty and happiness?’
And so he ever desired their success.
His chest was full like that of a lion,
his shoulder-gap filled in, and torso cylindrical.
Due to the well-done deeds of the past,
he had that portent of non-decline.
Even as layman he grows in corn and coin,
in wives, children, and livestock.
But once gone forth, owning nothing, he attains
the supreme awakening which may never decline.”
Excellent Sense of Taste
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He would never hurt any sentient being with fists, stones, rods, or swords.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark: he has an excellent sense of taste. Taste-buds are produced in the throat for the tongue-tip and dispersed evenly.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He is rarely ill or unwell. His stomach digests well, being neither too hot nor too cold.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He is rarely ill or unwell. His stomach digests well, being neither too hot nor too cold, but just right, and fit for meditation.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Not with fist or rod or stone,
or sword or beating to death,
or by bondage or threats
did he ever harm anyone.
For that very reason he rejoiced in heaven after passing away,
finding happiness as a fruit of happy deeds.
With taste-buds well formed and even,
on his return here he has an excellent sense of taste.
That’s why the clever visionaries said:
‘This man will have much happiness
as householder or renunciate.
That’s the meaning shown by this mark.’”
Deep Blue Eyes
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
When looking at others he didn’t glare, look askance, or avert his eyes. Being straightforward, he reached out to others with straightforward intentions, looking at people with kindly eyes.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
his eyes are deep blue, and he has eyelashes like a cow’s.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
The people look on him with kindly eyes. He is dear and beloved to the brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
The people look on him with kindly eyes. He is dear and beloved to the monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“With not a glare or glance askance,
nor averting of the eyes;
straightforward, he reached out straightforwardly,
looking at people with kindly eyes.
In good rebirths he enjoyed the fruit
and result, rejoicing there.
But here he has a cow’s eyelashes,
and eyes deep blue so fair to see.
Many soothsayers, men clever
and learned in prognostic texts,
expert in cow-like lashes, indicated he’d
be looked upon with kindly eyes.
Even as a householder he’d be regarded kindly,
beloved of the people.
But if he becomes an ascetic, not lay,
as destroyer of sorrow he’ll be loved by many.”
Head Like a Turban
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He was the leader and forerunner of people in skillful behaviors such as good conduct by way of body, speech, and mind, giving and sharing, taking precepts, observing the sabbath, paying due respect to mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, honoring the elders in the family, and various other things pertaining to skillful behaviors.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
his head is shaped like a turban.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has a large following of brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has a large following of monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Among people of good conduct, he was the leader,
devoted to a life of principle among the principled.
The people followed him,
and he experienced the fruit of good deeds in heaven.
Having experienced that fruit,
he acquires a head shaped like a turban.
The experts in omens and signs prophesied:
‘He will be leader of the people.
Among people then, as before,
they will bring presents for him.
If he becomes an aristocrat, ruler of the land,
he’ll gain the service of the people.
But if that man goes forth,
he’ll be sophisticated, proficient in the teachings.
Devoted to the virtues of his instruction,
the people will become his followers.’”
One Hair Per Pore, and a Tuft
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He refrained from lying. He spoke the truth and stuck to the truth. He was honest and trustworthy, and didn’t trick the world with his words.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
his hairs grow one per pore, and between his eyebrows there grows a tuft, soft and white like cotton-wool.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has many close adherents among the brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has many close adherents among the monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“In past lives he was true to his promise,
with no forked tongue, he shunned lies.
He never broke his word to anyone,
but spoke what was true, real, and factual.
A tuft so very white like cotton-wool
grew prettily between his eyebrows.
And never two, but only one,
hair grew in each of his pores.
Many soothsayers learned in marks
and expert in signs gathered and prophesied:
‘One like this, with tuft and hair so well-formed,
will have many as his close adherents.
Even as householder many people will follow him,
due to the power of deeds in the past.
But once gone forth, owning nothing,
as Buddha the people will follow him.’”
Forty Gapless Teeth
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He refrained from divisive speech.
He didn’t repeat in one place what he heard in another so as to divide people against each other. Instead, he reconciled those who were divided, supporting unity, delighting in harmony, loving harmony, speaking words that promote harmony.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
he has forty teeth, and his teeth have no gaps.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
His retinue cannot be divided. This includes brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
His retinue cannot be divided. This includes monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“He spoke no words divisive causing friends to split,
creating disputes that foster division,
acting improperly by fostering quarrels,
creating division among friends.
He spoke kind words to foster harmony,
uniting those who are divided.
He eliminated quarrels among the people,
rejoicing together with the united.
In good rebirths he enjoyed the fruit
and result, rejoicing there.
Here his teeth are gapless, close together,
forty standing upright in his mouth.
If he becomes an aristocrat, ruler of the land,
his assembly will be indivisible.
And as an ascetic, stainless, immaculate,
his assembly will follow him, unshakable.”
A Large Tongue and the Voice of Brahmā
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He refrained from harsh speech.
He spoke in a way that’s mellow, pleasing to the ear, lovely, going to the heart, polite, likable and agreeable to the people.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks:
he has a large tongue, and the voice of Brahmā, like a cuckoo’s call.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He has a persuasive voice. His words are persuasive to brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He has a persuasive voice. His words are persuasive to monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“He never spoke a loud harsh word,
insulting, quarrelsome,
causing harm, rude, crushing the people.
His speech was sweet, helpful, and kind.
He uttered words dear to the mind,
going to the heart, pleasing to the ear.
He enjoyed the fruit of his good verbal conduct,
experiencing the fruit of good deeds in heaven.
Having experienced that fruit,
on his return to here he acquired the voice of Brahmā.
His tongue was long and wide,
and his speech was persuasive.
Even as householder his speech brings prosperity.
But if that man goes forth,
speaking often to the people,
they’ll be persuaded by his fair words.”
A Lion-Like Jaw
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He refrained from talking nonsense. His words were timely, true, and meaningful, in line with the teaching and training. He said things at the right time which were valuable, reasonable, succinct, and beneficial.
Due to performing those deeds he was reborn in a heavenly realm.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained this mark:
his jaw is like that of a lion.
Possessing this mark, if he stays at home he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
And what does he obtain as king?
He can’t be destroyed by any human foe or enemy.
That’s what he obtains as king.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
He can’t be destroyed by any foe or enemy whether internal or external; nor by greed, hate, or delusion; nor by any ascetic or brahmin or god or Māra or Brahmā or by anyone in the world.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“Neither nonsensical nor silly,
his way of speaking was never loose.
He eliminated what was useless,
and spoke for the welfare and happiness of the people.
So doing he passed from here to be reborn in heaven,
where he enjoyed the fruit of deeds well done.
Passing away, on his return to here,
he gained a jaw like the finest of beasts.
He became a king so very hard to defeat,
a mighty lord and ruler of men.
He was equal to the best in the city of the Three and Thirty,
like Indra, the finest of gods.
One such as that is not easily beaten by fairies,
demons, spirits, monsters, or gods.
If he becomes of such a kind,
he illuminates the quarters and in-between.”
Even and White Teeth
“Mendicants, in some past lives the Realized One was reborn as a human being.
He gave up wrong livelihood and earned a living by right livelihood. He refrained from falsifying weights, metals, or measures; bribery, fraud, cheating, and duplicity; mutilation, murder, abduction, banditry, plunder, and violence.
Due to performing, accumulating, heaping up, and amassing those deeds, when his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
There he surpassed the other gods in ten respects: divine life span, beauty, happiness, glory, sovereignty, sights, sounds, smells, tastes, and touches.
When he came back to this state of existence he obtained these two marks: his teeth are even and perfectly white.
Possessing these marks, if he stays at home he becomes a king, a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extends to all four sides, he achieves stability in the country, and he possesses the seven treasures.
He has the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He has over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea—free of harassment by bandits, successful and prosperous, safe, blessed, and untroubled—he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
And what does he obtain as king?
His retinue is pure. This includes brahmins and householders, people of town and country, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, ministers, counselors, rulers, tax beneficiaries, and princes.
That’s what he obtains as king.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.
And what does he obtain as Buddha?
His retinue is pure. This includes monks, nuns, laymen, laywomen, gods, humans, demons, dragons, and fairies.
That’s what he obtains as Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
On this it is said:
“He abandoned wrong livelihood, and created
a way of life that’s fair, pure, and just.
He eliminated what was useless,
and lived for the welfare and happiness of the people.
Having done what’s praised by the clever, the wise, and the good,
that man experienced the fruit in heaven.
Equal to the best in the heaven of Three and Thirty,
he enjoyed himself with pleasure and play.
From there he passed back to a human life.
With the remaining ripening of the fruit of good deeds,
he obtained teeth that are even,
gleaming, bright, and white.
Many soothsayers regarded as wise men
gathered and predicted of him:
‘With twice-born teeth so even, so white, so clean and bright
his retinue will be so pure.
As king, his people will also be pure,
when he rules having conquered this earth so broad.
They won’t harm the country,
but will live for the welfare and happiness of the people.
But if he goes forth he’ll be an ascetic free of ill,
his passions quelled, the veil drawn back.
Rid of stress and weariness,
he sees this world and the next.
Those who do his bidding, both lay and renunciate,
shake off wickedness, impure and blameworthy.
He’s surrounded by pure people, who dispel
stains, callousness, sin, and corruptions.’”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Great Congregation
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Sakyans, near Kapilavatthu in the Great Wood, together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants, all of whom were perfected ones.
And most of the deities from ten solar systems had gathered to see the Buddha and the Saṅgha of mendicants.
Then four deities of the Pure Abodes, aware of what was happening, thought:
“Why don’t we go to the Buddha and each recite a verse in his presence?”
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, they vanished from the Pure Abodes and reappeared in front of the Buddha.
They bowed to the Buddha and stood to one side.
Standing to one side, one deity recited this verse in the Buddha’s presence:
“There’s a great congregation in the woods,
a host of gods have assembled.
We’ve come to this righteous congregation
to see the invincible Saṅgha!”
Then another deity recited this verse in the Buddha’s presence:
“The mendicants there are immersed in samādhi,
they’ve straightened out their own minds.
Like a charioteer who has taken the reins,
the astute ones protect their senses.”
Then another deity recited this verse in the Buddha’s presence:
“Having cut the stake and cut the bar,
they’re unstirred, with boundary pillar uprooted.
They live pure and immaculate,
the young dragons tamed by the seer.”
Then another deity recited this verse in the Buddha’s presence:
“Anyone who has gone to the Buddha for refuge
won’t go to a plane of loss.
After giving up this human body,
they swell the hosts of gods.”
The Gathering of Deities
Then the Buddha said to the mendicants:
“Mendicants, most of the deities from ten solar systems have gathered to see the Realized One and the mendicant Saṅgha.
The Buddhas of the past had, and the Buddhas of the future will have, gatherings of deities that are at most like the gathering for me now.
I shall declare the names of the heavenly hosts;
I shall extol the names of the heavenly hosts;
I shall teach the names of the heavenly hosts.
Listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“I shall invoke a paean of praise!
Where the earth-gods dwell,
there, in mountain caves,
resolute and composed,
dwell many like lonely lions,
who have mastered their fears.
Their minds are bright and pure,
clear and undisturbed.”
The teacher knew that over five hundred
were in the wood at Kapilavatthu.
Therefore he addressed
the disciples who love the teaching:
“The heavenly hosts have come forth;
mendicants, you should be aware of them.”
Those monks became keen,
hearing the Buddha’s instruction.
Knowledge manifested in them,
seeing those non-human beings.
Some saw a hundred,
a thousand, even seventy thousand,
while some saw a hundred thousand
non-human beings.
But some saw an endless number
spread out in every direction.
And all that was known
and distinguished by the Seer.
Therefore he addressed
the disciples who love the teaching:
“The heavenly hosts have come forth;
mendicants, you should be aware of them.
I shall extol them for you,
with lyrics in proper order.
There are seven thousand spirits,
earth-gods of Kapilavatthu.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
From the Himalayas there are six thousand
spirits of different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
From Mount Sātā there are three thousand
spirits of different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
And thus there are sixteen thousand
spirits of different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
From Vessamittā there are five hundred
spirits of different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
And there’s Kumbhīra of Rājagaha,
whose home is on Mount Vepulla.
Attended by more than
a hundred thousand spirits,
Kumbhīra of Rājagaha
also came to the meeting in the wood.
King Dhataraṭṭha rules
the eastern quarter.
Lord of the fairies,
he’s a great king, glorious.
And he has many mighty sons
all of them named Indra.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
King Virūḷha rules
the southern quarter.
Lord of the goblins,
he’s a great king, glorious.
And he has many mighty sons
all of them named Indra.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
King Virūpakkha rules
the western quarter.
Lord of the dragons,
he’s a great king, glorious.
And he has many mighty sons
all of them named Indra.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
King Kuvera rules
the northern quarter.
Lord of spirits,
he’s a great king, glorious.
And he has many mighty sons
all of them named Indra.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
Dhataraṭṭha in the east,
Virūḷhaka to the south,
Virūpakkha to the west,
and Kuvera in the north.
These Four Great Kings,
all around in the four quarters,
stood there dazzling
in the wood at Kapilavatthu.
Their deceitful bondservants came,
so treacherous and crafty—
the deceivers Kuṭeṇḍu, Viṭeṇḍu,
with Viṭucca and Viṭuḍa.
And Candana and Kāmaseṭṭha,
Kinnughaṇḍu and Nighaṇḍu,
Panāda and Opamañña,
and Mātali, the god’s charioteer.
Cittasena the fairy came too,
and the kings Nala and Janesabha,
as well as Pañcasikha,
Timbaru, and Suriyavacchasā.
These and other kings there were,
the fairies with their kings.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
Then came dragons from Nābhasa,
and Vesālī, with the Tacchakas.
The Kambalas and Assataras came
from Pāyāga with their kin.
From Yamunā the Dhataraṭṭha
dragons came, so glorious.
And Erāvaṇa the great dragon
also came to the meeting in the wood.
Those who seize the dragon kings by force—
divine, twice-born birds with piercing vision—
swoop down to the wood from the sky;
their name is ‘Rainbow Phoenix’.
But the dragon kings remained fearless,
for the Buddha kept them safe from the phoenixes.
Introducing each other with gentle words,
the dragons and phoenixes took the Buddha as their refuge.
Defeated by Vajirahattha,
the demons live in the ocean.
They’re brothers of Vāsava,
powerful and glorious.
There’s the terrifying Kālakañjas,
the Dānaveghasa demons,
Vepacitti and Sucitti,
Pahārāda with Namuci,
and a hundred of Bali’s sons,
all named after Veroca.
Bali’s army armed themselves
and went up to the auspicious Rāhu, saying:
‘Now is the time, sir,
for the meeting of mendicants in the wood.’
The gods of Water and Earth,
and Fire and Wind came there.
The Varuṇa and Vāruṇa gods,
and Soma together with Yasa.
A host of the gods of Love
and Compassion came, so glorious.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
The Veṇhu and Sahali gods,
and Asama, and the twin Yamas came.
The gods living on the moon came,
with the Moon before them.
The gods living on the sun came,
with the Sun before them.
And with the stars before them
came the silly gods of clouds.
And Sakka came, the stronghold-giver,
known as Vāsava, the first of the Vasus.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
Then came the Sahabhū gods,
blazing like a crested flame;
and the Ariṭṭhakas and Rojas too,
and the gods hued blue as flax.
The Varuṇas and Sahadhammas,
the Accutas and Anejakas,
the Sūleyyas and Ruciras all came,
as did the Vāsavanesi gods.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
The Samānas, Mahāsamānas,
Mānusas, and Mānusuttamas all came,
and the gods depraved by play,
and those who are malevolent.
Then came the Hari gods,
and the Lohitavāsīs.
The Pāragas and Mahāpāragas came,
such glorious gods.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
The Sukkas, Karumhas, and Aruṇas
came along with the Veghanasas.
And the Odātagayhas came as chiefs
of the Vicakkhaṇa gods.
The Sadāmattas and Hāragajas,
and the glorious Missakas;
Pajjuna came thundering,
he who rains on all quarters.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
The Khemiyas, Tusitas, Yāmas,
and the glorious Kaṭṭhakas came;
The Lambītakas, Lāmaseṭṭhas,
those called the Jotis and Āsavas.
The Gods Who Love to Create came too,
and those who delight in the Creations of Others.
These ten hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They’re powerful and brilliant,
so beautiful and glorious.
Rejoicing, they’ve come forth
to the meeting of mendicants in the wood.
These sixty hosts of gods
shone in all different colors.
They came in order of their names,
these and others likewise, thinking:
‘We shall see those rid of rebirth, kind,
the undefiled ones who have crossed the flood,
and the dragon who brought them across,
who like the Moon has overcome darkness.’
Subrahmā and Paramatta came,
with sons of those powerful ones.
Sanaṅkumāra and Tissa
also came to the meeting in the wood.
Of a thousand Brahmā realms,
the Great Brahmā stands forth.
He has arisen, resplendent,
his formidable body so glorious.
The ten Issarās came there,
each one of them wielding power,
and in the middle of them came
Hārita with his following.”
When they had all come forth—
the gods with their Lord, and the Brahmās—
Māra’s army came forth too:
see the stupidity of the Dark Lord!
“Come, seize them and bind them,” he said,
“let them be bound by desire!
Surround them on all sides,
don’t let any escape!”
And so there the great general
sent forth his dark army.
He struck the ground with his fist
to make a horrifying sound
like a storm cloud shedding rain,
thundering and flashing.
But then he retreated,
furious, out of control.
And all that was known
and distinguished by the Seer.
Therefore he addressed
the disciples who love the teaching:
“Māra’s army has arrived;
mendicants, you should be aware of them.”
Those monks became keen,
hearing the Buddha’s instruction.
The army fled from those free of passion,
and not a single hair was stirred!
“All are triumphant in battle,
so fearless and glorious.
They rejoice with all the spirits,
the disciples well-known among men.”
Long Discourses
With Pāyāsi
So I have heard.
At one time Venerable Kassapa the Prince was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants when he arrived at a Kosalan citadel named Setavyā.
He stayed in the grove of Indian Rosewood to the north of Setavyā.
Now at that time the chieftain Pāyāsi was living in Setavyā. It was a crown property given by King Pasenadi of Kosala, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
On Pāyāsi
Now at that time Pāyāsi had the following harmful misconception:
“There’s no afterlife. No beings are reborn spontaneously. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
The brahmins and householders of Setavyā heard,
“It seems the ascetic Kassapa the Prince—a disciple of the ascetic Gotama—is staying in the grove of Indian Rosewood to the north of Setavyā.
He has this good reputation:
‘He is astute, competent, intelligent, learned, a brilliant speaker, eloquent, mature, a perfected one.’
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then, having departed Setavyā, they formed into companies and headed north to the grove.
Now at that time the chieftain Pāyāsi had retired to the upper floor of his stilt longhouse for his midday nap.
He saw the brahmins and householders heading north towards the grove,
and addressed his steward,
“My steward, why are the brahmins and householders heading north towards the grove?”
“The ascetic Kassapa the Prince—a disciple of the ascetic Gotama—is staying in the grove of Indian Rosewood to the north of Setavyā.
He has this good reputation:
‘He is astute, competent, intelligent, learned, a brilliant speaker, eloquent, mature, a perfected one.’
They’re going to see that Kassapa the Prince.”
“Well then, go to the brahmins and householders and say to them:
‘Sirs, the chieftain Pāyāsi asks
you to wait, as he will also go to see the ascetic Kassapa the Prince.’
Before Kassapa the Prince convinces those foolish and incompetent brahmins and householders that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds—
for none of these things are true!”
“Yes, sir,” replied the steward, and did as he was asked.
Then Pāyāsi escorted by the brahmins and householders, went up to Kassapa the Prince, and exchanged greetings with him. When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side.
Before sitting down to one side, some of the brahmins and householders of Setavyā bowed, some exchanged greetings and polite conversation, some held up their joined palms toward Kassapa the Prince, some announced their name and clan, while some kept silent.
Nihilism
Seated to one side, the chieftain Pāyāsi said to Venerable Kassapa the Prince,
“Master Kassapa, this is my doctrine and view:
‘There’s no afterlife. No beings are reborn spontaneously. There’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds.’”
“Well, chieftain, I’ve never seen or heard of anyone holding such a doctrine or view.
For how on earth can anyone say such a thing?
The Simile of the Moon and Sun
Well then, chieftain, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
What do you think, chieftain?
Are the moon and sun in this world or the other world? Are they gods or humans?”
“They are in the other world, Master Kassapa, and they are gods, not humans.”
“By this method it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife, no beings are reborn spontaneously, and there’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
“Is there a method by which you can prove what you say?”
“There is, Master Kassapa.”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Well, I have friends and colleagues, relatives and kin who kill living creatures, steal, and commit sexual misconduct. They use speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical. And they’re covetous, malicious, with wrong view.
Some time later they become sick, suffering, gravely ill.
When I know that
they will not recover from their illness, I go to them and say,
‘Sirs, there are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
“Those who kill living creatures, steal, and commit sexual misconduct; use speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; and are covetous, malicious, and have wrong view—when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.”
You do all these things.
If what those ascetics and brahmins say is true, when your body breaks up, after death, you’ll be reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
If that happens, sirs, come and tell me that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds.
I trust you and believe you. Anything you see will be just as if I’ve seen it for myself.’
They agree to this. But they don’t come back to tell me, nor do they send a messenger.
This is the method by which I prove that
there’s no afterlife, no beings are reborn spontaneously, and there’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
The Simile of the Bandit
“Well then, chieftain, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
What do you think, chieftain?
Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal and present him to you, saying,
‘Sir, this is a bandit, a criminal.
Punish him as you will.’
Then you’d say to them,
‘Well then, my men, tie this man’s arms tightly behind his back with a strong rope. Shave his head and march him from street to street and square to square to the beating of a harsh drum. Then take him out the south gate and there, at the place of execution to the south of the city, chop off his head.’
Saying, ‘Good,’ they’d do as they were told, sitting him down at the place of execution.
Could that bandit get the executioners to wait, saying,
‘Please, good executioners! I have friends and colleagues, relatives and kin in such and such village or town. Wait until I’ve visited them, then I’ll come back’? Or would they just chop off his head as he prattled on?”
“They’d just chop off his head.”
“So even a human bandit couldn’t get his human executioners to stay his execution.
What then of your friends and colleagues, relatives and kin who are reborn in a lower realm after doing bad things? Could they get the wardens of hell to wait, saying,
‘Please, good wardens of hell! Wait until I’ve gone to the chieftain Pāyāsi to tell him that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds’?
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Is there a method by which you can prove what you say?”
“There is, Master Kassapa.”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Well, I have friends and colleagues, relatives and kin who refrain from killing living creatures, stealing, and committing sexual misconduct. They refrain from speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical. And they’re content, kind-hearted, with right view.
Some time later they become sick, suffering, gravely ill.
When I know that
they will not recover from their illness, I go to them and say,
‘Sirs, there are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
“Those who refrain from killing living creatures, stealing, and committing sexual misconduct; who refrain from speech that’s false, divisive, harsh, or nonsensical; and are content, kind-hearted, with right view—when their body breaks up, after death, are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.”
You do all these things.
If what those ascetics and brahmins say is true, when your body breaks up, after death, you’ll be reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm.
If that happens, sirs, come and tell me that
there is an afterlife.
I trust you and believe you. Anything you see will be just as if I’ve seen it for myself.’
They agree to this. But they don’t come back to tell me, nor do they send a messenger.
This is the method by which I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Sewer
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Suppose there were a man sunk over his head in a sewer.
Then you were to order someone
to pull him out of the sewer,
and they’d agree to do so.
Then you’d tell them to
carefully scrape the dung off that man’s body with bamboo scrapers,
and they’d agree to do so.
Then you’d tell them to
carefully scrub that man’s body down with pale clay three times,
and they’d do so.
Then you’d tell them to
smear that man’s body with oil, and carefully wash him down with fine paste three times,
and they’d do so.
Then you’d tell them to
dress that man’s hair and beard,
and they’d do so.
Then you’d tell them to
provide that man with costly garlands, makeup, and clothes,
and they’d do so.
Then you’d tell them to
bring that man up to the stilt longhouse and set him up with the five kinds of sensual stimulation,
and they’d do so.
What do you think, chieftain?
Now that man is nicely bathed and anointed, with hair and beard dressed, bedecked with garlands and bracelets, dressed in white, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation upstairs in the royal longhouse. Would he want to dive back into that sewer again?”
“No, Master Kassapa.
Why is that?
Because that sewer is filthy, stinking, disgusting, and repulsive, and it’s regarded as such.”
“In the same way, chieftain, to the gods, human beings are filthy, stinking, disgusting, and repulsive, and are regarded as such.
The smell of humans reaches the gods even a hundred leagues away.
What then of your friends and colleagues, relatives and kin who are reborn in a higher realm after doing good things? Will they come back to tell you that
there is an afterlife?
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Well, I have friends and colleagues, relatives and kin who refrain from killing living creatures and so on.
Some time later they become sick, suffering, gravely ill.
When I know that
they will not recover from their illness, I go to them and say,
‘Sirs, there are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
“Those who refrain from killing living creatures and so on are reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm, in the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three.”
You do all these things.
If what those ascetics and brahmins say is true, when your body breaks up, after death, you’ll be reborn in the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three.
If that happens, sirs, come and tell me that
there is an afterlife.
I trust you and believe you. Anything you see will be just as if I’ve seen it for myself.’
They agree to this. But they don’t come back to tell me, nor do they send a messenger.
This is how I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Gods of the Thirty-Three
“Well then, chieftain, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
A hundred human years are equivalent to one day and night for the gods of the Thirty-Three. Thirty such days make a month, and twelve months make a year. The gods of the Thirty-Three have a lifespan of a thousand such years.
Now, as to your friends who are reborn in the company of the gods of the Thirty-Three after doing good things.
If they think,
‘First I’ll amuse myself for two or three days, supplied and provided with the five kinds of heavenly sensual stimulation. Then I’ll go back to Pāyāsi and tell him that
there is an afterlife.’
Would they come back to tell you that
there is an afterlife?”
“No, Master Kassapa.
For I would be long dead by then.
But Master Kassapa, who has told you
that the gods of the Thirty-Three exist, or that they have such a long life span?
I don’t believe you.”
Blind From Birth
“Chieftain, suppose there was a person blind from birth. They couldn’t see sights that are dark or bright, or blue, yellow, red, or magenta. They couldn’t see even and uneven ground, or the stars, or the moon and sun.
They’d say,
‘There’s no such thing as dark and bright sights, and no-one who sees them.
There’s no such thing as blue,
even and uneven ground,
moon and sun, and no-one who sees these things.
I don’t know it or see it, therefore it doesn’t exist.’
Would they be speaking rightly?”
“No, Master Kassapa.
There are such things as dark and bright sights, and one who sees them.
And those other things are real, too, as is the one who sees them.
So it’s not right to say this:
‘I don’t know it or see it, therefore it doesn’t exist.’”
“In the same way, chieftain, when you tell me you don’t believe me you seem like the blind man in the simile.
You can’t see the other world the way you think, with the eye of the flesh.
There are ascetics and brahmins who live in the wilderness, frequenting remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest. Meditating diligent, keen, and resolute, they purify the divine eye, the power of clairvoyance.
With clairvoyance that is purified and superhuman, they see this world and the other world, and sentient beings who are spontaneously reborn.
That’s how to see the other world,
not how you think, with the eye of the flesh.
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Well, I see ascetics and brahmins who are ethical, of good character, who want to live and don’t want to die, who want to be happy and recoil from pain.
I think to myself,
‘If those ascetics and brahmins knew that
things were going to be better for them after death,
they’d drink poison, slit their wrists, hang themselves, or throw themselves off a cliff.
They mustn’t know that
things are going to be better for them after death. That’s why they are ethical, of good character, wanting to live and not wanting to die, wanting to be happy and recoiling from pain.’
This is the method by which I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Pregnant Woman
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, a certain brahmin had two wives.
One had a son ten or twelve years of age, while the other was pregnant and about to give birth.
Then the brahmin passed away.
So the youth said to his mother’s co-wife,
‘Madam, all the wealth, grain, silver, and gold is mine,
and you get nothing.
Transfer to me my father’s inheritance.’
But the brahmin lady said,
‘Wait, my dear, until I give birth.
If it’s a boy, one portion shall be his.
If it’s a girl, she will be your reward.’
But for a second time,
and a third time, the youth insisted that the entire inheritance must be his.
So the brahmin lady took a knife, went to her bedroom, and sliced open her belly, thinking,
‘Until I give birth—whether it’s a boy or a girl!’
She destroyed her own life and that of the fetus, as well as any wealth.
Being foolish and incompetent, she sought an inheritance irrationally and fell to ruin and disaster. In the same way, chieftain, being foolish and incompetent, you’re seeking the other world irrationally and will fall to ruin and disaster,
just like that brahmin lady.
Good ascetics and brahmins don’t force what is unripe to ripen;
rather, they wait for it to ripen.
For the life of clever ascetics and brahmins is beneficial.
So long as they remain, good ascetics and brahmins make much merit, and act for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal and present him to me, saying,
‘Sir, this is a bandit, a criminal.
Punish him as you will.’
I say to them,
‘Well then, sirs, place this man in a pot while he’s still alive. Close up the mouth, bind it up with damp leather, and seal it with a thick coat of damp clay. Then lift it up on a stove and light the fire.’
They agree, and do what I ask.
When we know that that man has passed away, we lift down the pot and break it open, uncover the mouth, and slowly peek inside, thinking,
‘Hopefully we’ll see his soul escaping.’
But we don’t see his soul escaping.
This is how I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Dream
“Well then, chieftain, I’ll ask you about this in return, and you can answer as you like.
Do you recall ever having a midday nap and seeing delightful parks, woods, meadows, and lotus ponds in a dream?”
“I do, sir.”
“At that time were you guarded by hunchbacks, dwarves, midgets, and younglings?”
“But did they see your soul entering or leaving?”
“No they did not.”
“So if they couldn’t even see your soul entering or leaving while you were still alive,
how could you see the soul of a dead man?
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife, there are beings reborn spontaneously, and there is a fruit or result of good and bad deeds.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal and present him to me, saying,
‘Sir, this is a bandit, a criminal.
Punish him as you will.’
I say to them,
‘Well then, sirs, weigh this man with scales while he’s still alive. Then strangle him with a bowstring, and when he’s dead, weigh him again.’
They agree, and do what I ask.
So long as they are alive, they’re lighter, softer, more flexible.
But when they die they become heavier, stiffer, less flexible.
This is how I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Hot Iron Ball
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Suppose a person was to heat an iron ball all day until it was burning, blazing, and glowing, and then they weigh it with scales.
After some time, when it had cooled and become extinguished, they’d weigh it again.
When would that iron ball be lighter, softer, and more workable—when it’s burning or when it’s cool?”
“So long as the iron ball is full of heat and air—burning, blazing, and glowing—it’s lighter, softer, and more workable.
But when it lacks heat and air—cooled and extinguished—it’s heavier, stiffer, and less workable.”
“In the same way, so long as this body is full of life and warmth and consciousness it’s lighter, softer, and more flexible.
But when it lacks life and warmth and consciousness it’s heavier, stiffer, and less flexible.
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal and present him to me, saying,
‘Sir, this is a bandit, a criminal.
Punish him as you will.’
I say to them,
‘Well then, sirs, take this man’s life without injuring his outer skin, inner skin, flesh, sinews, bones, or marrow. Hopefully we’ll see his soul escaping.’
They agree, and do what I ask.
When he’s half-dead, I tell them to
lay him on his back in hope of seeing his soul escape.
They do so.
But we don’t see his soul escaping.
I tell them to
lay him bent over,
to lay him on his side,
to lay him on the other side;
to stand him upright,
to stand him upside down;
to strike him with fists,
and swords;
and to give him a good shaking in hope of seeing his soul escape.
They do all these things.
But we don’t see his soul escaping.
For him the eye itself is present, and so are those sights. Yet he does not experience that sense-field.
The ear itself is present, and so are those sounds. Yet he does not experience that sense-field.
The nose itself is present, and so are those smells. Yet he does not experience that sense-field.
The tongue itself is present, and so are those tastes. Yet he does not experience that sense-field.
The body itself is present, and so are those touches. Yet he does not experience that sense-field.
This is how I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Horn Blower
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, a certain horn blower took his horn and traveled to a borderland,
where he went to a certain village. Standing in the middle of the village, he sounded his horn three times, then placed it on the ground and sat down to one side.
Then the people of the borderland thought,
‘What is making this sound, so arousing, sensuous, intoxicating, infatuating, and captivating?’
They gathered around the horn blower and said,
‘Mister, what is making this sound, so arousing, sensuous, intoxicating, infatuating, and captivating?’
‘The sound is made by this, which is called a horn.’
They laid that horn on its back, saying,
‘Speak, good horn! Speak, good horn!’
But still the horn made no sound.
Then they lay the horn bent over, they lay it on its side, they lay it on its other side; they stood it upright, they stood it upside down; they struck it with fists, stones, rods, and swords; and they gave it a good shake, saying,
‘Speak, good horn! Speak, good horn!’
But still the horn made no sound.
So the horn blower thought,
‘How foolish are these borderland folk! For how can they seek the sound of a horn so irrationally?’
And as they looked on, he picked up the horn, sounded it three times, and took it away with him.
Then the people of the borderland thought,
‘So, it seems, when what is called a horn is accompanied by a person, effort, and wind, it makes a sound. But when these things are absent it makes no sound.’
In the same way, so long as this body is full of life and warmth and consciousness it walks back and forth, stands, sits, and lies down. It sees sights with the eye, hears sounds with the ear, smells odors with the nose, tastes flavors with the tongue, feels touches with the body, and knows thoughts with the mind.
But when it lacks life and warmth and consciousness it does none of these things.
By this method, too, it ought to be proven that
there is an afterlife.”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I think that
there’s no afterlife.”
“Can you prove it?”
“How, exactly, chieftain?”
“Suppose they were to arrest a bandit, a criminal and present him to me, saying,
‘Sir, this is a bandit, a criminal.
Punish him as you will.’
I say to them,
‘Well then, sirs, cut open this man’s outer skin. Hopefully we might see his soul.’
They cut open his outer skin,
but we see no soul.
I say to them,
‘Well then, sirs, cut open his inner skin, flesh, sinews, bones, or marrow. Hopefully we’ll see his soul.’
They do so, but we see no soul.
This is how I prove that
there’s no afterlife.”
The Simile of the Fire-Worshiping Matted-Hair Ascetic
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, a certain fire-worshiping matted-hair ascetic settled in a leaf hut in a wilderness region.
Then a caravan came out from a certain country.
It stayed for one night not far from that ascetic’s hermitage, and then moved on.
The ascetic thought,
‘Why don’t I go to that caravan’s campsite? Hopefully I’ll find something useful there.’
So he went, and he saw a little baby boy abandoned there.
When he saw this he thought,
‘It’s not proper for me to look on while a human being dies.
Why don’t I bring this boy back to my hermitage, nurse him, nourish him, and raise him?’
So that’s what he did.
When the boy was ten or twelve years old, the ascetic had some business come up in the country.
So he said to the boy,
‘My dear, I wish to go to the country.
Serve the sacred flame.
Do not extinguish it.
But if you should extinguish it, here is the hatchet, the firewood, and the bundle of drill-sticks. Light the fire and serve it.’
And having instructed the boy, the ascetic went to the country.
But the boy was so engrossed in his play, the fire went out.
He thought,
‘My father told me to serve the sacred flame.
Why don’t I light it again and serve it?’
So he chopped the bundle of drill-sticks with the hatchet, thinking,
‘Hopefully I’ll get a fire!’
But he still got no fire.
He split the bundle of drill-sticks into two, three, four, five, ten, or a hundred parts. He chopped them into splinters, pounded them in a mortar, and swept them away in a strong wind, thinking,
‘Hopefully I’ll get a fire!’
But he still got no fire.
Then the matted-hair ascetic, having concluded his business in the country, returned to his own hermitage, and said to the boy,
‘I trust, my dear, that the fire didn’t go out?’
And the boy told him what had happened.
Then the ascetic thought,
‘How foolish is this boy, how incompetent! For how can he seek a fire so irrationally?’
So while the boy looked on, he took a bundle of fire-sticks, lit the fire, and said,
‘Dear boy, this is how to light a fire.
Not the foolish and incompetent way you sought it so irrationally.’
In the same way, chieftain, being foolish and incompetent, you seek the other world irrationally.
Let go of this harmful misconception, chieftain, let go of it!
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I’m not able to let go of that harmful misconception.
King Pasenadi of Kosala knows my views, and so do foreign kings.
If I let go of this harmful misconception, people will say,
‘How foolish is the chieftain Pāyāsi, how incompetent, that he should hold on to a mistake!’
I shall carry on with this view out of anger, contempt, and spite!”
The Simile of the Two Caravan Leaders
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, a large caravan of a thousand wagons traveled from a country in the east to the west.
Wherever they went they quickly used up the grass, wood, water, and the green foliage.
Now, that caravan had two leaders, each in charge of five hundred wagons.
They thought,
‘This is a large caravan of a thousand wagons.
Wherever we go we quickly use up the grass, wood, water, and the green foliage.
Why don’t we split the caravan in two halves?’
So that’s what they did.
One caravan leader, having prepared much grass, wood, and water, started the caravan.
After two or three days’ journey he saw a dark man with red eyes coming the other way in a donkey cart with muddy wheels. He was armored with a quiver and wreathed with yellow lotus, his clothes and hair all wet. Seeing him, he said,
‘Sir, where do you come from?’
‘From such and such a country.’
‘And where are you going?’
‘To the country named so and so.’
‘But has there been much rain in the desert up ahead?’
‘Indeed there has, sir. The paths are sprinkled with water, and there is much grass, wood, and water.
Toss out your grass, wood, and water. Your wagons will move swiftly when lightly-laden, so don’t tire your draught teams.’
So the caravan leader addressed his drivers,
‘This man says that
there has been much rain in the desert up ahead.
He advises us to toss out the grass, wood, and water. The wagons will move swiftly when lightly-laden, and won’t tire our draught teams.
So let’s toss out the grass, wood, and water and restart the caravan with lightly-laden wagons.’
‘Yes, sir,’ the drivers replied, and that’s what they did.
But in the caravan’s first campsite they saw no grass, wood, or water.
And in the second,
and seventh campsites they saw no grass, wood, or water.
And all fell to ruin and disaster.
And the men and beasts in that caravan were all devoured by that non-human spirit.
Only their bones remained.
Now, when the second caravan leader knew that
the first caravan was well underway, he prepared much grass, wood, and water and started the caravan.
After two or three days’ journey he saw a dark man with red eyes coming the other way in a donkey cart with muddy wheels. He was armored with a quiver and wreathed with yellow lotus, his clothes and hair all wet. Seeing him, he said,
‘Sir, where do you come from?’
‘From such and such a country.’
‘And where are you going?’
‘To the country named so and so.’
‘But has there been much rain in the desert up ahead?’
‘Indeed there has, sir.
The paths are sprinkled with water, and there is much grass, wood, and water.
Toss out your grass, wood, and water. Your wagons will move swiftly when lightly-laden, so don’t tire your draught teams.’
So the caravan leader addressed his drivers,
‘This man says that
there has been much rain in the desert up ahead.
He advises us to toss out the grass, wood, and water. The wagons will move swiftly when lightly-laden, and won’t tire our draught teams.
But this person is neither our friend nor relative. How can we proceed out of trust in him?
We shouldn’t toss out any grass, wood, or water, but continue with our goods laden as before.
We shall not toss out any old stock.’
‘Yes, sir,’ the drivers replied, and they restarted the caravan with the goods laden as before.
And in the caravan’s first campsite they saw no grass, wood, or water.
And in the second,
and seventh campsites they saw no grass, wood, or water.
And they saw the other caravan that had come to ruin.
And they saw the bones of the men and beasts who had been devoured by that non-human spirit.
So the caravan leader addressed his drivers,
‘This caravan came to ruin, as happens when guided by a foolish caravan leader.
Well then, sirs, toss out any of our merchandise that’s of little value, and take what’s valuable from this caravan.’
‘Yes, sir’ replied the drivers, and that’s what they did. They crossed over the desert safely, as happens when guided by an astute caravan leader.
In the same way, chieftain, being foolish and incompetent, you will come to ruin seeking the other world irrationally, like the first caravan leader.
And those who think you’re worth listening to and trusting will also come to ruin, like the drivers.
Let go of this harmful misconception, chieftain, let go of it!
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I’m not able to let go of that harmful misconception.
King Pasenadi of Kosala knows my views, and so do foreign kings.
I shall carry on with this view out of anger, contempt, and spite!”
The Simile of the Dung-Carrier
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, a certain swineherd went from his own village to another village.
There he saw a large pile of dry dung abandoned.
He thought,
‘This pile of dry dung can serve as food for my pigs.
Why don’t I carry it off?’
So he spread out his upper robe, shoveled the dry dung onto it, tied it up into a bundle, lifted it on to his head, and went on his way.
While on his way a large sudden storm poured down.
Smeared with leaking, oozing dung down to his fingernails, he kept on carrying the load of dung.
When people saw him they said,
‘Have you gone mad, sir? Have you lost your mind? For how can you, smeared with leaking, oozing dung down to your fingernails, keep on carrying that load of dung?’
‘You’re the mad ones, sirs! You’re the ones who’ve lost your minds! For this will serve as food for my pigs.’
In the same way, chieftain, you seem like the dung carrier in the simile.
Let go of this harmful misconception, chieftain, let go of it!
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I’m not able to let go of that harmful misconception.
King Pasenadi of Kosala knows my views, and so do foreign kings.
I shall carry on with this view out of anger, contempt, and spite!”
The Simile of the Gamblers
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, two gamblers were playing with dice.
One gambler, every time they made a bad throw, swallowed the dice.
The second gambler saw him, and said,
‘Well, my friend, you’ve won it all! Give me the dice, I will offer them as sacrifice.’
‘Yes, my friend,’ the gambler replied, and gave them.
Having soaked the dice in poison, the gambler said to the other,
‘Come, my friend, let’s play dice.’
‘Yes, my friend,’ the other gambler replied.
And for a second time the gamblers played with dice.
And for the second time, every time they made a bad throw, that gambler swallowed the dice.
The second gambler saw him, and said,
‘The man swallows the dice without realizing
they’re smeared with burning poison.
Swallow, you bloody cheat, swallow!
Soon you’ll know the bitter fruit!’
In the same way, chieftain, you seem like the gambler in the simile.
Let go of this harmful misconception, chieftain, let go of it!
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!”
“Even though Master Kassapa says this, still I’m not able to let go of that harmful misconception.
King Pasenadi of Kosala knows my views, and so do foreign kings.
I shall carry on with this view out of anger, contempt, and spite!”
The Simile of the Man Who Carried Hemp
“Well then, chieftain, I shall give you a simile.
For by means of a simile some sensible people understand the meaning of what is said.
Once upon a time, the inhabitants of a certain country emigrated.
Then one friend said to another,
‘Come, my friend, let’s go to that country. Hopefully we’ll get some riches there!’
‘Yes, my friend,’ the other replied.
They went to that country, and to a certain place in a village. There they saw a pile of abandoned sunn hemp. Seeing it, one friend said to the other,
‘This is a pile of abandoned sunn hemp. Well then, my friend, you make up a bundle of hemp, and I’ll make one too. Let’s both take a bundle of hemp and go on.’
‘Yes, my friend,’ he said. Carrying their bundles of hemp they went to another place in the village.
There they saw much sunn hemp thread abandoned. Seeing it, one friend said to the other,
‘This pile of abandoned sunn hemp thread is just what we wanted the hemp for!
Well then, my friend, let’s abandon our bundles of hemp, and both take a bundle of hemp thread and go on.’
‘I’ve already carried this bundle of hemp a long way, and it’s well tied up. It’s good enough for me, you understand.’
So one friend abandoned their bundle of hemp and picked up a bundle of hemp thread.
They went to another place in the village.
There they saw much sunn hemp cloth abandoned. Seeing it, one friend said to the other,
‘This pile of abandoned sunn hemp cloth is just what we wanted the hemp and hemp thread for!
Well then, my friend, let’s abandon our bundles, and both take a bundle of hemp cloth and go on.’
‘I’ve already carried this bundle of hemp a long way, and it’s well tied up. It’s good enough for me, you understand.’
So one friend abandoned their bundle of hemp thread and picked up a bundle of hemp cloth.
They went to another place in the village.
There they saw a pile of flax, and by turn,
linen thread,
linen cloth,
silk thread,
silk cloth,
and gold abandoned. Seeing it, one friend said to the other,
‘This pile of gold is just what we wanted all those other things for!
Well then, my friend, let’s abandon our bundles, and both take a bundle of gold and go on.’
‘I’ve already carried this bundle of hemp a long way, and it’s well tied up. It’s good enough for me, you understand.’
So one friend abandoned their bundle of silver and picked up a bundle of gold.
Then they returned to their own village.
When one friend returned with a bundle of sunn hemp, they didn’t please their parents, their partners and children, or their friends and colleagues. And they got no pleasure and happiness on that account.
But when the other friend returned with a bundle of gold, they pleased their parents, their partners and children, and their friends and colleagues. And they got much pleasure and happiness on that account.
In the same way, chieftain, you seem like the hemp-carrier in the simile.
Let go of this harmful misconception, chieftain, let go of it!
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!”
Going for Refuge
“I was delighted and satisfied with your very first simile, Master Kassapa!
Nevertheless, I wanted to hear your various solutions to the problem, so I thought I’d oppose you in this way.
Excellent, Master Kassapa! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Kassapa has made the teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Kassapa remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
Master Kassapa, I wish to perform a great sacrifice. Please instruct me so it will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
On Sacrifice
“Chieftain, take the kind of sacrifice where cattle, goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, and various kinds of creatures are slaughtered. And the recipients have wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong immersion. That kind of sacrifice is not very fruitful or beneficial or splendid or bountiful.
Suppose a farmer was to enter a wood taking seed and plough.
And on that barren field, that barren ground, with uncleared stumps he sowed seeds that were broken, spoiled, weather-damaged, infertile, and ill kept.
And the heavens don’t provide enough rain when needed.
Would those seeds grow, increase, and mature, and would the farmer get abundant fruit?”
“No, Master Kassapa.”
“In the same way, chieftain, take the kind of sacrifice where cattle, goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, and various kinds of creatures are slaughtered. And the recipients have wrong view, wrong thought, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, and wrong immersion. That kind of sacrifice is not very fruitful or beneficial or splendid or bountiful.
But take the kind of sacrifice where cattle, goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, and various kinds of creatures are not slaughtered. And the recipients have right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion. That kind of sacrifice is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.
Suppose a farmer was to enter a wood taking seed and plough.
And on that fertile field, that fertile ground, with well-cleared stumps he sowed seeds that were intact, unspoiled, not weather-damaged, fertile, and well kept.
And the heavens provide plenty of rain when needed.
Would those seeds grow, increase, and mature, and would the farmer get abundant fruit?”
“Yes, Master Kassapa.”
“In the same way, chieftain, take the kind of sacrifice where cattle, goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, and various kinds of creatures are not slaughtered. And the recipients have right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion. That kind of sacrifice is very fruitful and beneficial and splendid and bountiful.”
On the Brahmin Student Uttara
Then the chieftain Pāyāsi set up an offering for ascetics and brahmins, for paupers, vagrants, travelers, and beggars.
At that offering such food as rough gruel with pickles was given, and heavy clothes with knotted fringes.
Now, it was a brahmin student named Uttara who organized that offering.
When the offering was over he referred to it like this,
“Through this offering may I be together with the chieftain Pāyāsi in this world, but not in the next.”
Pāyāsi heard of this,
so he summoned Uttara and said,
“Is it really true, dear Uttara, that you referred to the offering in this way?”
“Yes, sir.”
Don’t we who seek merit expect some result from the offering?”
“At your offering such food as rough gruel with pickles was given, which you wouldn’t even want to touch with your foot, much less eat. And also heavy clothes with knotted fringes, which you also wouldn’t want to touch with your foot, much less wear.
Sir, you’re dear and beloved to me. But how can I reconcile one so dear with something so disagreeable?”
“Well then, dear Uttara, set up an offering with the same kind of food that I eat,
and the same kind of clothes that I wear.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Uttara, and did so.
So the chieftain Pāyāsi gave gifts carelessly, thoughtlessly, not with his own hands, giving the dregs. When his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in company with the gods of the Four Great Kings, in an empty palace of acacia.
But the brahmin student Uttara who organized the offering gave gifts carefully, thoughtfully, with his own hands, not giving the dregs.
When his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in company with the gods of the Thirty-Three.
The God Pāyāsi
Now at that time Venerable Gavampati would often go to that empty acacia palace for the day’s meditation.
Then the god Pāyāsi went up to him, bowed, and stood to one side.
Gavampati said to him,
“Who are you, reverend?”
“Sir, I am the chieftain Pāyāsi.”
“Didn’t you have the view that
there’s no afterlife, no beings are reborn spontaneously, and there’s no fruit or result of good and bad deeds?”
“It’s true, sir, I did have such a view.
But Venerable Kassapa the Prince dissuaded me from that harmful misconception.”
“But the student named Uttara who organized that offering for you—where has he been reborn?”
“Sir, Uttara gave gifts carefully, thoughtfully, with his own hands, not giving the dregs. When his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in company with the gods of the Thirty-Three.
But I gave gifts carelessly, thoughtlessly, not with my own hands, giving the dregs. When my body broke up, after death, I was reborn in company with the gods of the Four Great Kings, in an empty palace of acacia.
So, sir, when you’ve returned to the human realm, please announce this:
‘Give gifts carefully, thoughtfully, with your own hands, not giving the dregs.
The chieftain Pāyāsi gave gifts carelessly, thoughtlessly, not with his own hands, giving the dregs. When his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in company with the gods of the Four Great Kings, in an empty palace of acacia.
But the brahmin student Uttara who organized the offering gave gifts carefully, thoughtfully, with his own hands, not giving the dregs. When his body broke up, after death, he was reborn in company with the gods of the Thirty-Three.’”
So when Venerable Gavampati returned to the human realm he made that announcement.
Long Discourses
The Āṭānāṭiya Protection
The First Recitation Section
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Rājagaha, on the Vulture’s Peak Mountain.
Then, late at night, the Four Great Kings—with large armies of spirits, fairies, goblins, and dragons—set guards, troops, and wards at the four quarters and then, lighting up the entire Vulture’s Peak with their beauty, went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Before sitting down to one side, some spirits bowed, some exchanged greetings and polite conversation, some held up their joined palms toward the Buddha, some announced their name and clan, while some kept silent.
Seated to one side, the Great King Vessavaṇa said to the Buddha,
“Sir, some high spirits have confidence in the Buddha,
some do not.
Some middling spirits have confidence in the Buddha,
some do not.
Some low spirits have confidence in the Buddha,
some do not.
But mostly the spirits don’t have confidence in the Buddha.
Why is that?
Because the Buddha teaches them to refrain from killing living creatures, stealing, lying, sexual misconduct, and drinking alcohol.
But mostly they don’t refrain from such things.
They don’t like that or approve of it.
Sir, there are disciples of the Buddha who frequent remote lodgings in the wilderness and the forest that are quiet and still, far from the madding crowd, remote from human settlements, and fit for retreat.
There dwell high spirits who have no confidence in the Buddha’s dispensation.
To give them confidence, may the Buddha please learn the Āṭānāṭiya protection for the guarding, protection, safety, and comfort of the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, on that occasion Great King Vessavaṇa recited the Āṭānāṭiya protection.
“Hail Vipassī,
the glorious seer!
Hail Sikhī,
compassionate for all beings!
Hail Vesabhū,
cleansed and austere!
Hail Kakusandha,
crusher of Māra’s army!
Hail Koṇāgamana,
the accomplished brahmin!
Hail Kassapa,
everywhere free!
Hail Aṅgīrasa,
the glorious Sakyan!
He taught this Dhamma
that dispels all suffering.
Those in the world who are extinguished,
truly discerning,
not backbiters; such people
being great of heart and rid of naivety,
revere that Gotama;
he who is helpful to gods and humans,
accomplished in knowledge and conduct,
great of heart and rid of naivety.
Where rises the sun—
Aditi’s child, the great circle,
who in his rising
dispels the night,
and of whom, when sun has risen,
it’s said to be the day—
there is a deep lake
an ocean, where water flows.
So they know that in that place
there is an ocean where waters flow.
From here that is the eastern quarter,
so the people say.
That quarter is warded
by a great king, glorious,
the lord of the fairies;
his name is Dhataraṭṭha.
He delights in song and dance,
honored by the fairies.
And he has many mighty sons
all of one name, so I’ve heard.
Eighty, and ten, and one—
all of them named Indra.
After seeing the Awakened One,
the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun,
they revere him from afar,
the one great of heart and rid of naivety.
Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
You’ve seen us with clarity and kindness.
The non-humans bow to you.
We’ve been asked many a time,
‘Do you bow to Gotama the victor?’
And so we ought to declare:
‘We bow to Gotama the victor,
accomplished in knowledge and conduct!
We bow to Gotama the awakened!’
It’s where the departed go, they say,
who are dividers and backbiters,
killers and hunters,
bandits and frauds.
From here that is the southern quarter,
so the people say.
That quarter is warded
by a great king, glorious,
the lord of the goblins;
his name is Virūḷha.
He delights in song and dance,
honored by the goblins.
And he has many mighty sons
all of one name, so I’ve heard.
Eighty, and ten, and one—
all of them named Indra.
After seeing the Awakened One,
the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun,
they revere him from afar,
the one great of heart and rid of naivety.
Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
You’ve seen us with clarity and kindness.
The non-humans bow to you.
We’ve been asked many a time,
‘Do you bow to Gotama the victor?’
And so we ought to declare:
‘We bow to Gotama the victor,
accomplished in knowledge and conduct!
We bow to Gotama the awakened!’
Where sets the sun—
Aditi’s child, the great circle,
who in his setting
closes the day,
and of whom, when sun has set,
it’s said to be the night—
there is a deep lake
an ocean, where water flows.
So they know that in that place
there is an ocean where waters flow.
From here that is the western quarter,
so the people say.
That quarter is warded
by a great king, glorious,
the lord of the dragons;
his name is Virūpakkha.
He delights in song and dance,
honored by the dragons.
And he has many mighty sons
all of one name, so I’ve heard.
Eighty, and ten, and one—
all of them named Indra.
After seeing the Awakened One,
the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun,
they revere him from afar,
the one great of heart and rid of naivety.
Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
You’ve seen us with clarity and kindness.
The non-humans bow to you.
We’ve been asked many a time,
‘Do you bow to Gotama the victor?’
And so we ought to declare:
‘We bow to Gotama the victor,
accomplished in knowledge and conduct!
We bow to Gotama the awakened!’
Where lovely Uttarakuru is,
and the beautiful Mount Meru,
humans born there
are unselfish, not possessive.
They do not sow the seed,
nor do they draw the plough.
The rice eaten by people
ripens in untilled soil,
free of powder or husk, pure,
fragrant, with only the rice-grain.
They eat that food
after cooking it in a ‘parrot’s beak’.
Having prepared a cow with hooves uncloven,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having prepared a beast with hooves uncloven,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having prepared a woman-drawn carriage,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having prepared a man-drawn carriage,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having prepared a girl-drawn carriage,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having prepared a boy-drawn carriage,
they’re drawn about from place to place.
Having ascended their vehicle,
that king’s servants
tour about in every quarter,
provided with vehicles,
elephant, horse, and divine.
And there are mansions and palanquins
for that great and glorious king.
And he has cities, too,
well-built in the sky:
Āṭānāṭā, Kusināṭā, Parakusināṭā,
Nāṭasuriyā, and Parakusiṭanāṭā.
To the north is Kapīvanta,
and Jonogha lies beyond.
And there’s Navanavutiya, Ambara-ambaravatiya,
and the royal capital named Āḷakamandā.
The Great King Kuvera, dear sir,
has a capital named Visāṇā,
which is why the great king
is called ‘Vessavaṇa’.
These each individually inform the King:
Tatolā, Tattalā, Tatotalā,
Ojasi, Tejasi, Tatojasi,
Sūra, Rājā, Ariṭṭha, and Nemi.
There is a lake there too named Dharaṇī,
from whence the clouds rain down,
and the rains disperse.
There is a hall there too named Bhagalavatī,
where the spirits frequent.
There the trees are ever in fruit,
with many different flocks of birds.
Peacocks and herons call out there,
and the sweet cuckoos too.
One bird cries out ‘Live, live!’,
another ‘Lift up your heart!’
There are cocks and kookaburras,
and in the wood the lotus-crane.
The parrots and mynah cry out there,
and the ‘little stick-boy’ birds.
Kuvera’s pond of rushes
is lovely all the time.
From here that is the northern quarter,
so the people say.
That quarter is warded
by a great king, glorious,
the lord of spirits;
his name is ‘Kuvera’.
He delights in song and dance,
honored by the spirits.
And he has many mighty sons
all of one name, so I’ve heard.
Eighty, and ten, and one—
all of them named Indra.
After seeing the Awakened One,
the Buddha, Kinsman of the Sun,
they revere him from afar,
the one great of heart and rid of naivety.
Homage to you, O thoroughbred!
Homage to you, supreme among men!
You’ve seen us with clarity and kindness.
The non-humans bow to you.
We’ve been asked many a time,
‘Do you bow to Gotama the victor?’
And so we ought to declare:
‘We bow to Gotama the victor,
accomplished in knowledge and conduct!
We bow to Gotama the awakened!’”
This, dear sir, is the Āṭānāṭiya protection for the guarding, protection, safety, and comfort of the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
The monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen should learn this Āṭānāṭiya protection well and completely memorize it.
If anyone who does so is approached while walking, standing, sitting, or lying down by any non-human being with malicious intent—including males, females, boys, girls, ministers, counselors, and servants among the spirits, fairies, goblins, and dragons—
that non-human will receive no homage or respect in any village or town.
And they will receive no ground or dwelling in my capital of Ālakamandā.
Nor will they get to go to the conference of the spirits.
In addition, the non-humans would not give or take them in marriage.
They’d heap personal abuse on them,
drop an empty bowl on their head,
and even split their head into seven pieces!
For there are, dear sir, non-humans who are fierce, cruel, and violent. They don’t obey the Great Kings or their men or their men’s men.
They’re said to be rebelling against the Great Kings.
They’re just like the bandits in the king of Magadha’s realm
who don’t obey the king, his men, or his men’s men,
and are said to be rebelling against the king.
If any non-human being with malicious intent—including males, females, boys, girls, ministers, counselors, and servants among the spirits, fairies, goblins, and dragons—approaches a monk, nun, layman, or laywoman while walking, standing, sitting, or lying down,
one ought to yell, cry, and scream to the spirits, great spirits, generals, great generals:
‘This spirit’s got me! This spirit’s entered me! This spirit’s annoying me! This spirit’s harassing me! This spirit’s hurting me! This spirit’s harming me! This spirit won’t let me go!’
To what spirits, great spirits, generals, great generals?
‘Indra, Soma, and Varuṇa,
Bhāradvāja, Pajāpati,
Candana and Kāmaseṭṭha,
Kinnughaṇḍu and Nighaṇḍu,
Panāda and Opamañña,
and Mātali, the god’s charioteer.
Cittasena the fairy,
and the kings Nala and Janesabha,
Sātāgira, Hemavata,
Puṇṇaka, Karatiya, and Guḷa;
Sivaka and Mucalinda,
Vessāmitta, Yugandhara,
Gopāla, Supparodha,
Hiri, Netti, and Mandiya;
Pañcālacaṇḍa, Āḷavaka,
Pajjunna, Sumana, Sumukha,
Dadhimukha, Maṇi, Māṇivara, Dīgha,
together with Serīsaka.’
This, dear sir, is the Āṭānāṭiya protection for the guarding, protection, safety, and comfort of the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
Well, now, dear sir, I must go. I have many duties, and much to do.”
“Please, Great Kings, go at your convenience.”
Then the Four Great Kings got up from their seats, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right side, before vanishing right there.
And before the other spirits present vanished, some bowed and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on their right side, some exchanged greetings and polite conversation, some held up their joined palms toward the Buddha, some announced their name and clan, while some kept silent.
The first recitation section is finished.
The Second Recitation Section
Then, when the night had passed, the Buddha told the mendicants all that had happened, repeating all the verses spoken. Then he added:
“Mendicants, learn the Āṭānāṭiya protection!
Memorize the Āṭānāṭiya protection!
Remember the Āṭānāṭiya protection!
The Āṭānāṭiya protection is beneficial, and is for the guarding, protection, safety, and comfort of the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Great Discourse on Causation
Dependent Origination
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Kurus, near the Kuru town named Kammāsadamma.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing,
in that this dependent origination is deep and appears deep, yet to me it seems as plain as can be.”
“Don’t say that, Ānanda, don’t say that!
This dependent origination is deep and appears deep.
It is because of not understanding and not penetrating this teaching that this population has become tangled like string, knotted like a ball of thread, and matted like rushes and reeds, and it doesn’t escape the places of loss, the bad places, the underworld, transmigration.
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for old age and death?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for old age and death?’ you should answer, ‘Rebirth is a condition for old age and death.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for rebirth?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for rebirth?’ you should answer, ‘Continued existence is a condition for rebirth.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for continued existence?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for continued existence?’ you should answer, ‘Grasping is a condition for continued existence.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for grasping?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for grasping?’ you should answer, ‘Craving is a condition for grasping.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for craving?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for craving?’ you should answer, ‘Feeling is a condition for craving.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for feeling?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for feeling?’ you should answer, ‘Contact is a condition for feeling.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for contact?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for contact?’ you should answer, ‘Name and form are conditions for contact.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for name and form?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for name and form?’ you should answer, ‘Consciousness is a condition for name and form.’
When asked, ‘Is there a specific condition for consciousness?’ you should answer, ‘There is.’
If they say, ‘What is a condition for consciousness?’ you should answer, ‘Name and form are conditions for consciousness.’
So: name and form are conditions for consciousness. Consciousness is a condition for name and form. Name and form are conditions for contact. Contact is a condition for feeling. Feeling is a condition for craving. Craving is a condition for grasping. Grasping is a condition for continued existence. Continued existence is a condition for rebirth. Rebirth is a condition for old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress to come to be.
That is how this entire mass of suffering originates.
‘Rebirth is a condition for old age and death’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no rebirth for anyone anywhere.
That is, there were no rebirth of sentient beings into their various realms—of gods, fairies, spirits, creatures, humans, quadrupeds, birds, or reptiles, each into their own realm.
When there’s no rebirth at all, with the cessation of rebirth, would old age and death still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of old age and death, namely rebirth.
‘Continued existence is a condition for rebirth’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no continued existence for anyone anywhere.
That is, continued existence in the sensual realm, the realm of luminous form, or the formless realm. When there’s no continued existence at all, with the cessation of continued existence, would rebirth still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of rebirth, namely continued existence.
‘Grasping is a condition for continued existence’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no grasping for anyone anywhere.
That is, grasping at sensual pleasures, views, precepts and observances, and theories of a self. When there’s no grasping at all, with the cessation of grasping, would continued existence still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of continued existence, namely grasping.
‘Craving is a condition for grasping’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no craving for anyone anywhere.
That is, craving for sights, sounds, smells, tastes, touches, and thoughts. When there’s no craving at all, with the cessation of craving, would grasping still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of grasping, namely craving.
‘Feeling is a condition for craving’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no feeling for anyone anywhere.
That is, feeling born of contact through the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind. When there’s no feeling at all, with the cessation of feeling, would craving still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of craving, namely feeling.
So it is, Ānanda, that feeling is a cause of craving. Craving is a cause of seeking. Seeking is a cause of gaining material possessions. Gaining material possessions is a cause of assessing. Assessing is a cause of desire and lust. Desire and lust is a cause of attachment. Attachment is a cause of possessiveness. Possessiveness is a cause of stinginess. Stinginess is a cause of safeguarding.
Owing to safeguarding, many bad, unskillful things come to be: taking up the rod and the sword, quarrels, arguments, and fights, accusations, divisive speech, and lies.
‘Owing to safeguarding, many bad, unskillful things come to be: taking up the rod and the sword, quarrels, arguments, and fights, accusations, divisive speech, and lies’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no safeguarding for anyone anywhere. When there’s no safeguarding at all, with the cessation of safeguarding, would those many bad, unskillful things still come to be?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition for the origination of those many bad, unskillful things, namely safeguarding.
‘Stinginess is a cause of safeguarding’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no stinginess for anyone anywhere. When there’s no stinginess at all, with the cessation of stinginess, would safeguarding still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of safeguarding, namely stinginess.
‘Possessiveness is a cause of stinginess’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no possessiveness for anyone anywhere. When there’s no possessiveness at all, with the cessation of possessiveness, would stinginess still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of stinginess, namely possessiveness.
‘Attachment is a cause of possessiveness’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no attachment for anyone anywhere. When there’s no attachment at all, with the cessation of attachment, would possessiveness still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of possessiveness, namely attachment.
‘Desire and lust is a cause of attachment’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no desire and lust for anyone anywhere. When there’s no desire and lust at all, with the cessation of desire and lust, would attachment still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of attachment, namely desire and lust.
‘Assessing is a cause of desire and lust’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no assessing for anyone anywhere. When there’s no assessing at all, with the cessation of assessing, would desire and lust still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of desire and lust, namely assessing.
‘Gaining material possessions is a cause of assessing’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no gaining of material possessions for anyone anywhere. When there’s no gaining of material possessions at all, with the cessation of gaining material possessions, would assessing still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of assessing, namely the gaining of material possessions.
‘Seeking is a cause of gaining material possessions’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no seeking for anyone anywhere. When there’s no seeking at all, with the cessation of seeking, would the gaining of material possessions still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of gaining material possessions, namely seeking.
‘Craving is a cause of seeking’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no craving for anyone anywhere.
That is, craving for sensual pleasures, craving for continued existence, and craving to end existence. When there’s no craving at all, with the cessation of craving, would seeking still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of seeking, namely craving.
And so, Ānanda, these two things are united by the two aspects of feeling.
‘Contact is a condition for feeling’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were totally and utterly no contact for anyone anywhere.
That is, contact through the eye, ear, nose, tongue, body, and mind. When there’s no contact at all, with the cessation of contact, would feeling still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of feeling, namely contact.
‘Name and form are conditions for contact’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
Suppose there were none of the features, attributes, signs, and details by which the category of mental phenomena is found. Would linguistic contact still be found in the category of physical phenomena?”
“No, sir.”
“Suppose there were none of the features, attributes, signs, and details by which the category of physical phenomena is found. Would impingement contact still be found in the category of mental phenomena?”
“No, sir.”
“Suppose there were none of the features, attributes, signs, and details by which the categories of mental or physical phenomena are found. Would either linguistic contact or impingement contact still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“Suppose there were none of the features, attributes, signs, and details by which name and form are found. Would contact still be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of contact, namely name and form.
‘Consciousness is a condition for name and form’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
If consciousness were not conceived in the mother’s womb, would name and form coagulate there?”
“No, sir.”
“If consciousness, after being conceived in the mother’s womb, were to be miscarried, would name and form be born into this state of existence?”
“No, sir.”
“If the consciousness of a young boy or girl were to be cut off, would name and form achieve growth, increase, and maturity?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of name and form, namely consciousness.
‘Name and form are conditions for consciousness’—that’s what I said. And this is a way to understand how this is so.
If consciousness were not to become established in name and form, would the coming to be of the origin of suffering—of rebirth, old age, and death in the future—be found?”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why this is the cause, source, origin, and condition of consciousness, namely name and form.
This is the extent to which one may be reborn, grow old, die, pass away, or reappear.
This is how far the scope of language, terminology, and description extends; how far the sphere of wisdom extends; how far the cycle of rebirths proceeds so that this state of existence is to be found; namely, name and form together with consciousness.
Describing the Self
How do those who describe the self describe it?
They describe it as physical and limited:
‘My self is physical and limited.’
Or they describe it as physical and infinite:
‘My self is physical and infinite.’
Or they describe it as formless and limited:
‘My self is formless and limited.’
Or they describe it as formless and infinite:
‘My self is formless and infinite.’
Now, take those who describe the self as physical and limited.
They describe the self as physical and limited in the present; or in some future life; or else they think: ‘Though it is not like that, I will ensure it is provided with what it needs to become like that.’
This being so, it’s appropriate to say that a view of self as physical and limited underlies them.
Now, take those who describe the self as physical and infinite …
formless and limited …
formless and infinite.
They describe the self as formless and infinite in the present; or in some future life; or else they think: ‘Though it is not like that, I will ensure it is provided with what it needs to become like that.’
This being so, it’s appropriate to say that a view of self as formless and infinite underlies them.
That’s how those who describe the self describe it.
Not Describing the Self
How do those who don’t describe the self not describe it?
They don’t describe it as physical and limited …
physical and infinite …
formless and limited …
formless and infinite:
‘My self is formless and infinite.’
Now, take those who don’t describe the self as physical and limited …
physical and infinite …
formless and limited …
formless and infinite.
They don’t describe the self as formless and infinite in the present; or in some future life; and they don’t think: ‘Though it is not like that, I will ensure it is provided with what it needs to become like that.’
This being so, it’s appropriate to say that a view of self as formless and infinite doesn’t underlie them.
That’s how those who don’t describe the self don’t describe it.
Regarding a Self
How do those who regard the self regard it?
They regard feeling as self:
‘Feeling is my self.’
Or they regard it like this: ‘Feeling is definitely not my self. My self does not experience feeling.’
Or they regard it like this: ‘Feeling is definitely not my self. But it’s not that my self does not experience feeling. My self feels, for my self is liable to feel.’
Now, as to those who say:
‘Feeling is my self.’
You should say this to them:
‘Reverend, there are three feelings:
pleasant, painful, and neutral.
Which one of these do you regard as self?’
Ānanda, at a time when you feel a pleasant feeling, you don’t feel a painful or neutral feeling;
you only feel a pleasant feeling.
At a time when you feel a painful feeling, you don’t feel a pleasant or neutral feeling;
you only feel a painful feeling.
At a time when you feel a neutral feeling, you don’t feel a pleasant or painful feeling;
you only feel a neutral feeling.
Pleasant feelings, painful feelings, and neutral feelings are all impermanent, conditioned, dependently originated, liable to end, vanish, fade away, and cease.
When feeling a pleasant feeling they think: ‘This is my self.’
When their pleasant feeling ceases they think: ‘My self has disappeared.’
When feeling a painful feeling they think: ‘This is my self.’
When their painful feeling ceases they think: ‘My self has disappeared.’
When feeling a neutral feeling they think: ‘This is my self.’
When their neutral feeling ceases they think: ‘My self has disappeared.’
So those who say ‘feeling is my self’ regard as self that which is evidently impermanent, a mixture of pleasure and pain, and liable to rise and fall.
That’s why it’s not acceptable to regard feeling as self.
Now, as to those who say:
‘Feeling is definitely not my self. My self does not experience feeling.’ You should say this to them,
‘But reverend, where there is nothing felt at all, would the thought “I am” occur there?’”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why it’s not acceptable to regard self as that which does not experience feeling.
Now, as to those who say:
‘Feeling is definitely not my self. But it’s not that my self does not experience feeling. My self feels, for my self is liable to feel.’
You should say this to them,
‘Suppose feelings were to totally and utterly cease without anything left over.
When there’s no feeling at all, with the cessation of feeling, would the thought “I am this” occur there?’”
“No, sir.”
“That’s why it’s not acceptable to regard self as that which is liable to feel.
Not regarding anything in this way, they don’t grasp at anything in the world.
Not grasping, they’re not anxious. Not being anxious, they personally become extinguished.
They understand: ‘Rebirth is ended, the spiritual journey has been completed, what had to be done has been done, there is no return to any state of existence.’
It wouldn’t be appropriate to say that a mendicant whose mind is freed like this holds the following views:
‘A Realized One exists after death’;
‘A Realized One doesn’t exist after death’;
‘A Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death’;
‘A Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death’.
Why is that?
A mendicant is freed by directly knowing this: how far language and the scope of language extend; how far terminology and the scope of terminology extend; how far description and the scope of description extend; how far wisdom and the sphere of wisdom extend; how far the cycle of rebirths and its continuation extend. It wouldn’t be appropriate to say that a mendicant freed by directly knowing this holds the view: ‘There is no such thing as knowing and seeing.’
Planes of Consciousness
Ānanda, there are seven planes of consciousness and two dimensions.
What seven?
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and diverse in perception, such as human beings, some gods, and some beings in the underworld.
This is the first plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are diverse in body and unified in perception, such as the gods reborn in Brahmā’s Host through the first absorption.
This is the second plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and diverse in perception, such as the gods of streaming radiance.
This is the third plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that are unified in body and unified in perception, such as the gods replete with glory.
This is the fourth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond perceptions of form. With the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fifth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite space. Aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they have been reborn in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the sixth plane of consciousness.
There are sentient beings that have gone totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness. Aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they have been reborn in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the seventh plane of consciousness.
Then there’s the dimension of non-percipient beings, and secondly, the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Now, regarding these seven planes of consciousness and two dimensions,
is it appropriate for someone who understands them—and their origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape—to take pleasure in them?”
“No, sir.”
“When a mendicant, having truly understood the origin, ending, gratification, drawback, and escape regarding these seven planes of consciousness and these two dimensions, is freed by not grasping, they’re called a mendicant who is freed by wisdom.
The Eight Liberations
Ānanda, there are these eight liberations.
What eight?
Having physical form, they see visions.
This is the first liberation.
Not perceiving form internally, they see visions externally.
This is the second liberation.
They’re focused only on beauty.
This is the third liberation.
Going totally beyond perceptions of form, with the ending of perceptions of impingement, not focusing on perceptions of diversity, aware that ‘space is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite space.
This is the fourth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite space, aware that ‘consciousness is infinite’, they enter and remain in the dimension of infinite consciousness.
This is the fifth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of infinite consciousness, aware that ‘there is nothing at all’, they enter and remain in the dimension of nothingness.
This is the sixth liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of nothingness, they enter and remain in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
This is the seventh liberation.
Going totally beyond the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, they enter and remain in the cessation of perception and feeling.
This is the eighth liberation.
These are the eight liberations.
When a mendicant enters into and withdraws from these eight liberations—in forward order, in reverse order, and in forward and reverse order—wherever they wish, whenever they wish, and for as long as they wish;
and when they realize the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements, they’re called a mendicant who is freed both ways.
And, Ānanda, there is no other freedom both ways that is better or finer than this.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, Venerable Ānanda was happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
An Impressive Discourse
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Sakyans in a stilt longhouse in a mango grove belonging to the Sakyan family named Vedhañña.
Now at that time the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta had recently passed away at Pāvā.
With his passing the Jain ascetics split, dividing into two factions, arguing, quarreling, and fighting, continually wounding each other with barbed words:
“You don’t understand this teaching and training. I understand this teaching and training. What, you understand this teaching and training?
You’re practicing wrong.
I’m practicing right.
I stay on topic, you don’t.
You said last what you should have said first. You said first what you should have said last. What you’ve thought so much about has been disproved. Your doctrine is refuted. Go on, save your doctrine! You’re trapped; get yourself out of this—if you can!”
You’d think there was nothing but slaughter going on among the Jain ascetics.
And the Nigaṇṭha Nātaputta’s white-clothed lay disciples were disillusioned, dismayed, and disappointed in the Jain ascetics. They were equally disappointed with a teaching and training so poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha, with broken monument and without a refuge.
And then, after completing the rainy season residence near Pāvā, the novice Cunda went to see Venerable Ānanda at Sāma village.
He bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
Ānanda said to him,
“Reverend Cunda, we should see the Buddha about this matter.
Come, let’s go to the Buddha and tell him about this.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Cunda.
Then Ānanda and Cunda went to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and told him what had happened.
The Teaching of the Unawakened
“That’s what happens, Cunda, when a teaching and training is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
Take the case where a teacher is not awakened, and the teaching is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
A disciple in that teaching does not practice in line with the teachings, does not practice following that procedure, does not live in line with the teaching. They proceed having turned away from that teaching.
You should say this to them,
‘You’re fortunate, reverend, you’re so very fortunate!
For your teacher is not awakened, and their teaching is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
But you don’t practice in line with that teaching, you don’t practice following that procedure, you don’t live in line with the teaching. You proceed having turned away from that teaching.’
In such a case the teacher and the teaching are to blame, but the disciple deserves praise.
Suppose someone was to say to such a disciple,
‘Come on, venerable, practice as taught and pointed out by your teacher.’
The one who encourages, the one who they encourage, and the one who practices accordingly all make much bad karma.
Why is that?
It’s because that teaching and training is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
Take the case where a teacher is not awakened, and the teaching is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
A disciple in that teaching practices in line with the teachings, practices following that procedure, lives in line with the teaching. They proceed having undertaken that teaching.
You should say this to them,
‘It’s your loss, reverend, it’s your misfortune! For your teacher is not awakened, and their teaching is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
And you practice in line with that teaching, you practice following that procedure, you live in line with the teaching. You proceed having undertaken that teaching.’
In such a case the teacher, the teaching, and the disciple are all to blame.
Suppose someone was to say to such a disciple,
‘Clearly the venerable is practicing methodically and will succeed in completing that method.’
The one who praises, the one who they praise, and the one who, being praised, rouses up even more energy all make much bad karma.
Why is that?
It’s because that teaching and training is poorly explained and poorly propounded, not emancipating, not leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is not a fully awakened Buddha.
The Teaching of the Awakened
Take the case where a teacher is awakened, and the teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
A disciple in that teaching does not practice in line with the teachings, does not practice following that procedure, does not live in line with the teaching. They proceed having turned away from that teaching.
You should say this to them,
‘It’s your loss, reverend, it’s your misfortune! For your teacher is awakened, and their teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
But you don’t practice in line with that teaching, you don’t practice following that procedure, you don’t live in line with the teaching. You proceed having turned away from that teaching.’
In such a case the teacher and the teaching deserve praise, but the disciple is to blame.
Suppose someone was to say to such a disciple,
‘Come on, venerable, practice as taught and pointed out by your teacher.’
The one who encourages, the one who they encourage, and the one who practices accordingly all make much merit.
Why is that?
It’s because that teaching and training is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
Take the case where a teacher is awakened, and the teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
A disciple in that teaching practices in line with the teachings, practices following that procedure, lives in line with the teaching. They proceed having undertaken that teaching.
You should say this to them,
‘You’re fortunate, reverend, you’re so very fortunate!
For your teacher is awakened, and their teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
And you practice in line with that teaching, you practice following that procedure, you live in line with the teaching. You proceed having undertaken that teaching.’
In such a case the teacher, the teaching, and the disciple all deserve praise.
Suppose someone was to say to such a disciple,
‘Clearly the venerable is practicing methodically and will succeed in completing that method.’
The one who praises, the one who they praise, and the one who, being praised, rouses up even more energy all make much merit.
Why is that?
It’s because that teaching and training is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is a fully awakened Buddha.
When Disciples Have Regrets
Take the case where a teacher arises in the world who is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha. The teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is fully awakened.
But the disciples haven’t inquired about the meaning of that good teaching. And the spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure has not been disclosed and revealed to them with all its collected sayings, with its demonstrable basis, well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
And then their teacher passes away.
When such a teacher has passed away the disciples are tormented by regrets.
Why is that?
They think: ‘Our teacher was perfected, a fully awakened Buddha. His teaching was well explained, but we didn’t inquire about the meaning, and the spiritual practice was not fully disclosed to us.
And then our teacher passed away.’
When such a teacher has passed away the disciples are tormented by regrets.
When Disciples Have No Regrets
Take the case where a teacher arises in the world who is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha.
The teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is fully awakened.
The disciples have inquired about the meaning of that good teaching. And the spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure has been disclosed and revealed to them with all its collected sayings, with its demonstrable basis, well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
And then their teacher passes away.
When such a teacher has passed away the disciples are free of regrets.
Why is that?
They think: ‘Our teacher was perfected, a fully awakened Buddha.
His teaching was well explained,
we inquired about the meaning, and the spiritual practice was fully disclosed to us.
And then our teacher passed away.’
When such a teacher has passed away the disciples are free of regrets.
On the Incomplete Spiritual Path, Etc.
Now suppose, Cunda, that a spiritual path possesses those factors. But the teacher is not senior, long standing, long gone forth, advanced in years, and reached the final stage of life.
Then that spiritual path is incomplete in that respect.
But when a spiritual path possesses those factors and the teacher is senior,
then that spiritual path is complete in that respect.
Now suppose that a spiritual path possesses those factors and the teacher is senior. But there are no senior monk disciples who are competent, educated, assured, have attained sanctuary,
who can rightly explain the true teaching, and who can legitimately and completely refute the doctrines of others that come up, and teach with a demonstrable basis.
Then that spiritual path is incomplete in that respect.
But when a spiritual path possesses those factors and the teacher is senior and there are competent senior monks,
then that spiritual path is complete in that respect.
Now suppose that a spiritual path possesses those factors and the teacher is senior and there are competent senior monks.
But there are no competent middle monks,
junior monks,
senior nuns,
middle nuns,
junior nuns,
celibate white-clothed laymen,
white-clothed laymen enjoying sensual pleasures,
celibate white-clothed laywomen,
white-clothed laywomen enjoying sensual pleasures. …
There are white-clothed laywomen enjoying sensual pleasures, but the spiritual path is not successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans …
the spiritual path is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans, but it has not reached the peak of material possessions and fame.
Then that spiritual path is incomplete in that respect.
But when a spiritual path possesses those factors and the teacher is senior and there are competent senior monks,
middle monks,
junior monks,
senior nuns,
middle nuns,
junior nuns,
celibate laymen,
laymen enjoying sensual pleasures,
celibate laywomen,
laywomen enjoying sensual pleasures,
and the spiritual path is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans, and it has reached the peak of material possessions and fame,
then that spiritual path is complete in that respect.
I, Cunda, am a teacher who has arisen in the world today, perfected and fully awakened.
The teaching is well explained and well propounded, emancipating, leading to peace, proclaimed by someone who is fully awakened.
My disciples have inquired about the meaning of that good teaching. And the spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure has been disclosed and revealed to them with all its collected sayings, with its demonstrable basis, well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
I am a teacher today who is senior, long standing, long gone forth, advanced in years, and have reached the final stage of life.
I have today disciples who are competent senior monks,
middle monks,
junior monks,
senior nuns,
middle nuns,
junior nuns,
celibate laymen,
laymen enjoying sensual pleasures,
celibate laywomen,
and laywomen enjoying sensual pleasures.
Today my spiritual life is successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
Of all the teachers in the world today, Cunda, I don’t see even a single one who has reached the peak of material possessions and fame like me.
Of all the spiritual communities and groups in the world today, Cunda, I don’t see even a single one who has reached the pinnacle of material possessions and fame like the mendicant Saṅgha.
And if there’s any spiritual path of which it may be rightly said that
it’s endowed with all good qualities, complete in all good qualities, neither too little nor too much, well explained, whole, full, and well propounded,
it’s of this spiritual path that this should be said.
Uddaka, son of Rāma, used to say:
‘Seeing, one does not see.’
But seeing what does one not see?
You can see the blade of a well-sharpened razor, but not the edge.
Thus it is said:
‘Seeing, one does not see.’
But that saying of Uddaka’s is low, crude, ordinary, ignoble, and pointless, as it’s only concerning a razor.
If there’s anything of which it may be rightly said:
‘Seeing, one does not see,’ it’s of this that it should be said.
Seeing what does one not see?
One sees this: a spiritual path endowed with all good qualities, complete in all good qualities, neither too little nor too much, well explained, whole, full, and well propounded.
One does not see this: anything that, were it to be removed, would make it purer.
One does not see this: anything that, were it to be added, would make it more complete.
Thus it is rightly said:
‘Seeing, one does not see.’
Teachings Should be Recited in Concert
So, Cunda, you should all come together and recite in concert, without disputing, those things I have taught you from my direct knowledge, comparing meaning with meaning and phrasing with phrasing, so that this spiritual path may last for a long time. That would be for the welfare and happiness of the people, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
And what are those things I have taught from my direct knowledge?
They are the four kinds of mindfulness meditation, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven awakening factors, and the noble eightfold path.
These are the things I have taught from my own direct knowledge.
Reaching Agreement
Suppose one of those spiritual companions who is training in harmony and mutual appreciation, without fighting, were to recite the teaching in the Saṅgha.
Now, you might think,
‘This venerable misconstrues the meaning and mistakes the phrasing.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss them, but say,
‘Reverend, if this is the meaning, the phrasing may either be this or that: which is more fitting? And if this is the phrasing, the meaning may be either this or that: which is more fitting?’
Suppose they reply,
‘This phrasing fits the meaning better than that. And this meaning fits the phrasing better than that.’
Without flattering or rebuking them, you should carefully convince them by examining that meaning and that phrasing.
Suppose another spiritual companion were to recite the teaching in the Saṅgha.
Now, you might think,
‘This venerable misconstrues the meaning but gets the phrasing right.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss them, but say,
‘Reverend, if this is the phrasing, the meaning may be either this or that: which is more fitting?’
Suppose they reply,
‘This meaning fits the phrasing better than that.’
Without flattering or rebuking, you should carefully convince them by examining that meaning.
Suppose another spiritual companion were to recite the teaching in the Saṅgha.
Now, you might think,
‘This venerable construes the meaning correctly but mistakes the phrasing.’
You should neither approve nor dismiss them, but say,
‘Reverend, if this is the meaning, the phrasing may be either this or that: which is more fitting?’
Suppose they reply,
‘This phrasing fits the meaning better than that.’
Without flattering or rebuking, you should carefully convince them by examining that phrasing.
Suppose another spiritual companion were to recite the teaching in the Saṅgha.
Now, you might think,
‘This venerable construes the meaning correctly and gets the phrasing right.’
Saying ‘Good!’ you should applaud and cheer that mendicant’s statement,
and then say to them,
‘We are fortunate, reverend, so very fortunate
to see a venerable such as yourself, so well-versed in the meaning and the phrasing, as one of our spiritual companions!’
The Reasons for Allowing Requisites
Cunda, I do not teach you solely for restraining defilements that affect the present life.
Nor do I teach solely for protecting against defilements that affect lives to come.
I teach both for restraining defilements that affect the present life and
protecting against defilements that affect lives to come.
And that’s why I have allowed robes for you that suffice
only for the sake of warding off cold and heat; for warding off the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and reptiles; and for covering up the private parts.
I have allowed alms-food for you that suffices
only to sustain this body, avoid harm, and support spiritual practice; so that you will put an end to old discomfort and not give rise to new discomfort, and will keep on living blamelessly and at ease.
I have allowed lodgings for you that suffice
only for the sake of warding off cold and heat; for warding off the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and reptiles; to shelter from harsh weather and to enjoy retreat.
I have allowed medicines and supplies for the sick for you that suffice
only for the sake of warding off the pains of illness and to promote good health.
Indulgence in Pleasure
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘The ascetics who follow the Sakyan live indulging in pleasure.’
You should say to them,
‘What is that indulgence in pleasure?
For there are many different kinds of indulgence in pleasure.’
These four kinds of indulgence in pleasure, Cunda, are low, crude, ordinary, ignoble, and pointless. They don’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
What four?
It’s when some fool makes themselves happy and pleased by killing living creatures.
This is the first kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, someone makes themselves happy and pleased by theft.
This is the second kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, someone makes themselves happy and pleased by lying.
This is the third kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, someone amuses themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
This is the fourth kind of indulgence in pleasure.
These are the four kinds of indulgence in pleasure that are low, crude, ordinary, ignoble, and pointless. They don’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘The ascetics who follow the Sakyan live indulging in pleasure in these four ways.’
They should be told, ‘Not so!’
It isn’t right to say that about you; it misrepresents you with an untruth.
These four kinds of indulgence in pleasure, when developed and cultivated, lead solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
This is the first kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption. It has the rapture and bliss born of immersion, with internal clarity and confidence, and unified mind, without placing the mind and keeping it connected.
This is the second kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, with the fading away of rapture, a mendicant enters and remains in the third absorption. They meditate with equanimity, mindful and aware, personally experiencing the bliss of which the noble ones declare, ‘Equanimous and mindful, one meditates in bliss.’
This is the third kind of indulgence in pleasure.
Furthermore, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, a mendicant enters and remains in the fourth absorption. It is without pleasure or pain, with pure equanimity and mindfulness.
This is the fourth kind of indulgence in pleasure.
These are the four kinds of indulgence in pleasure which, when developed and cultivated, lead solely to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment.
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘The ascetics who follow the Sakyan live indulging in pleasure in these four ways.’
They should be told, ‘Exactly so!’
It’s right to say that about you; it doesn’t misrepresent you with an untruth.
The Benefits of Indulgence in Pleasure
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘How many fruits and benefits may be expected by those who live indulging in pleasure in these four ways?’
You should say to them,
‘Four benefits may be expected by those who live indulging in pleasure in these four ways.
What four?
Firstly, with the ending of three fetters a mendicant becomes a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
This is the first fruit and benefit.
Furthermore, a mendicant—with the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion—becomes a once-returner. They come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
This is the second fruit and benefit.
Furthermore, with the ending of the five lower fetters, a mendicant is reborn spontaneously and will become extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
This is the third fruit and benefit.
Furthermore, a mendicant realizes the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and lives having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
This is the fourth fruit and benefit.
These four benefits may be expected by those who live indulging in pleasure in these four ways.’
Things Impossible for the Perfected
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘The ascetics who follow the Sakyan are inconsistent.’
You should say to them,
‘Reverends, these things have been taught and pointed out for his disciples by the Blessed One, who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, not to be transgressed so long as life lasts.
Suppose there was a boundary pillar or an iron pillar with deep foundations, firmly embedded, imperturbable and unshakable.
In the same way, these things have been taught and pointed out for his disciples by the Blessed One, who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, not to be transgressed so long as life lasts.
A mendicant who is perfected—with defilements ended, who has completed the spiritual journey, done what had to be done, laid down the burden, achieved their own true goal, utterly ended the fetters of rebirth, and is rightly freed through enlightenment—can’t transgress in nine respects.
A mendicant with defilements ended can’t deliberately take the life of a living creature, take something with the intention to steal, have sex, tell a deliberate lie, or store up goods for their own enjoyment like they did as a lay person. And they can’t make decisions prejudiced by favoritism, hostility, stupidity, or cowardice.
A mendicant who is perfected can’t transgress in these nine respects.’
Questions and Answers
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘The ascetic Gotama demonstrates boundless knowledge and vision of the past, but not of the future. What’s up with that?’
Those wanderers, like incompetent fools, seem to imagine that one kind of knowledge and vision can be demonstrated by means of another kind of knowledge and vision.
Regarding the past, the Realized One has knowledge stemming from memory.
He recollects as far as he wants.
Regarding the future, the Realized One has the knowledge born of awakening:
‘This is my last rebirth. Now there are no more future lives.’
If a question about the past is untrue, false, and pointless, the Realized One does not reply.
If a question about the past is true and substantive, but pointless, he does not reply.
If a question about the past is true, substantive, and beneficial, he knows the right time to reply.
And the Realized One replies to questions about the future or the present in the same way.
And so the Realized One has speech that’s well-timed, true, meaningful, in line with the teaching and training. That’s why he’s called the ‘Realized One’.
In this world—with its gods, Māras, and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, its gods and humans—whatever is seen, heard, thought, known, sought, and explored by the mind, all that has been understood by the Realized One.
That’s why he’s called the ‘Realized One’.
From the night when the Realized One understands the supreme perfect awakening until the night he becomes fully extinguished—through the natural principle of extinguishment, without anything left over—everything he speaks, says, and expresses is real, not otherwise.
That’s why he’s called the ‘Realized One’.
The Realized One does as he says, and says as he does.
Since this is so, that’s why he’s called the ‘Realized One’.
In this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—the Realized One is the undefeated, the champion, the universal seer, the wielder of power.
The Undeclared Points
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘Is this your view: “A Realized One exists after death. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly”?’
You should say to them,
‘Reverend, this has not been declared by the Buddha.’
The wanderers might say,
‘Then is this your view: “A Realized One doesn’t exist after death. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly”?’
You should say to them,
‘This too has not been declared by the Buddha.’
The wanderers might say,
‘Then is this your view: “A Realized One both exists and doesn’t exist after death. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly”?’
You should say to them,
‘This too has not been declared by the Buddha.’
The wanderers might say,
‘Then is this your view: “A Realized One neither exists nor doesn’t exist after death. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly”?’
You should say to them,
‘This too has not been declared by the Buddha.’
The wanderers might say,
‘But why has this not been declared by the ascetic Gotama?’
You should say to them,
‘Because it’s not beneficial or relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life. It doesn’t lead to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment. That’s why it hasn’t been declared by the Buddha.’
The Declared Points
It’s possible that wanderers who follow other paths might say,
‘But what has been declared by the ascetic Gotama?’
You should say to them,
‘What has been declared by the Buddha is this: “This is suffering”—“This is the origin of suffering”—“This is the cessation of suffering”—“This is the practice that leads to the cessation of suffering.”’
The wanderers might say,
‘But why has this been declared by the ascetic Gotama?’
You should say to them,
‘Because it’s beneficial and relevant to the fundamentals of the spiritual life.
It leads to disillusionment, dispassion, cessation, peace, insight, awakening, and extinguishment. That’s why it has been declared by the Buddha.’
Views of the Past
Cunda, I have explained to you as they should be explained the views that some rely on regarding the past.
Shall I explain them to you in the wrong way?
I have explained to you as they should be explained the views that some rely on regarding the future.
Shall I explain them to you in the wrong way?
What are the views that some rely on regarding the past?
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘The self and the cosmos are eternal. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.’
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘The self and the cosmos are not eternal,
or both eternal and not eternal,
or neither eternal nor not eternal.
The self and the cosmos are made by oneself,
or made by another,
or made by both oneself and another,
or they have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another.
Pleasure and pain are eternal,
or not eternal,
or both eternal and not eternal,
or neither eternal nor not eternal.
Pleasure and pain are made by oneself,
or made by another,
or made by both oneself and another,
or they have arisen by chance, not made by oneself or another. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.’
Regarding this, I go up to the ascetics and brahmins whose view is that
the self and the cosmos are eternal,
‘Reverends, is this what you say,
“The self and the cosmos are eternal”?’
But when they say, ‘Yes!
This is the only truth, other ideas are silly,’
I don’t acknowledge that.
Why is that?
Because there are beings who have different opinions on this topic.
I don’t see any such expositions that are equal to my own, still less superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher exposition.
Regarding this, I go up to the ascetics and brahmins who assert all the other views as described above.
And in each case, I don’t acknowledge that.
Why is that?
Because there are beings who have different opinions on this topic.
I don’t see any such expositions that are equal to my own, still less superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher exposition.
These are the views that some rely on regarding the past.
Views of the Future
What are the views that some rely on regarding the future?
There are some ascetics and brahmins who have this doctrine and view:
‘The self is physical and sound after death,
or it is non-physical,
or both physical and non-physical,
or neither physical nor non-physical,
or percipient,
or non-percipient,
or neither percipient nor non-percipient,
or the self is annihilated and destroyed when the body breaks up, and doesn’t exist after death. This is the only truth, other ideas are silly.’
Regarding this, I go up to the ascetics and brahmins whose view is that
the self is physical and sound after death,
‘Reverends, is this what you say,
“The self is physical and sound after death”?’
But when they say, ‘Yes!
This is the only truth, other ideas are silly,’
I don’t acknowledge that.
Why is that?
Because there are beings who have different opinions on this topic.
I don’t see any such expositions that are equal to my own, still less superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher exposition.
Regarding this, I go up to the ascetics and brahmins who assert all the other views as described above.
And in each case, I don’t acknowledge that.
Why is that?
Because there are beings who have different opinions on this topic.
I don’t see any such expositions that are equal to my own, still less superior.
Rather, I am the one who is superior when it comes to the higher exposition.
These are the views that some rely on regarding the future, which I have explained to you as they should be explained.
Shall I explain them to you in the wrong way?
I have taught and pointed out the four kinds of mindfulness meditation for giving up and going beyond all these views of the past and the future.
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
These are the four kinds of mindfulness meditation that I have taught for giving up and going beyond all these views of the past and the future.”
Now at that time Venerable Upavāṇa was standing behind the Buddha fanning him.
He said to the Buddha,
“It’s incredible, sir, it’s amazing!
This exposition of the teaching is impressive, sir,
it is very impressive. Sir, what is the name of this exposition of the teaching?”
“Well, Upavāṇa, you may remember this exposition of the teaching as ‘The Impressive Discourse’.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, Venerable Upavāṇa was happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
With Kūṭadanta
The Brahmins and Householders of Khāṇumata
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Magadhans together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants when he arrived at a village of the Magadhan brahmins named Khāṇumata.
There he stayed nearby at Ambalaṭṭhikā.
Now at that time the brahmin Kūṭadanta was living in Khāṇumata. It was a crown property given by King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
Now at that time Kūṭadanta had prepared a great sacrifice.
Bulls, bullocks, heifers, goats and rams—seven hundred of each—had been led to the post for the sacrifice.
The brahmins and householders of Khāṇumataka heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Khāṇumataka and is staying in a forest nearby.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then, having departed Khāṇumataka, they formed into companies and headed to Ambalaṭṭhikā.
Now at that time the brahmin Kūṭadanta had retired to the upper floor of his stilt longhouse for his midday nap.
He saw the brahmins and householders heading for Ambalaṭṭhikā,
and addressed his steward,
“My steward, why are the brahmins and householders headed for Ambalaṭṭhikā?”
“The ascetic Gotama has arrived at Khāṇumataka and is staying at Ambalaṭṭhikā.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
They’re going to see that Master Gotama.”
Then Kūṭadanta thought,
“I’ve heard that
the ascetic Gotama knows how to accomplish the sacrifice with three modes and sixteen accessories.
I don’t know about that,
but I wish to perform a great sacrifice.
Why don’t I ask him how to accomplish the sacrifice with three modes and sixteen accessories?”
Then Kūṭadanta addressed his steward,
“Well then, go to the brahmins and householders and say to them:
‘Sirs, the brahmin Kūṭadanta asks
you to wait, as he will also go to see the ascetic Gotama.’”
“Yes, sir,” replied the steward, and did as he was asked.
The Qualities of Kūṭadanta
Now at that time several hundred brahmins were residing in Khāṇumata
thinking to participate in Kūṭadanta’s sacrifice.
They heard that
Kūṭadanta was going to see the ascetic Gotama.
They approached Kūṭadanta and said to him:
“Is it really true that you are going to see the ascetic Gotama?”
“Yes, gentlemen, it is true.”
“Please don’t!
It’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama.
For if you do so, your reputation will diminish and his will increase.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.
You are well born on both your mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.
You’re rich, affluent, and wealthy, with lots of property and assets, and lots of money and grain …
You recite and remember the hymns, and have mastered the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. You know philology and grammar, and are well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man. …
You are attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. You are magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold. …
You are ethical, mature in ethical conduct. …
You’re a good speaker, with a polished, clear, and articulate voice that expresses the meaning. …
You teach the teachers of many, and teach three hundred students to recite the hymns. Many students come from various districts and countries for the sake of the hymns, wishing to learn the hymns. …
You’re old, elderly and senior, advanced in years, and have reached the final stage of life.
The ascetic Gotama is young, and has newly gone forth. …
You’re honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by King Bimbisāra of Magadha …
and the brahmin Pokkharasāti. …
You live in Khāṇumata, a crown property given by King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for you to go to see the ascetic Gotama;
it’s appropriate that he comes to see you.”
The Qualities of the Buddha
When they had spoken, Kūṭadanta said to those brahmins:
“Well then, gentlemen, listen to why it’s appropriate for me to go to see the ascetic Gotama,
and it’s not appropriate for him to come to see me.
He is well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
For this reason it’s not appropriate for the ascetic Gotama to come to see me;
rather, it’s appropriate for me to go to see him.
When he went forth he abandoned a large family circle. …
When he went forth he abandoned abundant gold coin and bullion stored in dungeons and towers. …
He went forth from the lay life to homelessness while still a youth, young, black-haired, blessed with youth, in the prime of life. …
Though his mother and father wished otherwise, weeping with tearful faces, he shaved off his hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness. …
He is attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. He is magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold. …
He is ethical, possessing ethical conduct that is noble and skillful. …
He’s a good speaker, with a polished, clear, and articulate voice that expresses the meaning. …
He’s a teacher of teachers. …
He has ended sensual desire, and is rid of caprice. …
He teaches the efficacy of deeds and action. He doesn’t wish any harm upon the community of brahmins. …
He went forth from an eminent family of unbroken aristocratic lineage. …
He went forth from a rich, affluent, and wealthy family. …
People come from distant lands and distant countries to question him. …
Many thousands of deities have gone for refuge for life to him. …
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’ …
He has the thirty-two marks of a great man. …
He is welcoming, congenial, polite, smiling, open, the first to speak. …
He’s honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by the four assemblies. …
Many gods and humans are devoted to him. …
While he is residing in a village or town, non-human entities do not harass them. …
He leads an order and a community, and teaches a community, and is said to be the best of the various religious founders. He didn’t come by his fame in the same ways as those other ascetics and brahmins.
Rather, he came by his fame due to his supreme knowledge and conduct. …
King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
King Pasenadi of Kosala and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
The brahmin Pokkharasāti and his wives and children have gone for refuge for life to the ascetic Gotama. …
He’s honored, respected, revered, venerated, and esteemed by King Bimbisāra of Magadha …
King Pasenadi of Kosala …
and the brahmin Pokkharasāti.
The ascetic Gotama has arrived at Khāṇumata and is staying at Ambalaṭṭhikā.
Any ascetic or brahmin who comes to stay in our village district is our guest,
and should be honored and respected as such.
For this reason, too, it’s not appropriate for Master Gotama to come to see me,
rather, it’s appropriate for me to go to see him.
This is the extent of Master Gotama’s praise that I have learned. But his praises are not confined to this,
for the praise of Master Gotama is limitless.”
When he had spoken, those brahmins said to him,
“According to Kūṭadanta’s praises, if Master Gotama were staying within a hundred leagues, it’d be worthwhile for a faithful gentleman to go to see him, even if he had to carry his own provisions in a shoulder bag.”
“Well then, gentlemen, let’s all go to see the ascetic Gotama.”
The Story of King Mahāvijita’s Sacrifice
Then Kūṭadanta together with a large group of brahmins went to see the Buddha and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side.
Before sitting down to one side, some of the brahmins and householders of Khāṇumataka bowed, some exchanged greetings and polite conversation, some held up their joined palms toward the Buddha, some announced their name and clan, while some kept silent.
Kūṭadanta said to the Buddha,
“Master Gotama, I’ve heard that
you know how to accomplish the sacrifice with three modes and sixteen accessories.
I don’t know about that,
but I wish to perform a great sacrifice.
Please teach me how to accomplish the sacrifice with three modes and sixteen accessories.”
“Well then, brahmin, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes sir,” Kūṭadanta replied.
The Buddha said this:
Once upon a time, brahmin, there was a king named Mahāvijita. He was rich, affluent, and wealthy, with lots of gold and silver, lots of property and assets, lots of money and grain, and a full treasury and storehouses.
Then as King Mahāvijita was in private retreat this thought came to his mind:
‘I have achieved human wealth, and reign after conquering this vast territory. Why don’t I hold a large sacrifice? That will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.’
Then he summoned the brahmin high priest and said to him:
‘Just now, brahmin, as I was in private retreat this thought came to mind,
“I have achieved human wealth, and reign after conquering this vast territory.
Why don’t I perform a great sacrifice? That will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
Brahmin, I wish to perform a great sacrifice.
Please instruct me. It will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.’
When he had spoken, the brahmin high priest said to him:
‘Sir, the king’s realm is harried and oppressed. Bandits have been seen raiding villages, towns, and cities, and infesting the highways.
But if the king were to extract more taxes while his realm is thus harried and oppressed, he would not be doing his duty.
Now the king might think,
“I’ll eradicate this outlaw threat by execution or imprisonment or confiscation or condemnation or banishment!” But that’s not the right way to eradicate this barbarian obstacle.
Those who remain after the killing will return to harass the king’s realm.
Rather, here is a plan, relying on which the outlaw threat will be properly uprooted.
So let the king provide seed and fodder for those in the realm who work in farming and raising cattle.
Let the king provide funding for those who work in trade.
Let the king guarantee food and wages for those in government service.
Then the people, occupied with their own work, will not harass the realm.
The king’s revenues will be great.
When the country is secured as a sanctuary, free of being harried and oppressed, the happy people, with joy in their hearts, dancing with children at their breast, will dwell as if their houses were wide open.’
The king agreed with the high priest’s advice and followed his recommendation.
Then the king summoned the brahmin high priest and said to him:
‘I have eradicated the outlaw threat. And relying on your plan my revenue is now great.
Since the country is secured as a sanctuary, free of being harried and oppressed, the happy people, with joy in their hearts, dancing with children at their breast, dwell as if their houses were wide open.
Brahmin, I wish to perform a great sacrifice.
Please instruct me. It will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.’
The Four Accessories
‘In that case, let the king announce this throughout the realm to the aristocrat vassals, ministers and counselors, well-to-do brahmins, and well-off householders, both of town and country:
“I wish to perform a great sacrifice. Please grant your approval, gentlemen; it will be for my lasting welfare and happiness.”
The king agreed with the high priest’s advice and followed his recommendation.
And all of the people who were thus informed responded by saying:
‘May the king perform a sacrifice! It is time for a sacrifice, great king.’
And so these four consenting factions became accessories to the sacrifice.
The Eight Accessories
King Mahāvijita possessed eight factors.
He was well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
He was attractive, good-looking, lovely, of surpassing beauty. He was magnificent, splendid, remarkable to behold.
He was rich, affluent, and wealthy, with lots of gold and silver, lots of property and assets, lots of money and grain, and a full treasury and storehouses.
He was powerful, having an army of four divisions that was obedient and carried out instructions. He’d probably prevail over his enemies just with his reputation.
He was faithful, generous, a donor, his door always open. He was a well-spring of support, making merit with ascetics and brahmins, for paupers, vagrants, travelers, and beggars.
He was very learned in diverse fields of learning. He understood the meaning of diverse statements, saying:
‘This is what that statement means; that is what this statement means.’
He was astute, competent, and intelligent, able to think issues through as they bear upon the past, future, and present.
These are the eight factors that King Mahāvijita possessed.
And so these eight factors also became accessories to the sacrifice.
Four More Accessories
And the brahmin high priest had four factors.
He was well born on both his mother’s and father’s side, of pure descent, irrefutable and impeccable in questions of ancestry back to the seventh paternal generation.
He recited and remembered the hymns, and had mastered the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. He knew philology and grammar, and was well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man.
He was ethical, mature in ethical conduct.
He was astute and clever, being the first or second to hold the sacrificial ladle.
These are the four factors that the brahmin high priest possessed.
And so these four factors also became accessories to the sacrifice.
The Three Modes
Next, before the sacrifice, the brahmin high priest taught the three modes to the king.
‘Now, though the king wants to perform a great sacrifice, he might have certain regrets, thinking:
“I shall lose a great fortune,” or
“I am losing a great fortune,” or
“I have lost a great fortune.” But the king should not harbor such regrets.’
These are the three modes that the brahmin high priest taught to the king before the sacrifice.
The Ten Respects
Next, before the sacrifice, the brahmin high priest dispelled the king’s regret regarding the recipients in ten respects:
‘There will come to the sacrifice those who kill living creatures and those who refrain from killing living creatures.
As to those who kill living creatures, the outcome of that is theirs alone.
But as to those who refrain from killing living creatures, it is for their sakes that the king should sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.
There will come to the sacrifice those who steal …
commit sexual misconduct …
use divisive speech …
use harsh speech …
talk nonsense …
are covetous …
have ill will …
have wrong view and those who have right view.
As to those who have wrong view, the outcome of that is theirs alone.
But as to those who have right view, it is for their sakes that the king should sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.’
These are the ten respects in which the high priest dispelled the king’s regret regarding the recipients before the sacrifice.
The Sixteen Respects
Next, while the king was performing the great sacrifice, the brahmin high priest educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired the king’s mind in sixteen respects:
‘Now, while the king is performing the great sacrifice, someone might say,
“King Mahāvijita performs a great sacrifice, but he did not announce it to the aristocrat vassals of town and country.
That’s the kind of great sacrifice that this king performs.”
Those who speak against the king in this way have no legitimacy.
For the king did indeed announce it to the aristocrat vassals of town and country.
Let the king know this as a reason to sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.
While the king is performing the great sacrifice, someone might say,
“King Mahāvijita performs a great sacrifice, but he did not announce it to the ministers and counselors, well-to-do brahmins, and well-off householders, both of town and country. That’s the kind of great sacrifice that this king performs.”
Those who speak against the king in this way have no legitimacy.
For the king did indeed announce it to all these people.
Let the king know this too as a reason to sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.
While the king is performing the great sacrifice, someone might say
that he does not possess the eight factors.
Those who speak against the king in this way have no legitimacy.
For the king does indeed possess the eight factors.
Let the king know this too as a reason to sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.
While the king is performing the great sacrifice, someone might say
that the high priest does not possess the four factors.
Those who speak against the king in this way have no legitimacy.
For the high priest does indeed possess the four factors.
Let the king know this too as a reason to sacrifice, relinquish, rejoice, and gain confidence in his heart.’
These are the sixteen respects in which the high priest educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired the king’s mind while he was performing the sacrifice.
And brahmin, in that sacrifice no cattle were killed, no goats were killed, and no chickens or pigs were killed. There was no slaughter of various kinds of creatures. No trees were felled for the sacrificial post. No grass was reaped to strew over the place of sacrifice.
No bondservants, employees, or workers did their jobs under threat of punishment and danger, weeping with tearful faces.
Those who wished to work did so, while those who did not wish to did not.
They did the work they wanted to, and did not do what they didn’t want to.
The sacrifice was completed with just ghee, oil, butter, curds, honey, and molasses.
Then the aristocrat vassals, ministers and counselors, well-to-do brahmins, and well-off householders of both town and country came to the king bringing abundant wealth and said,
‘Sire, this abundant wealth is specially for you alone; may Your Highness accept it!’
‘There’s enough raised for me through regular taxes. Let this be for you; and here, take even more!’
When the king turned them down, they withdrew to one side to think up a plan,
‘It wouldn’t be proper for us to take this abundant wealth back to our own homes.
King Mahāvijita is performing a great sacrifice. Let us make an offering as an auxiliary sacrifice.’
Then the aristocrat vassals of town and country set up gifts to the east of the sacrificial pit.
The ministers and counselors of town and country set up gifts to the south of the sacrificial pit.
The well-to-do brahmins of town and country set up gifts to the west of the sacrificial pit.
The well-off householders of town and country set up gifts to the north of the sacrificial pit.
And brahmin, in that sacrifice too no cattle were killed, no goats were killed, and no chickens or pigs were killed. There was no slaughter of various kinds of creatures. No trees were felled for the sacrificial post. No grass was reaped to strew over the place of sacrifice.
No bondservants, employees, or workers did their jobs under threat of punishment and danger, weeping with tearful faces.
Those who wished to work did so, while those who did not wish to did not.
They did the work they wanted to, and did not do what they didn’t want to.
The sacrifice was completed with just ghee, oil, butter, curds, honey, and molasses.
And so there were four consenting factions, eight factors possessed by King Mahāvijita, four factors possessed by the high priest,
and three modes.
Brahmin, this is called the sacrifice accomplished with three modes and sixteen accessories.”
When he said this, those brahmins made an uproar,
“Hooray for such sacrifice! Hooray for the accomplishment of such sacrifice!”
But the brahmin Kūṭadanta sat in silence.
So those brahmins said to him,
“How can you not applaud the ascetic Gotama’s fine words?”
“It’s not that I don’t applaud what he said.
If anyone didn’t applaud such fine words, their head would explode!
But, gentlemen, it occurs to me that
the ascetic Gotama does not say:
‘So I have heard’ or ‘It ought to be like this.’
Rather, he just says:
‘So it was then, this is how it was then.’
It occurs to me that
the ascetic Gotama at that time must have been King Mahāvijita, the owner of the sacrifice, or else the brahmin high priest who facilitated the sacrifice for him.
Does Master Gotama recall having performed such a sacrifice, or having facilitated it, and then, when his body broke up, after death, being reborn in a good place, a heavenly realm?”
“I do recall that, brahmin. For at that time I was the brahmin high priest who facilitated the sacrifice.”
A Regular Gift as an Ongoing Family Sacrifice.
“But Master Gotama, apart from that sacrifice accomplished with three modes and sixteen accessories, is there any other sacrifice that has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial?”
“There is, brahmin.”
“But what is it?”
“The regular gifts as ongoing family sacrifice given specially to ethical renunciates;
this sacrifice, brahmin, has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial.”
“What is the cause, Master Gotama, what is the reason why those regular gifts as ongoing family sacrifice have fewer requirements and undertakings, yet are more fruitful and beneficial, compared with the sacrifice accomplished with three modes and sixteen accessories?”
“Because neither perfected ones nor those who are on the path to perfection will attend such a sacrifice.
Why is that?
Because beatings and throttlings are seen there.
But the regular gifts as ongoing family sacrifice given specially to ethical renunciates;
perfected ones and those who are on the path to perfection will attend such a sacrifice.
Why is that?
Because no beatings and throttlings are seen there.
This is the cause, brahmin, this is the reason why those regular gifts as ongoing family sacrifice have fewer requirements and undertakings, yet are more fruitful and beneficial, compared with the sacrifice accomplished with three modes and sixteen accessories.”
“But Master Gotama, apart from that sacrifice accomplished with three modes and sixteen accessories and those regular gifts as ongoing family sacrifice, is there any other sacrifice that has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial?”
“There is, brahmin.”
“But what is it?”
“When someone gives a dwelling specially for the Saṅgha of the four quarters.”
“But is there any other sacrifice that has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial?”
“When someone with confident heart goes for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha.”
“But is there any other sacrifice that has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial?”
“When someone with a confident heart undertakes the training rules
to refrain from killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.”
“But is there any other sacrifice that has fewer requirements and undertakings, yet is more fruitful and beneficial?”
“There is, brahmin.
It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
This sacrifice has fewer requirements and undertakings than the former, yet is more fruitful and beneficial. …
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
This sacrifice has fewer requirements and undertakings than the former, yet is more fruitful and beneficial.
…
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
This sacrifice has fewer requirements and undertakings than the former, yet is more fruitful and beneficial.
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
This sacrifice has fewer requirements and undertakings than the former, yet is more fruitful and beneficial.
And, brahmin, there is no other accomplishment of sacrifice which is better and finer than this.”
Kūṭadanta Declares Himself a Lay Follower
When he had spoken, Kūṭadanta said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Gotama has made the Teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
And these bulls, bullocks, heifers, goats, and rams—seven hundred of each—I release them, I grant them life! Let them eat green grass and drink cool water, and may a cool breeze blow upon them!”
The Realization of the Fruit of Stream-Entry
Then the Buddha taught Kūṭadanta step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven.
He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when he knew that Kūṭadanta’s mind was ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in the brahmin Kūṭadanta:
“Everything that has a beginning has an end.”
Then Kūṭadanta saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. He went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. He said to the Buddha,
“Would Master Gotama together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept tomorrow’s meal from me?”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Kūṭadanta got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
And when the night had passed Kūṭadanta had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Kūṭadanta together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Kūṭadanta served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Kūṭadanta took a low seat and sat to one side.
Then the Buddha educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired him with a Dhamma talk, after which he got up from his seat and left.
Long Discourses
The Wheel-Turning Monarch
Taking Refuge in Oneself
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Magadhans at Mātulā.
There the Buddha addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants!”
“Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Mendicants, be your own island, your own refuge, with no other refuge. Let the teaching be your island and your refuge, with no other refuge.
And how does a mendicant do this?
They meditate observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
That’s how a mendicant is their own island, their own refuge, with no other refuge. That’s how they let the teaching be their island and their refuge, with no other refuge.
You should roam inside your own territory, the domain of your fathers.
If you roam inside your own territory, the domain of your fathers, Māra won’t catch you or get hold of you.
It is due to undertaking skillful qualities that this merit grows.
King Daḷhanemi
Once upon a time, mendicants, there was a king named Daḷhanemi who was a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extended to all four sides, he achieved stability in the country, and he possessed the seven treasures.
He had the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He had over a thousand sons who were valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea, he reigned by principle, without rod or sword.
Then, after many years, many hundred years, many thousand years had passed, King Daḷhanemi addressed one of his men,
‘My good man, when you see that the heavenly wheel-treasure has receded back from its place, please tell me.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied that man.
After many thousand years had passed, that man saw that the heavenly wheel-treasure had receded back from its place. So he went to King Daḷhanemi and said,
‘Please sire, you should know that your heavenly wheel-treasure has receded back from its place.’
So the king summoned the crown prince and said,
‘Dear prince, my heavenly wheel-treasure has receded back from its place.
I’ve heard that
when this happens to a wheel-turning monarch, he does not have long to live.
I have enjoyed human pleasures. Now it is time for me to seek heavenly pleasures.
Come, dear prince, rule this land surrounded by ocean!
I shall shave off my hair and beard, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.’
And so, after carefully instructing the crown prince in kingship, King Daḷhanemi shaved off his hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Seven days later the heavenly wheel-treasure vanished.
Then a certain man approached the newly anointed aristocrat king and said,
‘Please sire, you should know that the heavenly wheel-treasure has vanished.’
At that the king was unhappy and experienced unhappiness.
He went to the royal sage and said,
‘Please sire, you should know that the heavenly wheel-treasure has vanished.’
When he said this, the royal sage said to him,
‘Don’t be unhappy at the vanishing of the wheel-treasure. My dear, the wheel-treasure is not inherited from your father.
Come now, my dear, implement the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
If you do so, it’s possible that—on a fifteenth day sabbath, having bathed your head and gone upstairs in the royal longhouse to observe the sabbath—the heavenly wheel-treasure will appear to you, with a thousand spokes, with rim and hub, complete in every detail.’
The Noble Duties of a Wheel-Turning Monarch
‘But sire, what are the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch?’
‘Well then, my dear, relying only on principle—honoring, respecting, and venerating principle, having principle as your flag, banner, and authority—provide just protection and security for your court, troops, aristocrats, vassals, brahmins and householders, people of town and country, ascetics and brahmins, beasts and birds.
Do not let injustice prevail in the realm.
Pay money to the penniless in the realm.
And there are ascetics and brahmins in the realm who avoid intoxication and negligence, are settled in patience and gentleness, and who tame, calm, and extinguish themselves. From time to time you should go up to them and ask:
“Sirs, what is skillful? What is unskillful? What is blameworthy? What is blameless? What should be cultivated? What should not be cultivated? Doing what leads to my lasting harm and suffering? Doing what leads to my lasting welfare and happiness?”
Having heard them, you should reject what is unskillful and undertake and follow what is skillful.
These are the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.’
The Wheel-Treasure Appears
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the new king to the royal sage. And he implemented the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
While he was implementing them, on a fifteenth day sabbath, he had bathed his head and gone upstairs in the royal longhouse to observe the sabbath.
And the heavenly wheel-treasure appeared to him, with a thousand spokes, with rim and hub, complete in every detail.
Seeing this, the king thought,
‘I have heard that when the heavenly wheel-treasure appears to a king in this way, he becomes a wheel-turning monarch.
Am I then a wheel-turning monarch?’
Then the anointed king, rising from his seat and arranging his robe over one shoulder, took a ceremonial vase in his left hand and besprinkled the wheel-treasure with his right hand, saying,
‘Roll forth, O wheel-treasure! Triumph, O wheel-treasure!’
Then the wheel-treasure rolled towards the east.
And the king followed it together with his army of four divisions. In whatever place the wheel-treasure stood still, there the king came to stay together with his army.
And any opposing rulers of the eastern quarter came to the wheel-turning monarch and said,
‘Come, great king! Welcome, great king! We are yours, great king, instruct us.’
The wheel-turning monarch said,
‘Do not kill living creatures. Do not steal. Do not commit sexual misconduct. Do not lie. Do not drink alcohol. Maintain the current level of taxation.’
And so the opposing rulers of the eastern quarter became his vassals.
Then the wheel-treasure, having plunged into the eastern ocean and emerged again, rolled towards the south. …
Having plunged into the southern ocean and emerged again, it rolled towards the west. …
Having plunged into the western ocean and emerged again, it rolled towards the north, followed by the king together with his army of four divisions.
In whatever place the wheel-treasure stood still, there the king came to stay together with his army.
And any opposing rulers of the northern quarter came to the wheel-turning monarch and said,
‘Come, great king! Welcome, great king! We are yours, great king, instruct us.’
The wheel-turning monarch said,
‘Do not kill living creatures. Do not steal. Do not commit sexual misconduct. Do not lie. Do not drink alcohol. Maintain the current level of taxation.’
And so the rulers of the northern quarter became his vassals.
And then the wheel-treasure, having triumphed over this land surrounded by ocean, returned to the royal capital. There it stood still by the gate to the royal compound at the High Court as if fixed to an axle, illuminating the royal compound.
On Subsequent Wheel-Turning Monarchs
And for a second time,
and a third,
and a seventh time, a wheel-turning monarch was established in exactly the same way. And after many years the seventh wheel-turning monarch went forth, handing the realm over to the crown prince.
Seven days later the heavenly wheel-treasure vanished.
Then a certain man approached the newly anointed aristocrat king and said,
‘Please sire, you should know that the heavenly wheel-treasure has vanished.’
At that the king was unhappy and experienced unhappiness.
But he didn’t go to the royal sage and ask about the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
He just governed the country according to his own ideas.
So governed, the nations did not prosper like before, as they had when former kings implemented the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
Then the ministers and counselors, the treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, and advisers gathered and said to the king,
‘Sire, when governed according to your own ideas, the nations do not prosper like before, as they did when former kings implemented the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
In your realm are found ministers and counselors, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, and advisers—both ourselves and others—who remember the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
Please, Your Majesty, ask us about the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
We will answer you.’
On the Period of Decline
So the anointed king asked the assembled ministers and counselors, treasury officials, military officers, guardsmen, and advisers about the noble duties of a wheel-turning monarch.
And they answered him.
But after listening to them, he didn’t provide just protection and security. Nor did he pay money to the penniless in the realm.
And so poverty grew widespread.
When poverty was widespread, a certain person stole from others, with the intention to commit theft.
They arrested him
and presented him to the king, saying,
‘Your Majesty, this person stole from others with the intention to commit theft.’
The king said to that person,
‘Is it really true, mister, that you stole from others with the intention to commit theft?’
‘It’s true, sire.’
‘What was the reason?’
‘Sire, I can’t survive.’
So the king paid some money to that person, saying,
‘With this money, mister, keep yourself alive, and provide for your mother and father, partners and children. Work for a living, and establish an uplifting religious donation for ascetics and brahmins that’s conducive to heaven, ripens in happiness, and leads to heaven.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied that man.
But then another man stole something from others.
They arrested him
and presented him to the king, saying,
‘Your Majesty, this person stole from others.’
The king said to that person,
‘Is it really true, mister, that you stole from others?’
‘It’s true, sire.’
‘What was the reason?’
‘Sire, I can’t survive.’
So the king paid some money to that person, saying,
‘With this money, mister, keep yourself alive, and provide for your mother and father, partners and children. Work for a living, and establish an uplifting religious donation for ascetics and brahmins that’s conducive to heaven, ripens in happiness, and leads to heaven.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied that man.
People heard about this:
‘It seems the king is paying money to anyone who steals from others!’
It occurred to them,
‘Why don’t we steal from others?’
So then another man stole something from others.
They arrested him
and presented him to the king, saying,
‘Your Majesty, this person stole from others.’
The king said to that person,
‘Is it really true, mister, that you stole from others?’
‘It’s true, sire.’
‘What was the reason?’
‘Sire, I can’t survive.’
Then the king thought,
‘If I pay money to anyone who steals from others, it will only increase the stealing.
I’d better make an end of this person, finish him off, and chop off his head.’
Then he ordered his men,
‘Well then, my men, tie this man’s arms tightly behind his back with a strong rope. Shave his head and march him from street to street and square to square to the beating of a harsh drum. Then take him out the south gate and make an end of him, finish him off, and chop off his head.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ they replied, and did as he commanded.
People heard about this:
‘It seems the king is chopping the head off anyone who steals from others!’
It occurred to them,
‘We’d better have sharp swords made. Then when we steal from others, we’ll make an end of them, finish them off, and chop off their heads.’
They had sharp swords made. Then they started to make raids on villages, towns, and cities, and to infest the highways.
And they chopped the heads off anyone they stole from.
And so, mendicants, from not paying money to the penniless, poverty became widespread. When poverty was widespread, theft became widespread. When theft was widespread, swords became widespread. When swords were widespread, killing living creatures became widespread. And for the sentient beings among whom killing was widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people lived for 80,000 years, but their children lived for 40,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 40,000 years, a certain person stole something from others.
They arrested him
and presented him to the king, saying,
‘Your Majesty, this person stole from others.’
The king said to that person,
‘Is it really true, mister, that you stole from others?’
‘No, sire,’ he said, deliberately lying.
And so, mendicants, from not paying money to the penniless, poverty, theft, swords, and killing became widespread.
When killing was widespread, lying became widespread.
And for the sentient beings among whom lying was widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 40,000 years had children who lived for 20,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 20,000 years, a certain person stole something from others.
Someone else reported this to the king,
‘Your Majesty, such-and-such person stole from others,’ he said, going behind his back.
And so, mendicants, from not paying money to the penniless, poverty, theft, swords, killing, and lying became widespread.
When lying was widespread, backbiting became widespread. And for the sentient beings among whom backbiting was widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 20,000 years had children who lived for 10,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 10,000 years, some were more beautiful than others.
And the ugly beings, coveting the beautiful ones, committed adultery with others’ wives.
And so, mendicants, from not paying money to the penniless, poverty, theft, swords, killing, lying, and backbiting became widespread.
When backbiting was widespread, sexual misconduct became widespread. And for the sentient beings among whom sexual misconduct was widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 10,000 years had children who lived for 5,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 5,000 years, two things became widespread:
harsh speech and talking nonsense.
For the sentient beings among whom these two things were widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 5,000 years had some children who lived for 2,500 years, while others lived for 2,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 2,500 years, desire and ill will became widespread.
For the sentient beings among whom desire and ill will were widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 2,500 years had children who lived for 1,000 years.
Among the people who lived for 1,000 years, wrong view became widespread.
For the sentient beings among whom wrong view was widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for 1,000 years had children who lived for five hundred years.
Among the people who lived for five hundred years, three things became widespread:
illicit desire, immoral greed, and wrong thoughts.
For the sentient beings among whom these three things were widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for five hundred years had some children who lived for two hundred and fifty years, while others lived for two hundred years.
Among the people who lived for two hundred and fifty years, three things became widespread:
lack of due respect for mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, and failure to honor the elders in the family.
And so, mendicants, from not paying money to the penniless, all these things became widespread—poverty,
backbiting,
sexual misconduct,
harsh speech and talking nonsense,
desire and ill will,
wrong view,
illicit desire, immoral greed, and wrong thoughts,
and lack of due respect for mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, and failure to honor the elders in the family.
For the sentient beings among whom these things were widespread, their lifespan and beauty declined.
Those people who lived for two hundred and fifty years had children who lived for a hundred years.
When People Live for Ten Years
There will come a time, mendicants, when these people will have children who live for ten years.
Among the people who live for ten years, girls will be marriageable at five.
The following flavors will disappear:
ghee, butter, oil, honey, molasses, and salt.
The best kind of food will be finger millet,
just as fine rice with meat is the best kind of food today.
The ten ways of doing skillful deeds will totally disappear, and the ten ways of doing unskillful deeds will explode in popularity.
Those people will not even have the word ‘skillful’, still less anyone who does what is skillful.
And anyone who disrespects mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, and fails to honor the elders in the family will be venerated and praised,
just as the opposite is venerated and praised today.
There’ll be no recognition of the status of mother, aunts, or wives and partners of teachers and respected people.
The world will become promiscuous, like goats and sheep, chickens and pigs, and dogs and jackals.
They’ll be full of hostility towards each other, with acute ill will, malevolence, and thoughts of murder.
Even a mother will feel like this for her child, and the child for its mother,
father for child, child for father,
brother for sister, and sister for brother.
They’ll be just like a deer hunter when he sees a deer—full of hostility, ill will, malevolence, and thoughts of killing.
Among the people who live for ten years, there will be an interregnum of swords lasting seven days.
During that time they will see each other as beasts.
Sharp swords will appear in their hands,
with which they’ll take each other’s life, crying, ‘It’s a beast! It’s a beast!’
But then some of those beings will think,
‘Let us neither be perpetrators nor victims! Why don’t we hide in thick grass, thick jungle, thick trees, inaccessible riverlands, or rugged mountains and survive on forest roots and fruits?’
So that’s what they do.
When those seven days have passed, having emerged from their hiding places and embraced each other, they will come together in one voice and cry,
‘How fantastic, dear being, you live! How fantastic, dear being, you live!’
The Period of Growth
Then those beings will think,
‘It’s because we undertook unskillful things that we suffered such an extensive loss of our relatives.
We’d better do what’s skillful.
What skillful thing should we do?
Why don’t we refrain from killing living creatures? Having undertaken this skillful thing we’ll live by it.’
So that’s what they do.
Because of undertaking this skillful thing, their lifespan and beauty will grow.
Those people who live for ten years will have children who live for twenty years.
Then those beings will think,
‘Because of undertaking this skillful thing, our lifespan and beauty are growing.
Why don’t we do even more skillful things?
What skillful thing should we do?
Why don’t we refrain from stealing …
sexual misconduct …
backbiting …
harsh speech …
and talking nonsense.
Why don’t we give up covetousness …
ill will …
wrong view …
three things:
illicit desire, immoral greed, and wrong thoughts.
Why don’t we pay due respect to mother and father, ascetics and brahmins, honoring the elders in our families? Having undertaken this skillful thing we’ll live by it.’
So that’s what they do.
Because of undertaking this skillful thing, their lifespan and beauty will grow.
Those people who live for twenty years will have children who live for forty years.
Those people who live for forty years will have children who live for eighty years,
then a hundred and sixty years,
three hundred and twenty years,
six hundred and forty years,
2,000 years,
4,000 years,
8,000 years,
20,000 years,
40,000 years,
and finally 80,000 years.
Among the people who live for 80,000 years, girls will be marriageable at five hundred.
The Time of King Saṅkha
Among the people who live for 80,000 years, there will be just three afflictions: greed, starvation, and old age.
India will be successful and prosperous. The villages, towns, and capital cities will be no more than a chicken’s flight apart.
And the land will be as crowded as hell, just full of people, like a thicket of rushes or reeds.
The royal capital will be our Benares, but renamed Ketumati. And it will be successful, prosperous, populous, full of people, with plenty of food.
There will be 84,000 cities in India, with the royal capital of Ketumati foremost.
And in the royal capital of Ketumati a king named Saṅkha will arise, a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion will extend to all four sides, he will achieve stability in the country, and possess the seven treasures.
He will have the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He will have over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea, he will reign by principle, without rod or sword.
The Arising of the Buddha Metteyya
And the Blessed One named Metteyya will arise in the world—perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed—
just as I have arisen today.
He will realize with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and make it known to others, just as I do today.
He will teach the Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he will reveal a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure,
just as I do today.
He will look after a Saṅgha of many thousand mendicants, just as I look after a Saṅgha of many hundreds today.
Then King Saṅkha will have the sacrificial post that had been built by King Mahāpanāda raised up.
After staying there, he will give it away to ascetics and brahmins, paupers, vagrants, travelers, and beggars. Then, having shaved off his hair and beard and dressed in ocher robes, he will go forth from the lay life to homelessness in the Buddha Metteyya’s presence.
Soon after going forth, living withdrawn, diligent, keen, and resolute, he will realize the supreme end of the spiritual path in this very life. He will live having achieved with his own insight the goal for which gentlemen rightly go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Mendicants, be your own island, your own refuge, with no other refuge. Let the teaching be your island and your refuge, with no other refuge.
And how does a mendicant do this?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings …
principles—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
That’s how a mendicant is their own island, their own refuge, with no other refuge. That’s how they let the teaching be their island and their refuge, with no other refuge.
On Long Life and Beauty for Mendicants
Mendicants, you should roam inside your own territory, the domain of your fathers.
Doing so, you will grow in life span, beauty, happiness, wealth, and power.
And what is long life for a mendicant?
It’s when a mendicant develops the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort.
Having developed and cultivated these four bases of psychic power they may, if they wish, live on for the eon or what’s left of the eon.
This is long life for a mendicant.
And what is beauty for a mendicant?
It’s when a mendicant is ethical, restrained in the monastic code, conducting themselves well and seeking alms in suitable places. Seeing danger in the slightest fault, they keep the rules they’ve undertaken.
This is beauty for a mendicant.
And what is happiness for a mendicant?
It’s when a mendicant, quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, enters and remains in the first absorption, which has the rapture and bliss born of seclusion, while placing the mind and keeping it connected.
As the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, they enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
This is happiness for a mendicant.
And what is wealth for a mendicant?
It’s when a monk meditates spreading a heart full of love to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of love to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
They meditate spreading a heart full of compassion …
rejoicing …
equanimity to one direction, and to the second, and to the third, and to the fourth.
In the same way above, below, across, everywhere, all around, they spread a heart full of equanimity to the whole world—abundant, expansive, limitless, free of enmity and ill will.
This is wealth for a mendicant.
And what is power for a mendicant?
It’s when a mendicant realizes the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life. And they live having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
This is power for a mendicant.
Mendicants, I do not see a single power so hard to defeat as the power of Māra.
It is due to undertaking skillful qualities that this merit grows.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
The Great Discourse on the Harvest of Deeds
On Past Lives
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in Jeta’s Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika’s monastery, in the hut by the kari tree.
Then after the meal, on return from alms-round, several senior mendicants sat together in the pavilion by the kari tree and this Dhamma talk on the subject of past lives came up among them,
“So it was in a past life; such it was in a past life.”
With clairaudience that is purified and superhuman, the Buddha heard that discussion among the mendicants.
So he got up from his seat and went to the pavilion, where he sat on the seat spread out and addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
The mendicants told him what had happened, adding,
“This is the conversation that was unfinished when the Buddha arrived.”
“Would you like to hear a Dhamma talk on the subject of past lives?”
“Now is the time, Blessed One! Now is the time, Holy One!
Let the Buddha give a Dhamma talk on the subject of past lives. The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Ninety-one eons ago, the Buddha Vipassī arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
Thirty-one eons ago, the Buddha Sikhī arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
In the same thirty-first eon, the Buddha Vessabhū arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
In the present fortunate eon, the Buddhas Kakusandha,
Koṇāgamana,
and Kassapa arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
And in the present fortunate eon, I have arisen in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
The Buddhas Vipassī,
and Vessabhū were born as aristocrats into aristocrat families.
The Buddhas Kakusandha,
Koṇāgamana,
and Kassapa were born as brahmins into brahmin families.
I was born as an aristocrat into an aristocrat family.
Koṇḍañña was the clan of Vipassī,
and Vessabhū.
Kassapa was the clan of Kakusandha,
Koṇāgamana,
and Kassapa.
Gotama is my clan.
Vipassī lived for 80,000 years.
Sikhī lived for 70,000 years.
Vessabhū lived for 60,000 years.
Kakusandha lived for 40,000 years.
Koṇāgamana lived for 30,000 years.
Kassapa lived for 20,000 years.
For me these days the life-span is short, brief, and fleeting. A long-lived person lives for a century or a little more.
Vipassī was awakened at the root of a trumpet flower tree.
Sikhī was awakened at the root of a white-mango tree.
Vessabhū was awakened at the root of a sal tree.
Kakusandha was awakened at the root of an acacia tree.
Koṇāgamana was awakened at the root of a cluster fig tree.
Kassapa was awakened at the root of a banyan tree.
I was awakened at the root of a peepul tree.
Vipassī had a fine pair of chief disciples named Khaṇḍa and Tissa.
Sikhī had a fine pair of chief disciples named Abhibhū and Sambhava.
Vessabhū had a fine pair of chief disciples named Soṇa and Uttara.
Kakusandha had a fine pair of chief disciples named Vidhura and Sañjīva.
Koṇāgamana had a fine pair of chief disciples named Bhiyyosa and Uttara.
Kassapa had a fine pair of chief disciples named Tissa and Bhāradvāja.
I have a fine pair of chief disciples named Sāriputta and Moggallāna.
Vipassī had three gatherings of disciples—one of 6,800,000, one of 100,000, and one of 80,000—all of them mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Sikhī had three gatherings of disciples—one of 100,000, one of 80,000, and one of 70,000—all of them mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Vessabhū had three gatherings of disciples—one of 80,000, one of 70,000, and one of 60,000—all of them mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Kakusandha had one gathering of disciples—40,000 mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Koṇāgamana had one gathering of disciples—30,000 mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Kassapa had one gathering of disciples—20,000 mendicants who had ended their defilements.
I have had one gathering of disciples—1,250 mendicants who had ended their defilements.
Vipassī had as chief attendant a mendicant named Asoka.
Sikhī had as chief attendant a mendicant named Khemaṅkara.
Vessabhū had as chief attendant a mendicant named Upasanta.
Kakusandha had as chief attendant a mendicant named Buddhija.
Koṇāgamana had as chief attendant a mendicant named Sotthija.
Kassapa had as chief attendant a mendicant named Sabbamitta.
I have as chief attendant a mendicant named Ānanda.
Vipassī’s father was King Bandhuma,
his birth mother was Queen Bandhumatī,
and their capital city was named Bandhumatī.
Sikhī’s father was King Aruṇa,
his birth mother was Queen Pabhāvatī,
and their capital city was named Aruṇavatī.
Vessabhū’s father was King Suppatīta,
his birth mother was Queen Vassavatī,
and their capital city was named Anoma.
Kakusandha’s father was the brahmin Aggidatta,
and his birth mother was the brahmin lady Visākhā.
At that time the king was Khema,
whose capital city was named Khemavatī.
Koṇāgamana’s father was the brahmin Yaññadatta,
and his birth mother was the brahmin lady Uttarā.
At that time the king was Sobha,
whose capital city was named Sobhavatī.
Kassapa’s father was the brahmin Brahmadatta,
and his birth mother was the brahmin lady Dhanavatī.
At that time the king was Kikī,
whose capital city was named Benares.
In this life, my father was King Suddhodana,
my birth mother was Queen Māyā,
and our capital city was Kapilavatthu.”
That is what the Buddha said.
When he had spoken, the Holy One got up from his seat and entered his dwelling.
Soon after the Buddha left, those mendicants discussed among themselves:
“It’s incredible, reverends, it’s amazing, the power and might of a Realized One!
For he is able to recollect the caste, names, clans, life-span, chief disciples, and gatherings of disciples of the Buddhas of the past who have become completely extinguished, cut off proliferation, cut off the track, finished off the cycle, and transcended suffering.
He knows the caste they were born in, and also their names, clans, conduct, qualities, wisdom, meditation, and freedom.
Is it because the Realized One has clearly comprehended the principle of the teachings that he can recollect all these things?
Or did deities tell him?”
But this conversation among those mendicants was left unfinished.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat and went to the pavilion by the kari tree, where he sat on the seat spread out
and addressed the mendicants,
“Mendicants, what were you sitting talking about just now? What conversation was unfinished?”
The mendicants told him what had happened, adding,
“This was our conversation that was unfinished when the Buddha arrived.”
“It is because the Realized One has clearly comprehended the principle of the teachings that he can recollect all these things.
And the deities also told me.
Would you like to hear a further Dhamma talk on the subject of past lives?”
“Now is the time, Blessed One! Now is the time, Holy One!
Let the Buddha give a further Dhamma talk on the subject of past lives. The mendicants will listen and remember it.”
“Well then, mendicants, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.”
“Yes, sir,” they replied.
The Buddha said this:
“Ninety-one eons ago, the Buddha Vipassī arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
He was born as an aristocrat into an aristocrat family.
His clan was Koṇḍañña.
He lived for 80,000 years.
He was awakened at the root of a trumpet flower tree.
He had a fine pair of chief disciples named Khaṇḍa and Tissa.
He had three gatherings of disciples—
one of 6,800,000, one of 100,000, and one of 80,000—
all of them mendicants who had ended their defilements.
He had as chief attendant a mendicant named Asoka.
His father was King Bandhuma,
his birth mother was Queen Bandhumatī,
and their capital city was named Bandhumatī.
What’s Normal For One Intent on Awakening
When Vipassī, the being intent on awakening, passed away from the host of Joyful Gods, he was conceived in his mother’s womb, mindful and aware.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening passes away from the host of Joyful Gods, he is conceived in his mother’s womb.
And then—in this world with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—an immeasurable, magnificent light appears, surpassing the glory of the gods.
Even in the boundless desolation of interstellar space—so utterly dark that even the light of the moon and the sun, so mighty and powerful, makes no impression—an immeasurable, magnificent light appears, surpassing the glory of the gods.
And the sentient beings reborn there recognize each other by that light:
‘So, it seems other sentient beings have been reborn here!’
And this galaxy shakes and rocks and trembles.
And an immeasurable, magnificent light appears in the world, surpassing the glory of the gods.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, four gods approach to guard the four directions, so that no human or non-human or anyone at all shall harm the being intent on awakening or his mother.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, she becomes naturally ethical. She refrains from killing living creatures, stealing, sexual misconduct, lying, and alcoholic drinks that cause negligence.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, she no longer feels sexual desire for men, and she cannot be violated by a man of lustful intent.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, she obtains the five kinds of sensual stimulation and amuses herself, supplied and provided with them.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, no afflictions beset her.
She’s happy and free of bodily fatigue. And she sees the being intent on awakening in her womb, complete with all his various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
Suppose there was a beryl gem that was naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it was strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.
And someone with good eyesight were to take it in their hand and examine it:
‘This beryl gem is naturally beautiful, eight-faceted, well-worked, transparent, clear, and unclouded, endowed with all good qualities.
And it’s strung with a thread of blue, yellow, red, white, or golden brown.’
In the same way, when the being intent on awakening is conceived in his mother’s belly, no afflictions beset her. She’s happy and free of bodily fatigue. And she sees the being intent on awakening in her womb, complete with all his various parts, not deficient in any faculty.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, seven days after the being intent on awakening is born, his mother passes away and is reborn in the host of Joyful Gods.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, while other women carry the infant in the womb for nine or ten months before giving birth, not so the mother of the being intent on awakening.
She gives birth after exactly ten months.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, while other women give birth while sitting or lying down, not so the mother of the being intent on awakening.
She only gives birth standing up.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, gods receive him first, then humans.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, before he reaches the ground, four gods receive him and place him before his mother, saying:
‘Rejoice, O Queen! An illustrious child is born to you.’
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, he emerges already clean, unsoiled by waters, mucus, blood, or any other kind of impurity, pure and clean.
Suppose a jewel-treasure was placed on a cloth from Kāsī. The jewel would not soil the cloth, nor would the cloth soil the jewel.
Why is that?
Because of the cleanliness of them both.
In the same way, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, he emerges already clean, unsoiled by waters, mucus, blood, or any other kind of impurity, pure and clean.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, two streams of water appear in the sky, one cool, one warm, for bathing the being intent on awakening and his mother.
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, as soon as he’s born, the being intent on awakening stands firm with his own feet on the ground. Facing north, he takes seven strides with a white parasol held above him, surveys all quarters, and makes this dramatic proclamation: ‘I am the foremost in the world! I am the eldest in the world! I am the first in the world! This is my last rebirth. Now there are no more future lives.’
This is normal in such a case.
It’s normal that, when the being intent on awakening emerges from his mother’s womb, then—in this world with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—an immeasurable, magnificent light appears, surpassing the glory of the gods.
Even in the boundless desolation of interstellar space—so utterly dark that even the light of the moon and the sun, so mighty and powerful, makes no impression—an immeasurable, magnificent light appears, surpassing the glory of the gods.
And the sentient beings reborn there recognize each other by that light:
‘So, it seems other sentient beings have been reborn here!’
And this galaxy shakes and rocks and trembles. And an immeasurable, magnificent light appears in the world, surpassing the glory of the gods.
This is normal in such a case.
The Thirty-Two Marks of a Great Man
When Prince Vipassī was born, they announced it to King Bandhuma,
‘Sire, your son is born! Let your majesty examine him!’
When the king had examined the prince, he had the brahmin soothsayers summoned and said to them,
‘Gentlemen, please examine the prince.’
When they had examined him they said to the king,
‘Rejoice, O King! An illustrious son is born to you. You are fortunate, so very fortunate, to have a son such as this born in this family!
For the prince has the thirty-two marks of a great man. A great man who possesses these has only two possible destinies, no other.
If he stays at home he becomes a king, a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extends to all four sides, he achieves stability in the country, and he possesses the seven treasures.
He has the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He has over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea, he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.
And what are the marks which he possesses?
After conquering this land girt by sea, he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
He has well-planted feet.
On the soles of his feet there are thousand-spoked wheels, with rims and hubs, complete in every detail.
He has projecting heels.
He has long fingers.
His hands and feet are tender.
His hands and feet cling gracefully.
His feet are arched.
His calves are like those of an antelope.
When standing upright and not bending over, the palms of both hands touch the knees.
His private parts are retracted.
He is gold colored; his skin has a golden sheen.
He has delicate skin, so delicate that dust and dirt don’t stick to his body.
His hairs grow one per pore.
His hairs stand up; they’re blue-black and curl clockwise.
His body is as straight as Brahmā’s.
He has bulging muscles in seven places.
His chest is like that of a lion.
The gap between the shoulder-blades is filled in.
He has the proportional circumference of a banyan tree: the span of his arms equals the height of his body.
His torso is cylindrical.
He has an excellent sense of taste.
His jaw is like that of a lion.
He has forty teeth.
His teeth are even.
His teeth have no gaps.
His teeth are perfectly white.
He has a large tongue.
He has the voice of Brahmā, like a cuckoo’s call.
His eyes are deep blue.
He has eyelashes like a cow’s.
Between his eyebrows there grows a tuft, soft and white like cotton-wool.
His head is shaped like a turban.
These are the thirty-two marks of a great man that the prince has. A great man who possesses these has only two possible destinies, no other.
If he stays at home he becomes a king, a wheel-turning monarch.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.’
How He Came to be Known as Vipassī
Then King Bandhuma had the brahmin soothsayers dressed in fresh clothes and satisfied all their needs.
Then the king appointed nurses for Prince Vipassī.
Some suckled him, some bathed him, some held him, and some carried him on their hip.
From when he was born, a white parasol was held over him night and day, with the thought,
‘Don’t let cold, heat, grass, dust, or damp bother him.’
He was dear and beloved by many people,
like a blue water lily, or a pink or white lotus.
He was always passed from hip to hip.
From when he was born, his voice was charming, graceful, sweet, and lovely.
It was as sweet as the song of a cuckoo-bird found in the Himalayas.
From when he was born, Prince Vipassī had the power of clairvoyance which manifested as a result of past deeds. He could see for a league all around both by day and by night.
And he was unblinkingly watchful, like the gods of the Thirty-Three.
And because it was said that he was unblinkingly watchful, he came to be known as ‘Vipassī’.
Then while King Bandhuma was sitting in judgment, he’d sit Prince Vipassī in his lap and explain the case to him.
And sitting there in his father’s lap, Vipassī would thoroughly consider the case and draw a conclusion using a logical procedure.
So this was all the more reason for him to be known as ‘Vipassī’.
Then King Bandhuma had three stilt longhouses built for him—one for the winter, one for the summer, and one for the rainy season,
and provided him with the five kinds of sensual stimulation.
Prince Vipassī stayed in a stilt longhouse without coming downstairs for the four months of the rainy season, where he was entertained by musicians—none of them men.
The Old Man
Then, after many thousand years had passed, Prince Vipassī addressed his charioteer,
‘My dear charioteer, harness the finest chariots. We will go to a park and see the scenery.’
‘Yes, sir,’ replied the charioteer. He harnessed the chariots and informed the prince,
‘Sire, the finest chariots are harnessed.
Please go at your convenience.’
Then Prince Vipassī mounted a fine carriage and, along with other fine carriages, set out for the park.
Along the way he saw an elderly man, bent double, crooked, leaning on a staff, trembling as he walked, ailing, past his prime.
He addressed his charioteer,
‘My dear charioteer, what has that man done?
For his hair and his body are unlike those of other men.’
‘That, Your Majesty, is called an old man.’
‘But why is he called an old man?’
‘He’s called an old man because now he has not long to live.’
‘But my dear charioteer, am I liable to grow old? Am I not exempt from old age?’
‘Everyone is liable to grow old, Your Majesty, including you. No-one is exempt from old age.’
‘Well then, my dear charioteer, that’s enough of the park for today.
Let’s return to the royal compound.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer and did so.
Back at the royal compound, the prince brooded, miserable and sad:
‘Damn this thing called rebirth, since old age will come to anyone who’s born.’
Then King Bandhuma summoned the charioteer and said,
‘My dear charioteer, I hope the prince enjoyed himself at the park?
I hope he was happy there?’
‘No, Your Majesty, the prince didn’t enjoy himself at the park.’
‘But what did he see on the way to the park?’
And the charioteer told the king about seeing the old man and the prince’s reaction.
The Sick Man
Then King Bandhuma thought,
‘Prince Vipassī must not renounce the throne. He must not go forth from the lay life to homelessness. And the words of the brahmin soothsayers must not come true.’
To this end he provided the prince with even more of the five kinds of sensual stimulation,
with which the prince amused himself.
Then, after many thousand years had passed, Prince Vipassī had his charioteer drive him to the park once more.
Along the way he saw a man who was ill, suffering, gravely ill, collapsed in his own urine and feces, being picked up by some and put down by others.
He addressed his charioteer,
‘My dear charioteer, what has that man done?
For his eyes and his voice are unlike those of other men.’
‘That, Your Majesty, is called a sick man.’
‘But why is he called a sick man?’
‘He’s called an sick man; hopefully he will recover from that illness.’
‘But my dear charioteer, am I liable to fall sick? Am I not exempt from sickness?’
‘Everyone is liable to fall sick, Your Majesty, including you. No-one is exempt from sickness.’
‘Well then, my dear charioteer, that’s enough of the park for today. Let’s return to the royal compound.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer and did so.
Back at the royal compound, the prince brooded, miserable and sad:
‘Damn this thing called rebirth, since old age and sickness will come to anyone who’s born.’
Then King Bandhuma summoned the charioteer and said,
‘My dear charioteer, I hope the prince enjoyed himself at the park? I hope he was happy there?’
‘No, Your Majesty, the prince didn’t enjoy himself at the park.’
‘But what did he see on the way to the park?’
And the charioteer told the king about seeing the sick man and the prince’s reaction.
The Dead Man
Then King Bandhuma thought,
‘Prince Vipassī must not renounce the throne. He must not go forth from the lay life to homelessness. And the words of the brahmin soothsayers must not come true.’
To this end he provided the prince with even more of the five kinds of sensual stimulation,
with which the prince amused himself.
Then, after many thousand years had passed, Prince Vipassī had his charioteer drive him to the park once more.
Along the way he saw a large crowd gathered making a bier out of garments of different colors.
He addressed his charioteer,
‘My dear charioteer, why is that crowd making a bier?’
‘That, Your Majesty, is for someone who’s departed.’
‘Well then, drive the chariot up to the departed.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer, and did so.
When the prince saw the corpse of the departed, he addressed the charioteer,
‘But why is he called departed?’
‘He’s called departed because now his mother and father, his relatives and kin shall see him no more, and he shall never again see them.’
‘But my dear charioteer, am I liable to die? Am I not exempt from death?
Will the king and queen and my other relatives and kin see me no more?
And shall I never again see them?’
‘Everyone is liable to die, Your Majesty, including you. No-one is exempt from death.
The king and queen and your other relatives and kin shall see you no more,
and you shall never again see them.’
‘Well then, my dear charioteer, that’s enough of the park for today. Let’s return to the royal compound.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer and did so.
Back at the royal compound, the prince brooded, miserable and sad:
‘Damn this thing called rebirth, since old age, sickness, and death will come to anyone who’s born.’
Then King Bandhuma summoned the charioteer and said,
‘My dear charioteer, I hope the prince enjoyed himself at the park? I hope he was happy there?’
‘No, Your Majesty, the prince didn’t enjoy himself at the park.’
‘But what did he see on the way to the park?’
And the charioteer told the king about seeing the dead man and the prince’s reaction.
The Renunciate
Then King Bandhuma thought,
‘Prince Vipassī must not renounce the throne. He must not go forth from the lay life to homelessness. And the words of the brahmin soothsayers must not come true.’
To this end he provided the prince with even more of the five kinds of sensual stimulation,
with which the prince amused himself.
Then, after many thousand years had passed, Prince Vipassī had his charioteer drive him to the park once more.
Along the way he saw a man, a renunciate with shaven head, wearing an ocher robe.
He addressed his charioteer,
‘My dear charioteer, what has that man done?
For his head and his clothes are unlike those of other men.’
‘That, Your Majesty, is called a renunciate.’
‘But why is he called a renunciate?’
‘He is called a renunciate because he celebrates principled and fair conduct, skillful actions, good deeds, harmlessness, and compassion for living creatures.’
‘Then I celebrate the one called a renunciate, who celebrates principled and fair conduct, skillful actions, good deeds, harmlessness, and compassion for living creatures!
Well then, drive the chariot up to that renunciate.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer, and did so.
Then Prince Vipassī said to that renunciate,
‘My good man, what have you done?
For your head and your clothes are unlike those of other men.’
‘Sire, I am what is called a renunciate.’
‘But why are you called a renunciate?’
‘I am called a renunciate because I celebrate principled and fair conduct, skillful actions, good deeds, harmlessness, and compassion for living creatures.’
‘Then I celebrate the one called a renunciate, who celebrates principled and fair conduct, skillful actions, good deeds, harmlessness, and compassion for living creatures!’
The Going Forth
Then the prince addressed the charioteer,
‘Well then, my dear charioteer, take the chariot and return to the royal compound.
I shall shave off my hair and beard right here, dress in ocher robes, and go forth from the lay life to homelessness.’
‘Yes, Your Majesty,’ replied the charioteer and did so.
Then Prince Vipassī shaved off his hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
A Great Crowd Goes Forth
A large crowd of 84,000 people in the capital of Bandhumatī heard
that Vipassī had gone forth.
It occurred to them,
‘This must be no ordinary teaching and training, no ordinary going forth in which Prince Vipassī has gone forth.
If even the prince goes forth, why don’t we do the same?’
Then that great crowd of 84,000 people shaved off their hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and followed the one intent on awakening, Vipassī, by going forth from the lay life to homelessness.
Escorted by that assembly, Vipassī wandered on tour among the villages, towns, and capital cities.
Then as he was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
‘It’s not appropriate for me to live in a crowd. Why don’t I live alone, withdrawn from the group?’
After some time he withdrew from the group to live alone. The 84,000 went one way, but Vipassī went another.
Vipassī’s Reflections
Then as Vipassī, the one intent on awakening, was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
‘Alas, this world has fallen into trouble. It’s born, grows old, dies, passes away, and is reborn, yet it doesn’t understand how to escape from this suffering, from old age and death.
Oh, when will an escape be found from this suffering, from old age and death?’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there old age and death? What is a condition for old age and death?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When rebirth exists there’s old age and death. Rebirth is a condition for old age and death.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there rebirth? What is a condition for rebirth?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When continued existence exists there’s rebirth. Continued existence is a condition for rebirth.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there continued existence? What is a condition for continued existence?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When grasping exists there’s continued existence. Grasping is a condition for continued existence.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there grasping? What is a condition for grasping?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When craving exists there’s grasping. Craving is a condition for grasping.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there craving? What is a condition for craving?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When feeling exists there’s craving. Feeling is a condition for craving.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there feeling? What is a condition for feeling?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When contact exists there’s feeling. Contact is a condition for feeling.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there contact? What is a condition for contact?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When the six sense fields exist there’s contact. The six sense fields are a condition for contact.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists are there the six sense fields? What is a condition for the six sense fields?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When name and form exist there are the six sense fields. Name and form are a condition for the six sense fields.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists are there name and form? What is a condition for name and form?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When consciousness exists there are name and form. Consciousness is a condition for name and form.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what exists is there consciousness? What is a condition for consciousness?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When name and form exist there’s consciousness. Name and form are a condition for consciousness.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘This consciousness turns back from name and form, and doesn’t go beyond that.’
It is to this extent that one may be reborn, grow old, die, pass away, or reappear. That is:
Name and form are conditions for consciousness. Consciousness is a condition for name and form. Name and form are conditions for the six sense fields. The six sense fields are conditions for contact. Contact is a condition for feeling. Feeling is a condition for craving. Craving is a condition for grasping. Grasping is a condition for continued existence. Continued existence is a condition for rebirth. Rebirth is a condition for old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress to come to be.
That is how this entire mass of suffering originates.’
‘Origination, origination.’ Such was the vision, knowledge, wisdom, realization, and light that arose in Vipassī, the one intent on awakening, regarding teachings not learned before from another.
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no old age and death? When what ceases do old age and death cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When rebirth doesn’t exist there’s no old age and death. When rebirth ceases, old age and death cease.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no rebirth? When what ceases does rebirth cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When continued existence doesn’t exist there’s no rebirth. When continued existence ceases, rebirth ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no continued existence? When what ceases does continued existence cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When grasping doesn’t exist there’s no continued existence. When grasping ceases, continued existence ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no grasping? When what ceases does grasping cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When craving doesn’t exist there’s no grasping. When craving ceases, grasping ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no craving? When what ceases does craving cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When feeling doesn’t exist there’s no craving. When feeling ceases, craving ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no feeling? When what ceases does feeling cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When contact doesn’t exist there’s no feeling. When contact ceases, feeling ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no contact? When what ceases does contact cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When the six sense fields don’t exist there’s no contact. When the six sense fields cease, contact ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist are there no six sense fields? When what ceases do the six sense fields cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When name and form don’t exist there are no six sense fields. When name and form cease, the six sense fields cease.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist are there no name and form? When what ceases do name and form cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When consciousness doesn’t exist there are no name and form. When consciousness ceases, name and form cease.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘When what doesn’t exist is there no consciousness? When what ceases does consciousness cease?’
Then, through proper attention, Vipassī comprehended with wisdom,
‘When name and form don’t exist there’s no consciousness. When name and form cease, consciousness ceases.’
Then Vipassī thought,
‘I have discovered the path to awakening. That is:
When name and form cease, consciousness ceases. When consciousness ceases, name and form cease. When name and form cease, the six sense fields cease. When the six sense fields cease, contact ceases. When contact ceases, feeling ceases. When feeling ceases, craving ceases. When craving ceases, grasping ceases. When grasping ceases, continued existence ceases. When continued existence ceases, rebirth ceases. When rebirth ceases, old age and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, sadness, and distress cease.
That is how this entire mass of suffering ceases.’
‘Cessation, cessation.’ Such was the vision, knowledge, wisdom, realization, and light that arose in Vipassī, the one intent on awakening, regarding teachings not learned before from another.
Some time later Vipassī meditated observing rise and fall in the five grasping aggregates.
‘Such is form, such is the origin of form, such is the ending of form.
Such is feeling, such is the origin of feeling, such is the ending of feeling.
Such is perception, such is the origin of perception, such is the ending of perception.
Such are choices, such is the origin of choices, such is the ending of choices.
Such is consciousness, such is the origin of consciousness, such is the ending of consciousness.’
Meditating like this his mind was soon freed from defilements by not grasping.
The Appeal of Brahmā
Then the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, thought,
‘Why don’t I teach the Dhamma?’
Then he thought,
‘This principle I have discovered is deep, hard to see, hard to understand, peaceful, sublime, beyond the scope of logic, subtle, comprehensible to the astute.
But people like attachment, they love it and enjoy it.
It’s hard for them to see this thing; that is, specific conditionality, dependent origination.
It’s also hard for them to see this thing; that is, the stilling of all activities, the letting go of all attachments, the ending of craving, fading away, cessation, extinguishment.
And if I were to teach the Dhamma, others might not understand me, which would be wearying and troublesome for me.’
And then these verses, which were neither supernaturally inspired, nor learned before in the past, occurred to him:
‘I’ve struggled hard to realize this,
enough with trying to explain it!
This teaching is not easily understood
by those mired in greed and hate.
Those caught up in greed can’t see
what’s subtle, going against the stream,
deep, hard to see, and very fine,
for they’re shrouded in a mass of darkness.’
So, as the Buddha Vipassī reflected like this, his mind inclined to remaining passive, not to teaching the Dhamma.
Then a certain Great Brahmā, knowing what the Buddha Vipassī was thinking, thought,
‘Oh my goodness! The world will be lost, the world will perish! For the mind of the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, inclines to remaining passive, not to teaching the Dhamma.’
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the Brahmā realm and reappeared in front of the Buddha Vipassī.
He arranged his robe over one shoulder, knelt on his right knee, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha Vipassī, and said,
‘Sir, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma! Let the Holy One teach the Dhamma!
There are beings with little dust in their eyes. They’re in decline because they haven’t heard the teaching.
There will be those who understand the teaching!’
When he said this, the Buddha Vipassī said to him,
‘I too thought this, Brahmā,
“Why don’t I teach the Dhamma?”
Then it occurred to me,
“If I were to teach the Dhamma, others might not understand me, which would be wearying and troublesome for me.”
So, as I reflected like this, my mind inclined to remaining passive, not to teaching the Dhamma.’
For a second time,
and a third time that Great Brahmā begged the Buddha to teach.
Then, understanding Brahmā’s invitation, the Buddha Vipassī surveyed the world with the eye of a Buddha, because of his compassion for sentient beings.
And he saw sentient beings with little dust in their eyes, and some with much dust in their eyes; with keen faculties and with weak faculties, with good qualities and with bad qualities, easy to teach and hard to teach. And some of them lived seeing the danger in the fault to do with the next world, while others did not.
It’s like a pool with blue water lilies, or pink or white lotuses.
Some of them sprout and grow in the water without rising above it, thriving underwater.
Some of them sprout and grow in the water reaching the water’s surface. And some of them sprout and grow in the water but rise up above the water and stand with no water clinging to them.
In the same way, the Buddha Vipassī saw sentient beings with little dust in their eyes, and some with much dust in their eyes.
Then that Great Brahmā, knowing what the Buddha Vipassī was thinking, addressed him in verse:
‘Standing high on a rocky mountain,
you can see the people all around.
In just the same way, all-seer, wise one,
having ascended the Temple of Truth,
rid of sorrow, look upon the people
swamped with sorrow, oppressed by rebirth and old age.
Rise, hero! Victor in battle, leader of the caravan,
wander the world without obligation.
Let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma!
There will be those who understand!’
Then the Buddha Vipassī addressed that Great Brahmā in verse:
‘Flung open are the doors to the deathless!
Let those with ears to hear decide their faith.
Thinking it would be troublesome, Brahmā, I did not teach
the sophisticated, sublime Dhamma among humans.’
Then the Great Brahmā, knowing that his request for the Buddha Vipassī to teach the Dhamma had been granted, bowed and respectfully circled him, keeping him on his right, before vanishing right there.
The Chief Disciples
Then the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, thought,
‘Who should I teach first of all?
Who will quickly understand this teaching?’
Then he thought,
‘That Khaṇḍa, the king’s son, and Tissa, the high priest’s son, are astute, competent, clever, and have long had little dust in their eyes.
Why don’t I teach them first of all? They will quickly understand this teaching.’
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, he vanished from the tree of awakening and reappeared near the capital city of Bandhumatī, in the deer park named Sanctuary.
Then the Buddha Vipassī addressed the park keeper,
‘My dear park keeper, please enter the city and say this to the king’s son Khaṇḍa and the high priest’s son Tissa:
“Sirs, the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, has arrived at Bandhumatī and is staying in the deer park named Sanctuary. He wishes to see you.”’
‘Yes, sir,’ replied the park keeper, and did as he was asked.
Then the king’s son Khaṇḍa and the high priest’s son Tissa had the finest carriages harnessed.
Then they mounted a fine carriage and, along with other fine carriages, set out from Bandhumatī for the Sanctuary.
They went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the Buddha Vipassī on foot.
They bowed and sat down to one side.
The Buddha Vipassī taught them step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven. He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when he knew that their minds were ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in the king’s son Khaṇḍa and the high priest’s son Tissa:
‘Everything that has a beginning has an end.’
They saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. They went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. They said to the Buddha Vipassī,
‘Excellent, sir! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, the Buddha has made the teaching clear in many ways.
We go for refuge to the Blessed One and to the teaching.
Sir, may we receive the going forth and ordination in the Buddha’s presence?’
And they received the going forth, the ordination in the Buddha Vipassī’s presence.
Then the Buddha Vipassī educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired them with a Dhamma talk.
He explained the drawbacks of conditioned phenomena, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of extinguishment.
Being taught like this their minds were soon freed from defilements by not grasping.
The Going Forth of the Large Crowd
A large crowd of 84,000 people in the capital of Bandhumatī heard
that the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, had arrived at Bandhumatī and was staying in the deer park named Sanctuary.
And they heard that the king’s son Khaṇḍa and the high priest’s son Tissa had shaved off their hair and beard, dressed in ocher robes, and gone forth from the lay life to homelessness in the Buddha’s presence.
It occurred to them,
‘This must be no ordinary teaching and training, no ordinary going forth in which the king’s son Khaṇḍa and the high priest’s son Tissa have gone forth.
If even they go forth, why don’t we do the same?’
Then those 84,000 people left Bandhumatī for the deer park named Sanctuary, where they approached the Buddha Vipassī, bowed and sat down to one side.
The Buddha Vipassī taught them step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven. He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when he knew that their minds were ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in those 84,000 people:
‘Everything that has a beginning has an end.’
They saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. They went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. They said to the Buddha Vipassī,
‘Excellent, sir! Excellent!’
And just like Khaṇḍa and Tissa they asked for and received ordination. Then the Buddha taught them further.
Being taught like this their minds were soon freed from defilements by not grasping.
The 84,000 Who Had Gone Forth Previously
The 84,000 people who had gone forth previously also heard:
‘It seems the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, has arrived at Bandhumatī and is staying in the deer park named Sanctuary. And he is teaching the Dhamma!’
Then they too went to see the Buddha Vipassī, realized the Dhamma, went forth, and became freed from defilements.
The Allowance to Wander
Now at that time a large Saṅgha of 6,800,000 mendicants were residing at Bandhumatī.
As the Buddha Vipassī was in private retreat this thought came to his mind,
‘The Saṅgha residing at Bandhumatī now is large. What if I was to urge them:
“Wander forth, mendicants, for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
Let not two go by one road.
Teach the Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And reveal a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
There are beings with little dust in their eyes. They’re in decline because they haven’t heard the teaching.
There will be those who understand the teaching!
But when six years have passed, you must all come to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.”’
Then a certain Great Brahmā, knowing what the Buddha Vipassī was thinking, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, vanished from the Brahmā realm and reappeared in front of the Buddha Vipassī.
He arranged his robe over one shoulder, knelt on his right knee, raised his joined palms toward the Buddha Vipassī, and said,
‘That’s so true, Blessed One! That’s so true, Holy One!
The Saṅgha residing at Bandhumatī now is large. Please urge them to wander, as you thought.
And sir, I’ll make sure that when six years have passed the mendicants will return to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.’
That’s what that Great Brahmā said.
Then he bowed and respectfully circled the Buddha Vipassī, keeping him on his right side, before vanishing right there.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha Vipassī came out of retreat and addressed the mendicants, telling them all that had happened. Then he said,
‘Wander forth, mendicants, for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans.
Let not two go by one road.
Teach the Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And reveal a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
There are beings with little dust in their eyes. They’re in decline because they haven’t heard the teaching.
There will be those who understand the teaching!
But when six years have passed, you must all come to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.’
Then most of the mendicants departed to wander the country that very day.
Now at that time there were 84,000 monasteries in India.
And when the first year came to an end the deities raised the cry:
‘Good sirs, the first year has ended.
Now five years remain.
When five years have passed, you must all go to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.’
And when the second year …
the third year …
the fourth year …
the fifth year came to an end, the deities raised the cry:
‘Good sirs, the fifth year has ended.
Now one year remains.
When one year has passed, you must all go to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.’
And when the sixth year came to an end the deities raised the cry:
‘Good sirs, the sixth year has ended.
Now is the time that you must go to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code.’
Then that very day the mendicants went to Bandhumatī to recite the monastic code. Some went by their own psychic power, and some by the psychic power of the deities.
And there the Blessed One Vipassī, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha, recited the monastic code thus:
‘Patient acceptance is the ultimate austerity.
Extinguishment is the ultimate, say the Buddhas.
No true renunciate injures another,
nor does an ascetic hurt another.
Not to do any evil;
to embrace the good;
to purify one’s mind:
this is the instruction of the Buddhas.
Not speaking ill nor doing harm;
restraint in the monastic code;
moderation in eating;
staying in remote lodgings;
commitment to the higher mind—
this is the instruction of the Buddhas.’
Being Informed by Deities
At one time, mendicants, I was staying near Ukkaṭṭhā, in the Subhaga Forest at the root of a magnificent sal tree.
As I was in private retreat this thought came to mind,
‘It’s not easy to find an abode of sentient beings where I haven’t previously abided in all this long time, except for the gods of the pure abodes.
Why don’t I go to see them?’
Then, as easily as a strong person would extend or contract their arm, I vanished from the Subhaga Forest and reappeared with the Aviha gods.
In that order of gods, many thousands, many hundreds of thousands of deities approached me, bowed, stood to one side, and said to me,
‘Ninety-one eons ago, good sir, the Buddha Vipassī arose in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
He was born as an aristocrat into an aristocrat family.
Koṇḍañña was his clan.
He lived for 80,000 years.
He was awakened at the root of a trumpet flower tree.
He had a fine pair of chief disciples named Khaṇḍa and Tissa.
He had three gatherings of disciples—one of 6,800,000, one of 100,000, and one of 80,000—all of them mendicants who had ended their defilements.
He had as chief attendant a mendicant named Asoka.
His father was King Bandhuma,
his birth mother was Queen Bandhumatī,
and their capital city was named Bandhumatī.
And such was his renunciation, such his going forth, such his striving, such his awakening, and such his rolling forth of the wheel of Dhamma.
And good sir, after leading the spiritual life under that Buddha Vipassī we lost our desire for sensual pleasures and were reborn here.’
In that order of gods, many hundreds of deities approached me, bowed, stood to one side, and said to me,
‘In the present fortunate eon, good sir, you have arisen in the world, perfected and fully awakened.
You were born as an aristocrat into an aristocrat family.
Gotama is your clan.
For you the life-span is short, brief, and fleeting. A long-lived person lives for a century or a little more.
You were awakened at the root of a peepul tree.
You have a fine pair of chief disciples named Sāriputta and Moggallāna.
You have had one gathering of disciples—1,250 mendicants who had ended their defilements.
You have as chief attendant a mendicant named Ānanda.
Your father was King Suddhodana,
your birth mother was Queen Māyā,
and your capital city was Kapilavatthu.
And such was your renunciation, such your going forth, such your striving, such your awakening, and such your rolling forth of the wheel of Dhamma.
And good sir, after leading the spiritual life under you we lost our desire for sensual pleasures and were reborn here.’
Then together with the Aviha gods I went to see the Atappa gods …
the Gods Fair to See …
and the Fair Seeing Gods.
Then together with all these gods I went to see the Gods of Akaniṭṭha, where we had a similar conversation.
And that is how the Realized One is able to recollect the caste, names, clans, life-span, chief disciples, and gatherings of disciples of the Buddhas of the past who have become completely extinguished, cut off proliferation, cut off the track, finished off the cycle, and transcended suffering. It is both because I have clearly comprehended the principle of the teachings,
and also because the deities told me.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the mendicants were happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
About Pāṭikaputta
On Sunakkhatta
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying in the land of the Mallas, near the Mallian town named Anupiya.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Anupiya for alms.
Then it occurred to him,
“It’s too early to wander for alms in Anupiya.
Why don’t I go to the wanderer Bhaggavagotta’s monastery to visit him?”
So that’s what he did.
Then the wanderer Bhaggavagotta said to the Buddha,
“Come, Blessed One!
Welcome, Blessed One!
It’s been a long time since you took the opportunity to come here.
Please, sir, sit down, this seat is ready.”
The Buddha sat on the seat spread out,
while Bhaggavagotta took a low seat, sat to one side,
and said to the Buddha,
“Sir, a few days ago Sunakkhatta the Licchavi came to me and said:
‘Now, Bhaggava, I have rejected the Buddha.
Now I no longer live dedicated to him.’
Sir, is what Sunakkhatta said true?”
“Indeed it is, Bhaggava.
A few days ago Sunakkhatta the Licchavi came to me, bowed, sat down to one side, and said:
‘Now I reject the Buddha!
Now I shall no longer live dedicated to you.’
When Sunakkhatta said this, I said to him,
‘But Sunakkhatta, did I ever say to you:
“Come, live dedicated to me”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘Or did you ever say to me:
“Sir, I shall live dedicated to the Buddha”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘So it seems that I did not ask you to
live dedicated to me,
nor did you say you would
live dedicated to me.
In that case, you silly man, are you really in a position to be rejecting anything?
See how far you have strayed!’
‘But sir, the Buddha never performs any superhuman demonstrations of psychic power for me.’
‘But Sunakkhatta, did I ever say to you:
“Come, live dedicated to me and I will perform a superhuman demonstration of psychic power for you”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘Or did you ever say to me:
“Sir, I shall live dedicated to the Buddha, and the Buddha will perform a superhuman demonstration of psychic power for me”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘So it seems that I did not ask this of you, and you did not require it of me.
In that case, you silly man, are you really in a position to be rejecting anything?
What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
Whether or not there is a demonstration of psychic power, does my teaching lead someone who practices it to the goal of the complete ending of suffering?’
‘It does, sir.’
‘So it seems that whether or not there is a demonstration of psychic power, my teaching leads someone who practices it to the goal of the complete ending of suffering.
In that case, what is the point of superhuman demonstrations of psychic power?
See how far you have strayed, you silly man!’
‘But sir, the Buddha never describes the origin of the world to me.’
‘But Sunakkhatta, did I ever say to you:
“Come, live dedicated to me and I will describe the origin of the world to you”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘Or did you ever say to me:
“Sir, I shall live dedicated to the Buddha, and the Buddha will describe the origin of the world to me”?’
‘No, sir.’
‘So it seems that I did not ask this of you, and you did not require it of me.
In that case, you silly man, are you really in a position to be rejecting anything?
What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
Whether or not the origin of the world is described, does my teaching lead someone who practices it to the goal of the complete ending of suffering?’
‘It does, sir.’
‘So it seems that whether or not the origin of the world is described, my teaching leads someone who practices it to the goal of the complete ending of suffering.
In that case, what is the point of describing the origin of the world?
See how far you have strayed, you silly man!
In many ways, Sunakkhatta, you have praised me like this in the Vajjian capital:
“That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.”
In many ways you have praised the teaching like this in the Vajjian capital:
“The teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves.”
In many ways you have praised the Saṅgha like this in the Vajjian capital:
“The Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples is practicing the way that’s good, direct, methodical, and proper. It consists of the four pairs, the eight individuals. This is the Saṅgha of the Buddha’s disciples that is worthy of offerings dedicated to the gods, worthy of hospitality, worthy of a religious donation, worthy of greeting with joined palms, and is the supreme field of merit for the world.”
I declare this to you, Sunakkhatta, I announce this to you!
There will be those who say that Sunakkhatta was unable to lead the spiritual life under the ascetic Gotama. That’s why he resigned the training and returned to a lesser life.
That’s what they’ll say.’
Though I spoke to Sunakkhatta like this, he still left this teaching and training, like someone on the highway to hell.
On Korakkhattiya
Bhaggava, this one time I was staying in the land of the Thūlus where they have a town named Uttarakā.
Then I robed up in the morning and, taking my bowl and robe, entered Uttarakā for alms with Sunakkhatta the Licchavi as my second monk.
Now at that time the naked ascetic Korakkhattiya had taken a vow to behave like a dog. When food is tossed on the ground, he gets down on all fours, eating and devouring it just with his mouth.
Sunakkhatta saw him doing this
and thought,
‘That ascetic is a true holy man!’
Then, knowing what Sunakkhatta was thinking, I said to him,
‘Don’t you claim to be an ascetic, a follower of the Sakyan, you silly man?’
‘But why does the Buddha say this to me?’
‘When you saw that naked ascetic Korakkhattiya, didn’t you think,
“That ascetic is a true holy man!”?’
‘Yes, sir.
But sir, are you jealous of the perfected ones?’
‘I’m not jealous of the perfected ones, you silly man.
Rather, you should give up this harmful misconception that has arisen in you.
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!
That naked ascetic Korakkhattiya, who you imagine to be a true holy man, will die of flatulence in seven days.
And when he dies, he’ll be reborn in the very lowest rank of demons, named the Kālakañjas.
And they’ll throw him in the charnel ground on a clump of vetiver.
If you wish, Sunakkhatta, go to Korakkhattiya and ask him
whether he knows his own destiny.
It’s possible that he will answer:
“Reverend Sunakkhatta, I know my own destiny.
I’ve been reborn in the very lowest rank of demons, named the Kālakañjas.”’
So, Bhaggava, Sunakkhatta went to see Korakkhattiya and said to him,
‘Reverend Korakkhattiya, the ascetic Gotama has declared
that you will die of flatulence in seven days.
And when you die, you’ll be reborn in the very lowest rank of demons, named the Kālakañjas.
And when you die, they’ll throw you in the charnel ground on a clump of vetiver.
But by eating just a little food and drinking just a little water,
you’ll prove what the ascetic Gotama says to be false.’
Then Sunakkhatta counted up the days until the seventh day, as happens when you have no faith in the Realized One.
But on the seventh day, the naked ascetic Korakkhattiya died of flatulence.
And when he passed away, he was reborn in the very lowest rank of demons, named the Kālakañjas.
And when he passed away, they threw him in the charnel ground on a clump of vetiver.
Sunakkhatta the Licchavi heard about this.
So he went to see Korakkhattiya in the charnel ground on the clump of vetiver. There he struck Korakkhattiya with his fist three times,
‘Reverend Korakkhattiya, do you know your destiny?’
Then Korakkhattiya got up, rubbing his back with his hands, and said,
‘Reverend Sunakkhatta, I know my own destiny.
I’ve been reborn in the very lowest rank of demons, named the Kālakañjas.’ After speaking, he fell flat right there.
Then Sunakkhatta came to me, bowed, and sat down to one side.
I said to him,
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
Did the declaration I made about Korakkhattiya turn out to be correct, or not?’
‘It turned out to be correct.’
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
If that is so, has a superhuman demonstration of psychic power been performed or not?’
‘Clearly, sir, a superhuman demonstration of psychic power has been performed.’
‘Though I performed such a superhuman demonstration of psychic power you say this:
“But sir, the Buddha never performs any superhuman demonstrations of psychic power for me.”
See how far you have strayed!’
Though I spoke to Sunakkhatta like this, he still left this teaching and training, like someone on the highway to hell.
On the Naked Ascetic Kaḷāramaṭṭaka
This one time, Bhaggava, I was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Now at that time the naked ascetic Kaḷāramaṭṭaka was residing in Vesālī. And in the Vajjian capital he had reached the peak of material possessions and fame.
He had undertaken these seven vows.
‘As long as I live, I will be a naked ascetic, not wearing clothes. As long as I live, I will be celibate, not having sex. As long as I live, I will consume only meat and alcohol, not eating rice and porridge.
And I will not go past the following tree shrines near Vesālī: the Udena shrine to the east, the Gotamaka to the south, the Sattamba to the west, and the Bahuputta to the north.’
And it was due to undertaking these seven vows that he had reached the peak of material possessions and fame.
So, Bhaggava, Sunakkhatta went to see Kaḷāramaṭṭaka and asked him a question.
But when he couldn’t answer it,
he displayed annoyance, hate, and bitterness.
So Sunakkhatta thought,
‘I’ve offended the holy man, the perfected one, the ascetic.
I mustn’t create lasting harm and suffering for myself!’
Then Sunakkhatta came to me, bowed, and sat down to one side.
I said to him,
‘Don’t you claim to be an ascetic, a follower of the Sakyan, you silly man?’
‘But why does the Buddha say this to me?’
‘Didn’t you go to see the naked ascetic Kaḷāramaṭṭaka and ask him a question?
But when he couldn’t answer it,
he displayed annoyance, hate, and bitterness.
Then you thought,
“I’ve offended the holy man, the perfected one, the ascetic.
I mustn’t create lasting harm and suffering for myself!”’
‘Yes, sir.
But sir, are you jealous of perfected ones?’
‘I’m not jealous of the perfected ones, you silly man.
Rather, you should give up this harmful misconception that has arisen in you.
Don’t create lasting harm and suffering for yourself!
That naked ascetic Kaḷāramaṭṭaka, who you imagine to be a true holy man,
will shortly be clothed, living with a partner, eating rice and porridge, having gone past all the shrines near Vesālī. And he will die after losing all his fame.’
And that’s exactly what happened.
Sunakkhatta heard about this.
He came to me, bowed, and sat down to one side.
I said to him,
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
Did the declaration I made about Kaḷāramaṭṭaka turn out to be correct, or not?’
‘It turned out to be correct.’
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
If that is so, has a superhuman demonstration of psychic power been performed or not?’
‘Clearly, sir, a superhuman demonstration of psychic power has been performed.’
‘Though I perform such a superhuman demonstration of psychic power you say this:
“But sir, the Buddha never performs any superhuman demonstrations of psychic power for me.”
See how far you have strayed!’
Though I spoke to Sunakkhatta like this, he still left this teaching and training, like someone on the highway to hell.
On the Naked Ascetic Pāṭikaputta
This one time, Bhaggava, I was staying right there near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Now at that time the naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta was residing in Vesālī. And in the Vajjian capital he had reached the peak of material possessions and fame.
He was telling a crowd in Vesālī:
‘Both the ascetic Gotama and I speak from knowledge.
One who speaks from knowledge ought to display a superhuman demonstration of psychic power to another who speaks from knowledge.
If the ascetic Gotama meets me half-way,
there we should both perform a superhuman demonstration of psychic power.
If he performs one demonstration of psychic power, I’ll perform two.
If he performs two, I’ll perform four.
If he performs four, I’ll perform eight.
However many demonstrations of psychic power the ascetic Gotama performs, I’ll perform double.’
Then Sunakkhatta came to me, bowed, sat down to one side, and told me of all this.
I said to him,
‘Sunakkhatta, the naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into my presence, unless he gives up that statement and that intention, and lets go of that view.
If he thinks he can
come into my presence without giving up those things, his head may explode.’
‘Careful what you say, Blessed One! Careful what you say, Holy One!’
‘But why do you say this to me, Sunakkhatta?’
‘Sir, the Buddha has definitively asserted that
Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into the Buddha’s presence, otherwise
his head may explode.
But Pāṭikaputta might come into the Buddha’s presence in disguise, proving the Buddha wrong.’
‘Sunakkhatta, would the Realized One make an ambiguous statement?’
‘But sir, did you make that statement after comprehending Pāṭikaputta’s mind with your mind?
Or did deities tell you about it?’
‘Both, Sunakkhatta.
For Ajita the Licchavi general has recently passed away and been reborn in the host of the Thirty-Three.
He came and told me this,
“The naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta is shameless, sir,
he is a liar.
For he has declared of me in the Vajjian capital:
‘Ajita the Licchavi general has been reborn in the Great Hell.’
But that is not true—
I have been reborn in the host of the Thirty-Three.
The naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta is shameless, sir,
he is a liar.
Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into the Buddha’s presence, otherwise
his head may explode.”
Thus I both made that statement after comprehending Pāṭikaputta’s mind with my mind,
and deities told me about it.
So Sunakkhatta, I’ll wander for alms in Vesālī. After the meal, on my return from alms-round, I’ll go to Pāṭikaputta’s monastery for the day’s meditation.
Now you may tell him, if you so wish.’
On Demonstrations of Psychic Power
Then, Bhaggava, I robed up in the morning and, taking my bowl and robe, entered Vesālī for alms.
After the meal, on my return from alms-round, I went to Pāṭikaputta’s monastery for the day’s meditation.
Then Sunakkhatta rushed into Vesālī to see the very well-known Licchavis and said to them,
‘Sirs, after his alms-round, the Buddha has gone to Pāṭikaputta’s monastery for the day’s meditation.
Come forth, sirs, come forth! There will be a superhuman demonstration of psychic power by the holy ascetics!’
So the very well-known Licchavis thought,
‘It seems there will be a superhuman demonstration of psychic power by the holy ascetics!
Let’s go!’
Then he went to see the very well-known well-to-do brahmins, rich householders, and ascetics and brahmins who follow various other paths, and said the same thing.
They all said,
‘It seems there will be a superhuman demonstration of psychic power by the holy ascetics!
Let’s go!’
Then all those very well-known people went to Pāṭikaputta’s monastery.
That assembly was large, Bhaggava; there were many hundreds, many thousands of them.
Pāṭikaputta heard,
‘It seems that very well-known Licchavis, well-to-do brahmins, rich householders, and ascetics and brahmins who follow various other paths have come forth.
And the ascetic Gotama is sitting in my monastery for the day’s meditation.’
When he heard that, he became frightened, scared, his hair standing on end.
In fear he went to the Pale-Moon Ebony Trunk Monastery of the wanderers.
The assembly heard of this,
and instructed a man,
‘Come, my man, go to see Pāṭikaputta at the Pale-Moon Ebony Trunk Monastery and say to him,
“Come forth, Reverend Pāṭikaputta! All these very well-known people have come forth, and the ascetic Gotama is sitting in your monastery for the day’s meditation.
For you stated this in the assembly at Vesālī:
‘Both the ascetic Gotama and I speak from knowledge.
One who speaks from knowledge ought to display a superhuman demonstration of psychic power to another who speaks from knowledge.
If the ascetic Gotama meets me half-way,
there we should both perform a superhuman demonstration of psychic power.
If he performs one demonstration of psychic power, I’ll perform two.
If he performs two, I’ll perform four.
If he performs four, I’ll perform eight.
However many demonstrations of psychic power the ascetic Gotama performs, I’ll perform double.’
Come forth, Reverend Pāṭikaputta, half-way.
The ascetic Gotama has come the first half, and is sitting in your monastery.”’
‘Yes, sir,’ replied that man, and delivered the message.
When he had spoken, Pāṭika said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
Then that man said to Pāṭikaputta,
‘What’s up, Reverend Pāṭikaputta? Is your bottom stuck to the bench, or is the bench stuck to your bottom?
You say “I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!” But wriggle as you might, you can’t get up from your seat.’
And as he was speaking, Pāṭika said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
When that man knew
that Pāṭikaputta had lost,
he returned to the assembly and said,
‘Pāṭikaputta has lost, sirs.
He says “I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!” But wriggle as he might, he can’t get up from his seat.’
When he said this, I said to the assembly,
‘The naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into my presence, unless he gives up that statement and that intention, and lets go of that view.
If he thinks he can
come into my presence without giving up those things, his head may explode.’
The first recitation section is finished.
Then, Bhaggava, a certain Licchavi minister stood up and said to the assembly,
‘Well then, sirs, wait a moment, I’ll go.
Hopefully I’ll be able to lead Pāṭikaputta back to the assembly.’
So that minister went to see Pāṭikaputta and said,
‘Come forth, Reverend Pāṭikaputta! It’s best for you to come forth.
All these very well-known people have come forth, and the ascetic Gotama is sitting in your monastery for the day’s meditation.
You said you’d meet the ascetic Gotama half-way.
The ascetic Gotama has come the first half, and is sitting in your monastery.
The ascetic Gotama has told the assembly
that you’re not capable of coming into his presence.
Come forth, Pāṭikaputta! When you come forth we’ll make you win and the ascetic Gotama lose.’
When he had spoken, Pāṭikaputta said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
Then the minister said to Pāṭikaputta,
‘What’s up, Reverend Pāṭikaputta? Is your bottom stuck to the bench, or is the bench stuck to your bottom?
You say “I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!” But wriggle as you might, you can’t get up from your seat.’
And as he was speaking, Pāṭikaputta said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
When the Licchavi minister knew
that Pāṭikaputta had lost,
he returned to the assembly and said,
‘Pāṭikaputta has lost, sirs.’
When he said this, I said to the assembly,
‘Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into my presence, otherwise
his head may explode.
Even if the good Licchavis were to think,
“Let’s bind Pāṭikaputta with straps and drag him with a pair of oxen!” But either the straps will break or Pāṭikaputta will.’
Then, Bhaggava, Jāliya, the pupil of the wood-bowl ascetic, stood up and said to the assembly,
‘Well then, sirs, wait a moment, I’ll go.
Hopefully I’ll be able to lead Pāṭikaputta back to the assembly.’
So Jāliya went to see Pāṭikaputta and said,
‘Come forth, Reverend Pāṭikaputta! It’s best for you to come forth.
All these very well-known people have come forth, and the ascetic Gotama is sitting in your monastery for the day’s meditation.
You said you’d meet the ascetic Gotama half-way.
The ascetic Gotama has come the first half, and is sitting in your monastery.
The ascetic Gotama has told the assembly
that you’re not capable of coming into his presence.
And he said that even if the Licchavis
try to bind you with straps and drag you with a pair of oxen, either the straps will break or you will.
Come forth, Pāṭikaputta! When you come forth we’ll make you win and the ascetic Gotama lose.’
When he had spoken, Pāṭikaputta said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
Then Jāliya said to Pāṭikaputta,
‘What’s up, Reverend Pāṭikaputta? Is your bottom stuck to the bench, or is the bench stuck to your bottom?
You say “I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!” But wriggle as you might, you can’t get up from your seat.’
And as he was speaking, Pāṭikaputta said: ‘I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!’ But wriggle as he might, he couldn’t get up from his seat.
When Jāliya knew
that Pāṭikaputta had lost, he said to him,
‘Once upon a time, Reverend Pāṭikaputta, it occurred to a lion, king of beasts,
“Why don’t I make my lair near a certain forest?
Towards evening I can emerge from my den, yawn, look all around the four directions, roar my lion’s roar three times, and set out on the hunt.
Having slain the very best of the deer herd, and eaten the most tender flesh, I could return to my den.”
And so that’s what he did.
Now, there was an old jackal who had grown fat on the lion’s leavings, becoming arrogant and strong.
He thought,
“What does the lion, king of beasts, have that I don’t?
Why don’t I also make my lair near a certain forest?
Towards evening I can emerge from my den, yawn, look all around the four directions, roar my lion’s roar three times, and set out on the hunt.
Having slain the very best of the deer herd, and eaten the most tender flesh, I could return to my den.”
And so that’s what he did.
But when he tried to roar a lion’s roar, he only managed to squeal and yelp like a jackal. And what is a pathetic jackal’s squeal next to the roar of a lion?
In the same way, reverend, while living on the harvest of the Holy One, enjoying the leftovers of the Holy One, you presume to attack the Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!
Who are the pathetic Pāṭikaputtas to attack the Realized Ones, the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas?’
When Jāliya couldn’t get Pāṭikaputta to shift from his seat even with this simile,
he said to him:
‘Seeing himself as equal to the lion,
the jackal presumed “I’m the king of the beasts!”
But in reality he only managed to yelp,
and what’s a sad jackal’s squeal to the roar of a lion?
In the same way, reverend, while living on the harvest of the Holy One, you presume to attack him!’
When Jāliya couldn’t get Pāṭikaputta to shift from his seat even with this simile,
he said to him:
‘Following in the steps of another,
seeing himself grown fat on scraps,
until he doesn’t even see himself,
the jackal presumes he’s a tiger.
But in reality he only managed to yelp,
and what’s a sad jackal’s squeal to the roar of a lion?
In the same way, reverend, while living on the harvest of the Holy One, you presume to attack him!’
When Jāliya couldn’t get Pāṭikaputta to shift from his seat even with this simile,
he said to him:
‘Gorged on frogs, and mice from the barn,
and carcasses tossed in the cemetery,
thriving in the great, empty wood,
the jackal presumed “I’m the king of the beasts!”
But in reality he only managed to yelp,
and what’s a sad jackal’s squeal to the roar of a lion?
In the same way, reverend, while living on the harvest of the Holy One, enjoying the leftovers of the Holy One, you presume to attack the Realized One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha!
Who are the pathetic Pāṭikaputtas to attack the Realized Ones, the perfected ones, the fully awakened Buddhas?’
When Jāliya couldn’t get Pāṭikaputta to shift from his seat even with this simile,
he returned to the assembly and said,
‘Pāṭikaputta has lost, sirs. He says “I’m coming, sir, I’m coming!” But wriggle as he might, he can’t get up from his seat.’
When he said this, I said to the assembly,
‘The naked ascetic Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into my presence, unless he gives up that statement and that intention, and lets go of that view.
If he thinks he can
come into my presence without giving up those things, his head may explode.
The good Licchavis might even think,
“Let’s bind Pāṭikaputta with straps and drag him with a pair of oxen!” But either the straps will break or Pāṭikaputta will.
Pāṭikaputta is not capable of coming into my presence, otherwise
his head may explode.’
Then, Bhaggava, I educated, encouraged, fired up, and inspired that assembly with a Dhamma talk. I released that assembly from the great bondage, and lifted 84,000 beings from the great swamp. Next I entered upon the fire element, rose into the sky to the height of seven palm trees, and created a flame another seven palm trees high, blazing and smoking. Finally I landed at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Then Sunakkhatta came to me, bowed, and sat down to one side.
I said to him,
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
Did the declaration I made about Pāṭikaputta turn out to be correct, or not?’
‘It turned out to be correct.’
‘What do you think, Sunakkhatta?
If that is so, has a superhuman demonstration of psychic power been performed or not?’
‘Clearly, sir, a superhuman demonstration of psychic power has been performed.’
‘Though I perform such a superhuman demonstration of psychic power you say this:
“But sir, the Buddha never performs any superhuman demonstrations of psychic power for me.”
See how far you have strayed!’
Though I spoke to Sunakkhatta like this, he still left this teaching and training, like someone on the highway to hell.
On Describing the Origin of the World
Bhaggava, I understand the origin of the world.
I understand this, and what goes beyond it. Yet since I do not misapprehend that understanding, I have realized extinguishment within myself. Directly knowing this, the Realized One does not come to ruin.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who describe the origin of the world in their tradition as created by the Lord God, by Brahmā.
I go up to them and say,
‘Is it really true that this is the venerables’ view?’
And they answer, ‘Yes’.
I say to them,
‘But how do you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about as created by the Lord God, by Brahmā?’
But they cannot answer, and they even question me in return.
So I answer them,
‘There comes a time when, reverends, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos contracts.
As the cosmos contracts, sentient beings are mostly headed for the realm of streaming radiance.
There they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
There comes a time when, after a very long period has passed, this cosmos expands.
As it expands an empty mansion of Brahmā appears.
Then a certain sentient being—due to the running out of their life-span or merit—passes away from that host of radiant deities and is reborn in that empty mansion of Brahmā.
There they are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
But after staying there all alone for a long time, they become dissatisfied and anxious,
“Oh, if only another being would come to this state of existence.”
Then other sentient beings—due to the running out of their life-span or merit—pass away from that host of radiant deities and are reborn in that empty mansion of Brahmā in company with that being.
There they too are mind-made, feeding on rapture, self-luminous, moving through the sky, steadily glorious, and they remain like that for a very long time.
Now, the being who was reborn there first thinks,
“I am Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
Why is that?
Because first I thought,
‘Oh, if only another being would come to this state of existence.’
Such was my heart’s wish, and then these creatures came to this state of existence.”
And the beings who were reborn there later also think,
“This must be Brahmā, the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born.
And we have been created by him.
Why is that?
Because we see that he was reborn here first, and we arrived later.”
And the being who was reborn first is more long-lived, beautiful, and illustrious than those who arrived later.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
“He who is Brahmā—the Great Brahmā, the Undefeated, the Champion, the Universal Seer, the Wielder of Power, the Lord God, the Maker, the Author, the First, the Begetter, the Controller, the Father of those who have been born and those yet to be born—is permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
We who were created by that Brahmā are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.”
This is how you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about as created by the Lord God, by Brahmā.’
‘That is what we have heard, Reverend Gotama, just as you say.’
Bhaggava, I understand the origin of the world.
I understand this, and what goes beyond it.
Yet since I do not misapprehend that understanding, I have realized extinguishment within myself. Directly knowing this, the Realized One does not come to ruin.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who describe the origin of the world in their tradition as due to those depraved by play.
I go up to them and say,
‘Is it really true that this is the venerables’ view?’
And they answer, ‘Yes’.
I say to them,
‘But how do you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about due to those depraved by play?’
But they cannot answer, and they even question me in return.
So I answer them,
‘Reverends, there are gods named “depraved by play”.
They spend too much time laughing, playing, and making merry.
And in doing so, they lose their mindfulness, and they pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
“The gods not depraved by play don’t spend too much time laughing, playing, and making merry.
So they don’t lose their mindfulness, and don’t pass away from that host of gods.
They are permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
But we who were depraved by play spent too much time laughing, playing, and making merry. In doing so, we lost our mindfulness, and passed away from that host of gods.
We are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.”
This is how you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about due to those depraved by play.’
‘That is what we have heard, Reverend Gotama, just as you say.’
Bhaggava, I understand the origin of the world.
Directly knowing this, the Realized One does not come to ruin.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who describe the origin of the world in their tradition as due to those who are malevolent.
I go up to them and say,
‘Is it really true that this is the venerables’ view?’
And they answer, ‘Yes’.
I say to them,
‘But how do you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about due to those who are malevolent?’
But they cannot answer, and they even question me in return.
So I answer them,
‘Reverends, there are gods named “malevolent”.
They spend too much time gazing at each other, so they grow angry with each other, and their bodies and minds get tired.
They pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect that past life, but no further.
“The gods who are not malevolent don’t spend too much time gazing at each other, so they don’t grow angry with each other, their bodies and minds don’t get tired, and they don’t pass away from that host of gods.
They are permanent, everlasting, eternal, imperishable, remaining the same for all eternity.
But we who were malevolent spent too much time gazing at each other, so our minds grew angry with each other, our bodies and minds got tired, and we passed away from that host of gods.
We are impermanent, not lasting, short-lived, perishable, and have come to this state of existence.”
This is how you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about due to those who are malevolent.’
‘That is what we have heard, Reverend Gotama, just as you say.’
Bhaggava, I understand the origin of the world.
Directly knowing this, the Realized One does not come to ruin.
There are some ascetics and brahmins who describe the origin of the world in their tradition as having arisen by chance.
I go up to them and say,
‘Is it really true that this is the venerables’ view?’
And they answer, ‘Yes’.
I say to them,
‘But how do you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about by chance?’
But they cannot answer, and they even question me in return.
So I answer them,
‘Reverends, there are gods named “non-percipient beings”.
When perception arises they pass away from that host of gods.
It’s possible that one of those beings passes away from that host and is reborn in this state of existence.
Having done so, they go forth from the lay life to homelessness.
By dint of keen, resolute, committed, and diligent effort, and right focus, they experience an immersion of the heart of such a kind that they recollect the arising of perception, but no further.
“The self and the cosmos arose by chance.
Why is that?
Because formerly I didn’t exist. Now from not being I’ve changed into being.”
This is how you describe in your tradition that the origin of the world came about by chance.’
‘That is what we have heard, Reverend Gotama, just as you say.’
I understand this, and what goes beyond it. Yet since I do not misapprehend that understanding, I have realized extinguishment within myself. Directly knowing this, the Realized One does not come to ruin.
Though I speak and explain like this, certain ascetics and brahmins misrepresent me with the false, hollow, lying, untruthful claim:
‘The ascetic Gotama has a distorted perspective, and so have his monks.
“When one enters and remains in the liberation of the beautiful, at that time one only perceives what is ugly.”’
But I don’t say that.
I say this:
‘When one enters and remains in the liberation of the beautiful, at that time one only perceives what is beautiful.’”
“They are the ones with a distorted perspective, sir, who regard the Buddha and the mendicants in this way.
Sir, I am quite confident that the Buddha is capable of teaching me so that I can enter and remain in the liberation on the beautiful.”
“It’s hard for you to enter and remain in the liberation on the beautiful, since you have a different view, creed, preference, practice, and tradition.
Come now, Bhaggava, carefully preserve the confidence that you have in me.”
“If it’s hard for me to enter and remain in the liberation on the beautiful, since I have a different view, creed, preference, practice, and tradition,
I shall carefully preserve the confidence that I have in the Buddha.”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, the wanderer Bhaggavagotta was happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
With Janavasabha
Declaring the Rebirths of People From Nādika and Elsewhere
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying at Nādika in the brick house.
Now at that time the Buddha was explaining the rebirths of devotees all over the nations; the Kāsis and Kosalans, Vajjis and Mallas, Cetīs and Vaṁsas, Kurus and Pañcālas, Macchas and Sūrasenas:
“This one was reborn here, while that one was reborn there.
Over fifty devotees in Nādika have passed away having ended the five lower fetters. They’ve been reborn spontaneously, and will be extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
More than ninety devotees in Nādika have passed away having ended three fetters, and weakened greed, hate, and delusion. They’re once-returners, who will come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
In excess of five hundred devotees in Nādika have passed away having ended three fetters. They’re stream-enterers, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.”
When the devotees of Nādika heard about the Buddha’s
answers to those questions, they became uplifted and overjoyed, full of rapture and happiness.
Venerable Ānanda heard of the Buddha’s statements and the Nādikans’ happiness.
Ānanda’s Suggestion
Then Venerable Ānanda thought,
“But there were also Magadhan devotees—many, and of long standing too—who have passed away.
You’d think that Aṅga and Magadha were empty of devotees who have passed away!
But they too had confidence in the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and had fulfilled their ethics.
The Buddha hasn’t declared their passing.
It would be good to do so, for many people would gain confidence, and so be reborn in a good place.
That King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha was a just and principled king who benefited the brahmins and householders of town and country.
People still sing his praises:
‘That just and principled king, who made us so happy, has passed away. Life was good under his dominion.’
He too had confidence in the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and had fulfilled his ethics.
People say:
‘Until his dying day, King Bimbisāra sang the Buddha’s praises!’
The Buddha hasn’t declared his passing.
It would be good to do so, for many people would gain confidence, and so be reborn in a good place.
Besides, the Buddha was awakened in Magadha;
so why hasn’t he declared the rebirth of the Magadhan devotees?
If he fails to do so, they will be dejected.”
After pondering the fate of the Magadhan devotees alone in private, Ānanda rose at the crack of dawn and went to see the Buddha.
He bowed, sat down to one side, and told the Buddha of his concerns, finishing by saying,
“Why hasn’t the Buddha declared the rebirth of the Magadhan devotees? If he fails to do so, they will be dejected.”
Then Ānanda, after making this suggestion regarding the Magadhan devotees, got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled the Buddha, keeping him on his right, before leaving.
Soon after Ānanda had left, the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, entered Nādika for alms.
He wandered for alms in Nādika. After the meal, on his return from alms-round, he washed his feet and entered the brick house. He paid heed, paid attention, and concentrated wholeheartedly on the fate of Magadhan devotees, and sat on the seat spread out, thinking,
“I shall know their destiny, where they are reborn in the next life.”
And he saw where they had been reborn.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came out of retreat. Emerging from the brick house, he sat on the seat spread out in the shade of the porch.
Then Venerable Ānanda went up to the Buddha, bowed, sat down to one side, and said to him,
“Sir, you look so serene; your face seems to shine owing to the clarity of your faculties.
Have you been abiding in a peaceful meditation today, sir?”
The Buddha then recounted what had happened since speaking to Ānanda, revealing that he had seen the destiny of the Magadhan devotees. He continued:
Janavasabha the Spirit
“Then, Ānanda an invisible spirit called out:
‘I am Janavasabha, Blessed One!
I am Janavasabha, Holy One!’
Ānanda, do you recall having previously heard such a name as Janavasabha?”
“No, sir. But when I heard the word, I got goosebumps!
I thought,
‘This must be no ordinary spirit to bear such an exalted name as Janavasabha.’”
“After making himself heard while invisible, Ānanda, a very beautiful spirit appeared in front of me.
And for a second time he called out:
‘I am Bimbisāra, Blessed One!
I am Bimbisāra, Holy One!
This is the seventh time I have been reborn in the company of the Great King Vessavaṇa. After passing away from there, I am now able to become a king of non-humans.
Seven from here, seven from there—
fourteen transmigrations in all.
That’s how many past lives
I can recollect.
For a long time I’ve known that I won’t be reborn in the underworld, but that I still hope to become a once-returner.’
‘It’s incredible and amazing that you, the venerable spirit Janavasabha, should say:
“For a long time I’ve been aware that I won’t be reborn in the underworld” and also “But I still hope to become a once-returner.” But from what source do you know that you’ve achieved such a high distinction?’
‘None other than the Blessed One’s instruction! None other than the Holy One’s instruction!
From the day I had absolute devotion to the Buddha I have known that I won’t be reborn in the underworld, but that I still hope to become a once-returner.
Just now, sir, I had been sent out by the great king Vessavaṇa to the great king Virūḷhaka’s presence on some business, and on the way I saw the Buddha giving his attention to the fate of the Magadhan devotees.
But it comes as no surprise that I have heard and learned the fate of the Magadhan devotees in the presence of the great king Vessavaṇa as he was speaking to his assembly.
It occurred to me,
“I shall see the Buddha and inform him of this.”
These are the two reasons I’ve come to see the Buddha.
The Council of the Gods
Sir, it was more than a few days ago—on the fifteenth day sabbath on the full moon day at the entry to the rainy season—when all the gods of the Thirty-Three were sitting together in the Hall of Justice.
A large assembly of gods was sitting all around, and the Four Great Kings were seated at the four directions.
The Great King Dhataraṭṭha was seated to the east, facing west, in front of his gods.
The Great King Virūḷhaka was seated to the south, facing north, in front of his gods.
The Great King Virūpakkha was seated to the west, facing east, in front of his gods.
The Great King Vessavaṇa was seated to the north, facing south, in front of his gods.
When the gods of the Thirty-Three have a gathering like this, that is how they are seated.
After that come our seats.
Sir, those gods who had been recently reborn in the company of the Thirty-Three after leading the spiritual life under the Buddha outshone the other gods in beauty and glory.
The gods of the Thirty-Three became uplifted and overjoyed at that, full of rapture and happiness, saying,
“The heavenly hosts swell, while the demon hosts dwindle!”
Seeing the joy of those gods, Sakka, lord of gods, celebrated with these verses:
“The gods rejoice—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching;
and seeing the new gods,
so beautiful and glorious,
who have come here after leading
the spiritual life under the Buddha!
They outshine the others
in beauty, glory, and lifespan.
Here are the distinguished disciples
of he whose wisdom is vast.
Seeing this, they delight—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching.”
The gods of the Thirty-Three became even more uplifted and overjoyed at that, saying:
“The heavenly hosts swell, while the demon hosts dwindle!”
Then the gods of the Thirty-Three, having considered and deliberated on the matter for which they were seated together in the Hall of Justice, advised and instructed the Four Great Kings on the subject.
And each stood at his own seat without departing.
The Kings were instructed,
and heeded good advice.
With clear and peaceful minds,
they stood by their own seats.
Then in the northern quarter a magnificent light arose and radiance appeared, surpassing the glory of the gods.
Then Sakka, lord of gods, addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three,
“As indicated by the signs—light arising and radiance appearing—Brahmā will appear.
For this is the precursor for the appearance of Brahmā, namely light arising and radiance appearing.”
As indicated by the signs,
Brahmā will appear.
For this is the sign of Brahmā:
a light vast and great.
On Sanaṅkumāra
Then the gods of the Thirty-Three sat in their own seats, saying,
“We shall find out what has caused that light, and only when we have realized it shall we go to it.”
And the Four Great Kings did likewise.
Hearing that, the gods of the Thirty-Three agreed in unison,
“We shall find out what has caused that light, and only when we have realized it shall we go to it.”
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, he does so after manifesting in a solid corporeal form.
For the gods of the Thirty-Three aren’t able to see a Brahmā’s normal appearance.
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, he outshines the other gods in beauty and glory,
as a golden statue outshines the human form.
When Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra appears to the gods of the Thirty-Three, not a single god in that assembly greets him by bowing down or rising up or inviting him to a seat.
They all sit silently on their couches with their joined palms raised, thinking,
“Now Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra will sit on the couch of whatever god he chooses.”
And the god on whose couch Brahmā sits is overjoyed and brimming with happiness,
like a king on the day of his coronation.
Then Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra manifested in a solid corporeal form, taking on the appearance of the youth Pañcasikha, and appeared to the gods of the Thirty-Three.
Rising into the air, he sat cross-legged in the sky,
like a strong man might sit cross-legged on a well-appointed couch or on level ground.
Seeing the joy of those gods, Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra celebrated with these verses:
“The gods rejoice—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching;
and seeing the new gods,
so beautiful and glorious,
who have come here after leading
the spiritual life under the Buddha!
They outshine the others
in beauty, glory, and lifespan.
Here are the distinguished disciples
of he whose wisdom is vast.
Seeing this, they delight—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
revering the Realized One,
and the natural excellence of the teaching!”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And while he was speaking on that topic, his voice had eight qualities: it was clear, comprehensible, charming, audible, rounded, undistorted, deep, and resonant.
He makes sure his voice is intelligible as far as the assembly goes, but it doesn’t extend outside the assembly.
When someone has a voice like this, they’re said to have the voice of Brahmā.
Then Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra, having manifested thirty-three corporeal forms, sat down on the couches of each of the gods of the Thirty-Three and addressed them,
“What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think about how much the Buddha has acted for the welfare and happiness of the people, out of compassion for the world, for the benefit, welfare, and happiness of gods and humans?
For consider those who have gone for refuge to the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and have fulfilled their ethics. When their bodies break up, after death, some are reborn in the company of the Gods Who Control the Creations of Others, some with the Gods Who Love to Create, some with the Joyful Gods, some with the Gods of Yama, some with the Gods of the Thirty-Three, and some with the Gods of the Four Great Kings.
And at the very least they swell the hosts of the fairies.”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And while he was speaking on that topic, each of the gods fancied,
“The one sitting on my couch is the only one speaking.”
When one is speaking,
all the forms speak.
When one sits in silence,
they all remain silent.
But those gods imagine—
the Thirty-Three with their Lord—
that the one on their seat
is the only one to speak.
The Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra merged into one corporeal form. Then he sat on the couch of Sakka, lord of gods, and addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three:
Developing the Bases of Psychic Power
“What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think about how much the four bases of psychic power have been clearly described by the Blessed One—the one who knows and sees, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha—for the multiplication, generation, and transformation of corporeal forms through psychic power?
What four?
It’s when a mendicant develops the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to enthusiasm, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to energy, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to mental development, and active effort.
They develop the basis of psychic power that has immersion due to inquiry, and active effort.
These are the four bases of psychic power that have been clearly described by the Buddha, for the multiplication, generation, and transformation of corporeal forms through psychic power.
All the ascetics and brahmins in the past,
or present who wield the many kinds of psychic power do so by developing and cultivating these four bases of psychic power.
Gentlemen, do you see such psychic might and power in me?”
“Yes, Great Brahmā.”
“I too became so mighty and powerful by developing and cultivating these four bases of psychic power.”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And having spoken about that, he addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three:
The Three Openings
“What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think about how much the Buddha has understood the three opportunities for achieving happiness?
What three?
First, take someone who lives mixed up with sensual pleasures and unskillful qualities.
After some time they hear the teaching of the noble ones, properly attend to how it applies to them, and practice accordingly.
They live aloof from sensual pleasures and unskillful qualities.
That gives rise to pleasure, and more than pleasure, happiness,
like the joy that’s born from gladness.
This is the first opportunity for achieving happiness.
Next, take someone whose coarse physical, verbal, and mental processes have not died down.
After some time they hear the teaching of the noble ones, properly attend to how it applies to them, and practice accordingly.
Their coarse physical, verbal, and mental processes die down.
That gives rise to pleasure, and more than pleasure, happiness,
like the joy that’s born from gladness.
This is the second opportunity for achieving happiness.
Next, take someone who doesn’t truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful,
what is blameworthy and what is blameless, what should be cultivated and what should not be cultivated, what is inferior and what is superior, and what is on the side of dark and the side of bright.
After some time they hear the teaching of the noble ones, properly attend to how it applies to them, and practice accordingly.
They truly understand what is skillful and what is unskillful, and so on.
Knowing and seeing like this, ignorance is given up and knowledge arises.
That gives rise to pleasure, and more than pleasure, happiness,
like the joy that’s born from gladness.
This is the third opportunity for achieving happiness.
These are the three opportunities for achieving happiness that have been understood by the Buddha.”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And having spoken about that, he addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three:
Mindfulness Meditation
“What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think about how much the Buddha has clearly described the four kinds of mindfulness meditation for achieving what is skillful?
What four?
It’s when a mendicant meditates by observing an aspect of the body internally—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
As they meditate in this way, they become rightly immersed in that, and rightly serene.
Then they give rise to knowledge and vision of other people’s bodies externally.
They meditate observing an aspect of feelings internally …
Then they give rise to knowledge and vision of other people’s feelings externally.
They meditate observing an aspect of the mind internally …
Then they give rise to knowledge and vision of other people’s minds externally.
They meditate observing an aspect of principles internally—keen, aware, and mindful, rid of desire and aversion for the world.
As they meditate in this way, they become rightly immersed in that, and rightly serene.
Then they give rise to knowledge and vision of other people’s principles externally.
These are the four kinds of mindfulness meditation that the Buddha has clearly described for achieving what is skillful.”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke.
And having spoken about that, he addressed the gods of the Thirty-Three:
Seven Prerequisites of Immersion
“What do the good gods of the Thirty-Three think about how much the Buddha has clearly described the seven prerequisites of immersion for the development and fulfillment of right immersion?
What seven?
Right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, and right mindfulness.
Unification of mind with these seven factors as prerequisites is called noble right immersion ‘with its vital conditions’ and ‘with its prerequisites’.
Right view gives rise to right thought.
Right thought gives rise to right speech. Right speech gives rise to right action. Right action gives rise to right livelihood. Right livelihood gives rise to right effort. Right effort gives rise to right mindfulness. Right mindfulness gives rise to right immersion. Right immersion gives rise to right knowledge. Right knowledge gives rise to right freedom.
If anything should be rightly described as
‘a teaching that’s well explained by the Buddha, visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves; and the doors to the deathless are flung open,’ it’s this.
For the teaching is well explained by the Buddha—visible in this very life, immediately effective, inviting inspection, relevant, so that sensible people can know it for themselves—and the doors of the deathless are flung open.
Whoever has experiential confidence in the Buddha, the teaching, and the Saṅgha, and has the ethical conduct loved by the noble ones; and whoever is spontaneously reborn, and is trained in the teaching; in excess of 2,400,000 such Magadhan devotees have passed away having ended three fetters. They’re stream-enterers, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
And there are once-returners here, too.
And as for other people
who I think have shared in merit—
I couldn’t even number them,
for fear of speaking falsely.”
That is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke. And while he was speaking on that topic, this thought came to the great king Vessavaṇa,
“It’s incredible, it’s amazing! That there should be such a magnificent Teacher, and such a magnificent exposition of the teaching! And that such achievements of high distinction should be made known!”
And then Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra, knowing what the great king Vessavaṇa was thinking, said to him,
“What does Great King Vessavaṇa think? In the past, too, there was such a magnificent Teacher, and such a magnificent exposition of the teaching! And such achievements of high distinction were made known!
In the future, too, there will be such a magnificent Teacher, and such a magnificent exposition of the teaching! And such achievements of high distinction will be made known!”
That, sir, is the topic on which Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra spoke to the gods of the Thirty-Three. And the great king Vessavaṇa, having heard and learned it in the presence of Brahmā as he was speaking on that topic, informed his own assembly.’”
And the spirit Janavasabha, having heard and learned it in the presence of the great king Vessavaṇa as he was speaking on that topic to his own assembly, informed the Buddha.
And the Buddha, having heard and learned it in the presence of the spirit Janavasabha, and also from his own direct knowledge, informed Venerable Ānanda. And Venerable Ānanda, having heard and learned it in the presence of the Buddha, informed the monks, nuns, laymen, and laywomen.
And that’s how this spiritual life has become successful and prosperous, extensive, popular, widespread, and well proclaimed wherever there are gods and humans.
Long Discourses
With Ambaṭṭha
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of around five hundred mendicants when he arrived at a village of the Kosalan brahmins named Icchānaṅgala.
He stayed in a forest near Icchānaṅgala.
The Section on Pokkharasāti
Now at that time the brahmin Pokkharasāti was living in Ukkaṭṭhā. It was a crown property given by King Pasenadi of Kosala, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
Pokkharasāti heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Icchānaṅgala and is staying in a forest nearby.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
The Brahmin Student Ambaṭṭha
Now at that time Pokkharasāti had a student named Ambaṭṭha. He was one who recited and remembered the hymns, and had mastered in the three Vedas, together with their vocabularies, ritual, phonology and etymology, and the testament as fifth. He knew philology and grammar, and was well versed in cosmology and the marks of a great man. He had been authorized as a master in his own teacher’s scriptural heritage of the three Vedas with the words:
“What I know, you know.
And what you know, I know.”
Then Pokkharasāti addressed Ambaṭṭha,
“Dear Ambaṭṭha, the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Icchānaṅgala and is staying in a forest nearby. …
It’s good to see such perfected ones.
Please, dear Ambaṭṭha, go to the ascetic Gotama and find out whether or not he lives up to his reputation.
Through you I shall learn about Master Gotama.”
“But sir, how shall I find out whether or not the ascetic Gotama lives up to his reputation?”
“Dear Ambaṭṭha, the thirty-two marks of a great man have been handed down in our hymns. A great man who possesses these has only two possible destinies, no other.
If he stays at home he becomes a king, a wheel-turning monarch, a just and principled king. His dominion extends to all four sides, he achieves stability in the country, and he possesses the seven treasures.
He has the following seven treasures:
the wheel, the elephant, the horse, the jewel, the woman, the treasurer, and the counselor as the seventh treasure.
He has over a thousand sons who are valiant and heroic, crushing the armies of his enemies.
After conquering this land girt by sea, he reigns by principle, without rod or sword.
But if he goes forth from the lay life to homelessness, he becomes a perfected one, a fully awakened Buddha, who draws back the veil from the world.
But, dear Ambaṭṭha, I am the one who gives the hymns,
and you are the one who receives them.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Ambaṭṭha. He got up from his seat, bowed, and respectfully circled Pokkharasāti, keeping him to his right. He mounted a mare-drawn chariot and, together with several students, set out for the forest near Icchānaṅgala.
He went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and entered the monastery on foot.
At that time several mendicants were walking mindfully in the open air.
Then the student Ambaṭṭha went up to those mendicants and said,
“Gentlemen, where is Master Gotama at present?
For we have come here to see him.”
Then those mendicants thought,
“This Ambaṭṭha is from a well-known family, and he is the pupil of the well-known brahmin Pokkharasāti.
The Buddha won’t mind having a discussion together with such gentlemen.”
They said to Ambaṭṭha,
“Ambaṭṭha, that’s his dwelling, with the door closed. Approach it quietly, without hurrying; go onto the porch, clear your throat, and knock with the latch. The Buddha will open the door.”
So he approached the Buddha’s dwelling and knocked, and the Buddha opened the door.
Ambaṭṭha and the other students entered the dwelling.
The other students exchanged greetings with the Buddha, and when the greetings and polite conversation were over, sat down to one side.
But while the Buddha was sitting, Ambaṭṭha spoke some polite words or other while walking around or standing.
So the Buddha said to him,
“Ambaṭṭha, is this how you hold a discussion with elderly and senior brahmins, the teachers of teachers: walking around or standing while I’m sitting, speaking some polite words or other?”
The First Use of the Word “Riffraff”
“No, Master Gotama.
For it is proper for one brahmin to converse with another while both are walking, standing, sitting, or lying down.
But as to these shavelings, fake ascetics, riffraff, black spawn from the feet of our Kinsman, I converse with them as I do with Master Gotama.”
“But Ambaṭṭha, you must have come here for some purpose. You should focus on that.
Though this Ambaṭṭha is unqualified, he thinks he’s qualified. What is that but lack of qualifications?”
When he said this, Ambaṭṭha became angry and upset with the Buddha because of being described as unqualified. He even attacked and badmouthed the Buddha himself, saying,
“The ascetic Gotama will be worsted!” He said to the Buddha,
“Master Gotama, the Sakyan clan are rude,
and argumentative.
Riffraff they are, and riffraff they remain! They don’t honor, respect, revere, worship, or venerate brahmins.
It is neither proper nor appropriate that the Sakyans—riffraff that they are—don’t honor, respect, revere, worship, or venerate brahmins.”
And that’s how Ambaṭṭha denigrated the Sakyans with the word “riffraff” for the first time.
The Second Use of the Word “Riffraff”
“But Ambaṭṭha, how have the Sakyans wronged you?”
“This one time, Master Gotama, I went to Kapilavatthu on some business for my teacher, the brahmin Pokkharasāti.
I approached the Sakyans in their meeting hall.
Now at that time several Sakyans and Sakyan princes were sitting on high seats, poking each other with their fingers, giggling and playing together. In fact, they even presumed to giggle at me, and didn’t invite me to a seat.
It is neither proper nor appropriate that the Sakyans—riffraff that they are—don’t honor, respect, revere, worship, or venerate brahmins.”
And that’s how Ambaṭṭha denigrated the Sakyans with the word “riffraff” for the second time.
The Third Use of the Word “Riffraff”
“Even a little quail, Ambaṭṭha, speaks as she likes in her own nest.
Kapilavatthu is the Sakyans own place, Ambaṭṭha. It’s not worthy of the Venerable Ambaṭṭha to lose his temper over such a small thing.”
“Master Gotama, there are these four castes:
aristocrats, brahmins, merchants, and workers.
Three of these castes—
aristocrats, merchants, and workers—
in fact succeed only in serving the brahmins.
It is neither proper nor appropriate that the Sakyans—riffraff that they are—don’t honor, respect, revere, worship, or venerate brahmins.”
And that’s how Ambaṭṭha denigrated the Sakyans with the word “riffraff” for the third time.
The Word “Son of Bondservants” is Used
Then it occurred to the Buddha,
“This Ambaṭṭha puts the Sakyans down too much by calling them riffraff. Why don’t I ask him about his own clan?”
So the Buddha said to him,
“What is your clan, Ambaṭṭha?”
“I am a Kaṇhāyana, Master Gotama.”
“But, recollecting the ancient name and clan of your mother and father, the Sakyans were the children of the masters, while you’re descended from the son of a female bondservant of the Sakyans.
But the Sakyans claim King Okkāka as their grandfather.
Once upon a time, King Okkāka, wishing to divert the royal succession to the son of his most beloved queen, banished the elder princes from the realm—
Okkāmukha, Karakaṇḍa, Hatthinika, and Sinisūra.
They made their home beside a lotus pond on the slopes of the Himalayas, where there was a large teak grove.
For fear of diluting their lineage, they slept with their own sisters.
Then King Okkāka addressed his ministers and counselors,
‘Where, sirs, have the princes settled now?’
‘Sire, there is a lotus pond on the slopes of the Himalayas, by a large grove of _sāka_, the teak tree. They’ve settled there.
For fear of diluting their lineage, they are sleeping with their own (_saka_) sisters.’
Then, Ambaṭṭha, King Okkāka expressed this heartfelt sentiment:
‘The princes are indeed Sakyans! The princes are indeed the best Sakyans!’
From that day on the Sakyans were recognized, and he was their founder.
Now, King Okkāka had a female bondservant named Disā.
She gave birth to a black boy.
When he was born, Black Boy said:
‘Wash me, mum, bathe me! Get this filth off of me! I will be useful for you!’
Whereas these days when people see goblins they know them as goblins,
in those days they knew goblins as ‘blackboys’.
They said:
‘He spoke as soon as he was born—a blackboy is born! A goblin is born!’
From that day on the Kaṇhāyanas were recognized, and he was their founder.
That’s how, recollecting the ancient name and clan of your mother and father, the Sakyans were the children of the masters, while you’re descended from the son of a female bondservant of the Sakyans.”
When he said this, those students said to him,
“Master Gotama, please don’t put Ambaṭṭha down too much by calling him the son of a bondservant.
He’s well-born, a gentleman, learned, a good speaker, and astute. He’s capable of having a dialogue with Master Gotama about this.”
So the Buddha said to them,
“Well, students, if you think that
Ambaṭṭha is ill-born, not a gentleman, uneducated, a poor speaker, witless, and not capable of having a dialogue with me about this, then leave him aside and you can have a dialogue with me.
But if you think that
he’s well-born, a gentleman, learned, a good speaker, astute, and capable of having a dialogue with me about this, then you should stand aside and let him have a dialogue with me.”
“He is capable of having a dialogue. We will be silent, and let Ambaṭṭha have a dialogue with Master Gotama.”
So the Buddha said to Ambaṭṭha,
“Well, Ambaṭṭha, there’s a legitimate question that comes up. You won’t like it, but you ought to answer anyway.
If you don’t answer, but dodge the issue, remain silent, or simply leave, your head will explode into seven pieces right here.
What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
According to what you have heard from elderly and senior brahmins, the teachers of teachers, what is the origin of the Kaṇhāyanas, and who is their founder?”
When he said this, Ambaṭṭha kept silent.
For a second time, the Buddha put the question,
and for a second time Ambaṭṭha kept silent.
So the Buddha said to him,
“Answer now, Ambaṭṭha. Now is not the time for silence.
If someone fails to answer a legitimate question when asked three times by the Buddha, their head explodes into seven pieces there and then.”
Now at that time the spirit Vajirapāṇi, holding a massive iron spear, burning, blazing, and glowing, stood in the sky above Ambaṭṭha, thinking,
“If this Ambaṭṭha doesn’t answer when asked a third time, I’ll blow his head into seven pieces there and then!”
And both the Buddha and Ambaṭṭha could see Vajirapāṇi.
Ambaṭṭha was terrified, shocked, and awestruck. Looking to the Buddha for shelter, protection, and refuge, he sat down close by the Buddha and said,
“What did you say?
Please repeat the question.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
According to what you have heard from elderly and senior brahmins, the teachers of teachers, what is the origin of the Kaṇhāyanas, and who is their founder?”
“I have heard, Master Gotama, that it is just as you say.
That’s the origin of the Kaṇhāyanas,
and that’s who their founder is.”
The Discussion of Ambaṭṭha’s Heritage
When he said this, those students made an uproar,
“It turns out Ambaṭṭha is ill-born, not a gentleman, son of a Sakyan bondservant, and that the Sakyans are sons of his masters!
And it seems that the ascetic Gotama spoke only the truth, though we presumed to rebuke him!”
Then it occurred to the Buddha,
“These students put Ambaṭṭha down too much by calling him the son of a bondservant. Why don’t I get him out of this?”
So the Buddha said to the students,
“Students, please don’t put Ambaṭṭha down too much by calling him the son of a bondservant.
That Black Boy was an eminent sage.
He went to a southern country and memorized the Prime Spell. Then he approached King Okkāka and asked for the hand of his daughter Maddarūpī.
The king said to him,
‘Who the hell is this son of a bondservant to ask for the hand of my daughter!’ Angry and upset he fastened a razor-tipped arrow.
But he wasn’t able to either shoot it or to relax it.
Then the ministers and counselors approached the sage Black Boy and said:
‘Spare the king, sir,
spare him!’
‘The king will be safe. But if he shoots the arrow downwards, there will be an earthquake across the entire realm.’
‘Spare the king, sir, and spare the country!’
‘Both king and country will be safe. But if he shoots the arrow upwards, there will be no rain in the entire realm for seven years.’
‘Spare the king, sir, spare the country, and let there be rain!’
‘Both king and country will be safe, and the rain will fall. And if the king aims the arrow at the crown prince, he will be safe and untouched.’
So the ministers said to Okkāka:
‘Okkāka must aim the arrow at the crown prince.
He will be safe and untouched.’
So King Okkāka aimed the arrow at the crown prince. And he was safe and untouched.
Then the king was terrified, shocked, and awestruck. Scared by the prime punishment, he gave the hand of his daughter Maddarūpī.
Students, please don’t put Ambaṭṭha down too much by calling him the son of a bondservant. That Black Boy was an eminent sage.”
The Supremacy of the Aristocrats
Then the Buddha addressed Ambaṭṭha,
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Suppose an aristocrat boy was to sleep with a brahmin girl, and they had a son.
Would he receive a seat and water from the brahmins?”
“He would, Master Gotama.”
“And would the brahmins feed him at an offering of food for ancestors, an offering of a dish of milk-rice, a sacrifice, or a feast for guests?”
“They would.”
“And would the brahmins teach him the hymns or not?”
“They would.”
“And would he be kept from the women or not?”
“He would not.”
“And would the aristocrats anoint him as king?”
“No, Master Gotama.
Why is that?
Because his maternity is unsuitable.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Suppose a brahmin boy was to sleep with an aristocrat girl, and they had a son.
Would he receive a seat and water from the brahmins?”
“He would, Master Gotama.”
“And would the brahmins feed him at an offering of food for ancestors, an offering of a dish of milk-rice, a sacrifice, or a feast for guests?”
“They would.”
“And would the brahmins teach him the hymns or not?”
“They would.”
“And would he be kept from the women or not?”
“He would not.”
“And would the aristocrats anoint him as king?”
“No, Master Gotama.
Why is that?
Because his paternity is unsuitable.”
“And so, Ambaṭṭha, the aristocrats are superior and the brahmins inferior, whether comparing women with women or men with men.
What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Suppose the brahmins for some reason were to shave a brahmin’s head, inflict him with a sack of ashes, and banish him from the nation or the city.
Would he receive a seat and water from the brahmins?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“And would the brahmins feed him at an offering of food for ancestors, an offering of a dish of milk-rice, a sacrifice, or a feast for guests?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“And would the brahmins teach him the hymns or not?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“And would he be kept from the women or not?”
“He would be.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Suppose the aristocrats for some reason were to shave an aristocrat’s head, inflict him with a sack of ashes, and banish him from the nation or the city.
Would he receive a seat and water from the brahmins?”
“He would, Master Gotama.”
“And would the brahmins feed him at an offering of food for ancestors, an offering of a dish of milk-rice, a sacrifice, or a feast for guests?”
“They would.”
“And would the brahmins teach him the hymns or not?”
“They would.”
“And would he be kept from the women or not?”
“He would not.”
“At this point, Ambaṭṭha, that aristocrat has reached rock bottom, with head shaven, inflicted with a sack of ashes, and banished from city or nation.
Yet still the aristocrats are superior and the brahmins inferior.
Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra also spoke this verse:
‘The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.’
That verse was well sung by Brahmā Sanaṅkumāra, not poorly sung; well spoken, not poorly spoken, beneficial, not harmful, and it was approved by me.
For I also say this:
The aristocrat is first among people
who take clan as the standard.
But one accomplished in knowledge and conduct
is first among gods and humans.”
Knowledge and Conduct
“But what, Master Gotama, is that conduct, and what is that knowledge?”
“Ambaṭṭha, in the supreme knowledge and conduct there is no discussion of ancestry or clan or pride—
‘You deserve me’ or ‘You don’t deserve me.’
Wherever there is giving and taking in marriage there is such discussion.
Whoever is attached to questions of ancestry or clan or pride, or to giving and taking in marriage, is far from the supreme knowledge and conduct.
The realization of supreme knowledge and conduct occurs when you’ve given up such things.”
“But what, Master Gotama, is that conduct, and what is that knowledge?”
“Ambaṭṭha, it’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
A householder hears that teaching, or a householder’s child, or someone reborn in some clan.
They gain faith in the Realized One,
and reflect …
Quite secluded from sensual pleasures, secluded from unskillful qualities, they enter and remain in the first absorption …
This pertains to their conduct.
Furthermore, as the placing of the mind and keeping it connected are stilled, a mendicant enters and remains in the second absorption …
This pertains to their conduct.
Furthermore, with the fading away of rapture, they enter and remain in the third absorption …
This pertains to their conduct.
Furthermore, giving up pleasure and pain, and ending former happiness and sadness, they enter and remain in the fourth absorption …
This pertains to their conduct.
This is that conduct.
When their mind has become immersed in samādhi like this—purified, bright, flawless, rid of corruptions, pliable, workable, steady, and imperturbable—they extend it and project it toward knowledge and vision.
This pertains to their knowledge. …
They understand: ‘There is no return to any state of existence.’
This pertains to their knowledge.
This is that knowledge.
This mendicant is said to be ‘accomplished in knowledge’, and also ‘accomplished in conduct’, and also ‘accomplished in knowledge and conduct’.
And, Ambaṭṭha, there is no accomplishment in knowledge and conduct that is better or finer than this.
Four Drains
There are these four drains that affect this supreme knowledge and conduct.
What four?
Firstly, take some ascetic or brahmin who, not managing to obtain this supreme knowledge and conduct, plunges into a wilderness region carrying their stuff with a shoulder-pole, thinking
they will get by eating fallen fruit.
In fact they succeed only in serving someone accomplished in knowledge and conduct.
This is the first drain that affects this supreme knowledge and conduct.
Furthermore, take some ascetic or brahmin who, not managing to obtain this supreme knowledge and conduct or to get by eating fallen fruit, plunges into a wilderness region carrying a spade and basket, thinking
they will get by eating tubers and fruit.
In fact they succeed only in serving someone accomplished in knowledge and conduct.
This is the second drain that affects this supreme knowledge and conduct.
Furthermore, take some ascetic or brahmin who, not managing to obtain this supreme knowledge and conduct, or to get by eating fallen fruit, or to get by eating tubers and fruit, sets up a fire chamber in the neighborhood of a village or town and dwells there serving the sacred flame.
In fact they succeed only in serving someone accomplished in knowledge and conduct.
This is the third drain that affects this supreme knowledge and conduct.
Furthermore, take some ascetic or brahmin who, not managing to obtain this supreme knowledge and conduct, or to get by eating fallen fruit, or to get by eating tubers and fruit, or to serve the sacred flame, sets up a fire chamber in the central square and dwells there, thinking:
‘When an ascetic or brahmin comes from the four quarters, I will honor them as best I can.’
In fact they succeed only in serving someone accomplished in knowledge and conduct.
This is the fourth drain that affects this supreme knowledge and conduct.
These are the four drains that affect this supreme knowledge and conduct.
What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Is this supreme knowledge and conduct seen in your own tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.
Who am I and my tradition compared with the supreme knowledge and conduct?
We are far from that.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Since you’re not managing to obtain this supreme knowledge and conduct, have you with your tradition plunged into a wilderness region carrying your stuff with a shoulder-pole, thinking
you will get by eating fallen fruit?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Have you with your tradition … plunged into a wilderness region carrying a spade and basket, thinking
you will get by eating tubers and fruit?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Have you with your tradition … set up a fire chamber in the neighborhood of a village or town and dwelt there serving the sacred flame?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Have you with your tradition … set up a fire chamber in the central square and dwelt there, thinking:
‘When an ascetic or brahmin comes from the four quarters, I will honor them as best I can’?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“So you with your tradition are not only inferior to the supreme knowledge and conduct,
you are even inferior to the four drains that affect the supreme knowledge and conduct.
But you have been told this by your teacher, the brahmin Pokkharasāti:
‘Who are these shavelings, fake ascetics, riffraff, black spawn from the feet of our Kinsman compared with conversation with the brahmins of the three knowledges?” Yet he himself has not even fulfilled one of the drains!
See, Ambaṭṭha, how your teacher Pokkharasāti has wronged you.
Being Like the Sages of the Past
But Pokkharasāti lives off an endowment provided by King Pasenadi of Kosala.
But the king won’t even grant him an audience face to face.
When he consults, he does so behind a curtain.
Why wouldn’t the king grant a face to face audience with someone who’d receive his legitimate presentation of food?
See, Ambaṭṭha, how your teacher Pokkharasāti has wronged you.
What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
Suppose King Pasenadi was holding consultations with warrior-chiefs or chieftains while sitting on an elephant’s neck or on horseback, or while standing on the mat in a chariot.
And suppose he’d get down from that place and stand aside.
Then along would come a worker or their bondservant, who’d stand in the same place and continue the consultation:
‘This is what King Pasenadi says, and this too is what the king says.’
Though he spoke the king’s words and gave the king’s advice,
does that qualify him to be the king or the king’s minister?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“In the same way, Ambaṭṭha, the brahmin seers of the past were Aṭṭhaka, Vāmaka, Vāmadeva, Vessāmitta, Yamadaggi, Aṅgīrasa, Bhāradvāja, Vāseṭṭha, Kassapa, and Bhagu. They were the authors and propagators of the hymns. Their hymnal was sung and propagated and compiled in ancient times; and these days, brahmins continue to sing and chant it, chanting what was chanted and teaching what was taught.
You might imagine that, since you’ve learned their hymns by heart in your own tradition, that makes you a hermit or someone on the path to becoming a hermit. But that is not possible.
What do you think, Ambaṭṭha?
According to what you have heard from elderly and senior brahmins, the teachers of teachers,
did those ancient brahmin hermits—
nicely bathed and anointed, with hair and beard dressed, bedecked with jewels, earrings, and bracelets, dressed in white—amuse themselves, supplied and provided with the five kinds of sensual stimulation, like you do today in your tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Did they eat boiled fine rice, garnished with clean meat, with the dark grains picked out, served with many soups and sauces, like you do today in your tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Did they amuse themselves with girls wearing thongs that show off their curves, like you do today in your tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Did they drive about in chariots drawn by mares with plaited manes, whipping and lashing them onward with long goads, like you do today in your tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“Did they get men with long swords to guard them in fortresses with moats dug and barriers in place, like you do today in your tradition?”
“No, Master Gotama.”
“So, Ambaṭṭha, in your own tradition you are neither hermit nor someone on the path to becoming a hermit.
Whoever has any doubt or uncertainty about me, let them ask me and I will clear up their doubts with my answer.”
Seeing the Two Marks
Then the Buddha came out of his dwelling and proceeded to begin walking mindfully,
and Ambaṭṭha did likewise.
Then while walking beside the Buddha, Ambaṭṭha scrutinized his body for the thirty-two marks of a great man.
He saw all of them except for two,
which he had doubts about:
whether the private parts are retracted, and the largeness of the tongue.
Then it occurred to the Buddha,
“This brahmin student Ambaṭṭha sees all the marks except for two,
which he has doubts about:
whether the private parts are retracted, and the largeness of the tongue.”
Then the Buddha used his psychic power to will that Ambaṭṭha would see his retracted private parts.
And he stuck out his tongue and stroked back and forth on his ear holes and nostrils, and covered his entire forehead with his tongue.
Then Ambaṭṭha thought,
“The ascetic Gotama possesses the thirty-two marks completely, lacking none.”
He said to the Buddha,
“Well, now, sir, I must go. I have many duties, and much to do.”
“Please, Ambaṭṭha, go at your convenience.”
Then Ambaṭṭha mounted his mare-drawn chariot and left.
Now at that time the brahmin Pokkharasāti had come out from Ukkaṭṭhā together with a large group of brahmins and was sitting in his own park just waiting for Ambaṭṭha.
Then Ambaṭṭha entered the park.
He went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and approached the brahmin Pokkharasāti on foot.
He bowed and sat down to one side, and Pokkharasāti said to him:
“I hope, dear Ambaṭṭha, you saw the Master Gotama?”
“I saw him, sir.”
“Well, does he live up to his reputation or not?”
“He does, sir.
Master Gotama possesses the thirty-two marks completely, lacking none.”
“And did you have some discussion with him?”
“And what kind of discussion did you have with him?”
Then Ambaṭṭha informed Pokkharasāti of all they had discussed.
Then Pokkharasāti said to Ambaṭṭha,
“Oh, our bloody fake scholar, our fake learned man, who pretends to be proficient in the three Vedas! A man who behaves like this ought, when their body breaks up, after death, to be reborn in a place of loss, a bad place, the underworld, hell.
It’s only because you repeatedly attacked Master Gotama like that that he kept bringing up charges against us!”
Angry and upset, he kicked Ambaṭṭha over,
and wanted to go and see the Buddha right away.
Pokkharasāti Visits the Buddha
Then those brahmins said to Pokkharasāti,
“It’s much too late to visit the ascetic Gotama today.
You can visit him tomorrow.”
So Pokkharasāti had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home. Then he mounted a carriage and, with attendants carrying torches, set out from Ukkaṭṭhā for the forest near Icchānaṅgala.
He went by carriage as far as the terrain allowed, then descended and entered the monastery on foot.
He went up to the Buddha and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, he sat down to one side and said to the Buddha,
“Master Gotama, has my pupil, the student Ambaṭṭha, come here?”
“Yes he has, brahmin.”
“And did you have some discussion with him?”
“And what kind of discussion did you have with him?”
Then the Buddha informed Pokkharasāti of all they had discussed.
Then Pokkharasāti said to the Buddha,
“Ambaṭṭha is a fool, Master Gotama. Please forgive him.”
“May the student Ambaṭṭha be happy, brahmin.”
Then Pokkharasāti scrutinized the Buddha’s body for the thirty-two marks of a great man.
He saw all of them except for two,
which he had doubts about:
whether the private parts are retracted, and the largeness of the tongue.
Then it occurred to the Buddha,
“Pokkharasāti sees all the marks except for two,
which he has doubts about:
whether the private parts are retracted, and the largeness of the tongue.”
Then the Buddha used his psychic power to will that Pokkharasāti would see his retracted private parts.
And he stuck out his tongue and stroked back and forth on his ear holes and nostrils, and covered his entire forehead with his tongue.
Pokkharasāti thought,
“The ascetic Gotama possesses the thirty-two marks completely, lacking none.”
He said to the Buddha,
“Would Master Gotama together with the mendicant Saṅgha please accept today’s meal from me?”
The Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Pokkharasāti announced the time to him,
“Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.”
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to the home of Pokkharasāti together with the mendicant Saṅgha, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Pokkharasāti served and satisfied the Buddha with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods, while his students served the Saṅgha.
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Pokkharasāti took a low seat and sat to one side.
Then the Buddha taught him step by step, with
a talk on giving, ethical conduct, and heaven.
He explained the drawbacks of sensual pleasures, so sordid and corrupt, and the benefit of renunciation.
And when the Buddha knew that Pokkharasāti’s mind was ready, pliable, rid of hindrances, joyful, and confident he explained the special teaching of the Buddhas:
suffering, its origin, its cessation, and the path.
Just as a clean cloth rid of stains would properly absorb dye,
in that very seat the stainless, immaculate vision of the Dhamma arose in the brahmin Pokkharasāti:
“Everything that has a beginning has an end.”
Pokkharasāti Declares Himself a Lay Follower
Then Pokkharasāti saw, attained, understood, and fathomed the Dhamma. He went beyond doubt, got rid of indecision, and became self-assured and independent of others regarding the Teacher’s instructions. He said to the Buddha,
“Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, just so has Master Gotama made the Teaching clear in many ways.
Together with my children, wives, retinue, and ministers, I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.
Just as Master Gotama visits other devoted families in Ukkaṭṭhā, may he visit mine.
The brahmin boys and girls there will bow to you, rise in your presence, give you a seat and water, and gain confidence in their hearts. That will be for their lasting welfare and happiness.”
“That’s good of you to say, householder.”
Long Discourses
With Mahāli
On the Brahmin Emissaries
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
Now at that time several brahmin emissaries from Kosala and Magadha were residing in Vesālī on some business.
They heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—is staying near Vesālī, at the Great Wood, in the hall with the peaked roof.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then they went to the hall with the peaked roof in the Great Wood to see the Buddha.
Now, at that time Venerable Nāgita was the Buddha’s attendant.
The brahmin emissaries went up to him and said,
“Master Nāgita, where is Master Gotama at present?
For we want to see him.”
“It’s the wrong time to see the Buddha; he is on retreat.”
So right there the brahmin emissaries sat down to one side, thinking,
“We’ll go only after we’ve seen Master Gotama.”
On Oṭṭhaddha the Licchavi
Oṭṭhaddha the Licchavi together with a large assembly of Licchavis also approached Nāgita at the hall with the peaked roof.
He bowed, stood to one side, and said to Nāgita,
“Master Nāgita, where is the Blessed One at present, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha?
For we want to see him.”
“It’s the wrong time to see the Buddha; he is on retreat.”
So right there Oṭṭhaddha also sat down to one side, thinking,
“I’ll go only after I’ve seen the Blessed One, the perfected one, the fully awakened Buddha.”
Then the novice Sīha approached Nāgita.
He bowed, stood to one side, and said to Nāgita,
“Sir, Kassapa, these several brahmin emissaries from Kosala and Magadha, and also Oṭṭhaddha the Licchavi together with a large assembly of Licchavis, have come here to see the Buddha. It’d be good if these people got to see the Buddha.”
“Well then, Sīha, tell the Buddha yourself.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Sīha.
He went to the Buddha, bowed, stood to one side, and told him of the people waiting to see him, adding:
“Sir, it’d be good if these people got to see the Buddha.”
“Well then, Sīha, spread out a seat in the shade of the dwelling.”
“Yes, sir,” replied Sīha, and he did so.
Then the Buddha came out of his dwelling and sat in the shade of the dwelling on the seat spread out.
Then the brahmin emissaries went up to the Buddha, and exchanged greetings with him.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they sat down to one side.
Oṭṭhaddha the Licchavi together with a large assembly of Licchavis also went up to the Buddha, bowed, and sat down to one side.
Oṭṭhaddha said to the Buddha, “Sir, a few days ago Sunakkhatta the Licchavi came to me and said:
‘Mahāli, soon I will have been living in dependence on the Buddha for three years. I see heavenly sights that are pleasant, sensual, and arousing, but I don’t hear heavenly sounds that are pleasant, sensual, and arousing.’
The heavenly sounds that Sunakkhatta cannot hear: do such sounds really exist or not?”
One-Sided Immersion
“Such sounds really do exist, but Sunakkhatta cannot hear them.”
“What is the cause, sir, what is the reason why Sunakkhatta cannot hear them, even though they really do exist?”
“Mahāli, take a mendicant who has developed one-sided immersion to the eastern quarter so as to see heavenly sights but not to hear heavenly sounds.
When they have developed immersion for that purpose,
they see heavenly sights but don’t hear heavenly sounds.
Why is that?
Because that is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who has developed one-sided immersion to the southern quarter …
western quarter …
northern quarter …
above, below, across …
That is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
Take a mendicant who has developed one-sided immersion to the eastern quarter so as to hear heavenly sounds but not to see heavenly sights.
When they have developed immersion for that purpose,
they hear heavenly sounds but don’t see heavenly sights.
Why is that?
Because that is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who has developed one-sided immersion to the southern quarter …
western quarter …
northern quarter …
above, below, across …
That is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
Take a mendicant who has developed two-sided immersion to the eastern quarter so as to both hear heavenly sounds and see heavenly sights.
When they have developed immersion for that purpose,
they both see heavenly sights and hear heavenly sounds.
Why is that?
Because that is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
Furthermore, take a mendicant who has developed two-sided immersion to the southern quarter …
western quarter …
northern quarter …
above, below, across …
That is how it is for a mendicant who develops immersion in that way.
This is the cause, Mahāli, this is the reason why Sunakkhatta cannot hear heavenly sounds that are pleasant, sensual, and arousing, even though they really do exist.”
“Surely the mendicants must lead the spiritual life under the Buddha for the sake of realizing such a development of immersion?”
“No, Mahāli, the mendicants don’t lead the spiritual life under me for the sake of realizing such a development of immersion.
There are other things that are finer, for the sake of which the mendicants lead the spiritual life under me.”
The Four Noble Fruits
“But sir, what are those finer things?”
“Firstly, Mahāli, with the ending of three fetters a mendicant is a stream-enterer, not liable to be reborn in the underworld, bound for awakening.
This is one of the finer things for the sake of which the mendicants lead the spiritual life under me.
Furthermore, a mendicant—with the ending of three fetters, and the weakening of greed, hate, and delusion—is a once-returner. They come back to this world once only, then make an end of suffering.
This too is one of the finer things.
Furthermore, with the ending of the five lower fetters, a mendicant is reborn spontaneously and will become extinguished there, not liable to return from that world.
This too is one of the finer things.
Furthermore, a mendicant has realized the undefiled freedom of heart and freedom by wisdom in this very life, and lives having realized it with their own insight due to the ending of defilements.
This too is one of the finer things.
These are the finer things, for the sake of which the mendicants lead the spiritual life under me.”
The Noble Eightfold Path
“But, sir, is there a path and a practice for realizing these things?”
“There is, Mahāli.”
“Well, what is it?”
“It is simply this noble eightfold path, that is:
right view, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, and right immersion.
This is the path and the practice for realizing these things.
On the Two Renunciates
This one time, Mahāli, I was staying near Kosambi, in Ghosita’s Monastery.
Then two renunciates—
the wanderer Muṇḍiya and Jāliya the pupil of Dārupattika—came and exchanged greetings with me.
When the greetings and polite conversation were over, they stood to one side and said to me:
‘Reverend Gotama, are the soul and the body the same thing, or they are different things?’
‘Well then, reverends, listen and pay close attention, I will speak.’
‘Yes, reverend,’ they replied.
I said this:
‘Take the case when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption.
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”?’
‘It would, reverend.’
‘But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”. …
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”?’
‘It would, reverend.’
‘But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”. …
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”?’
‘It would, reverend.’
‘But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”.
…
They understand: “… there is no return to any state of existence.”
When a mendicant knows and sees like this, would it be appropriate to say of them:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”?’
‘It would not, reverend.’
‘But reverends, I know and see like this.
Nevertheless, I do not say:
“The soul and the body are the same thing” or “The soul and the body are different things”.’”
That is what the Buddha said.
Satisfied, Oṭṭhaddha the Licchavi was happy with what the Buddha said.
Long Discourses
With Lohicca
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was wandering in the land of the Kosalans together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants when he arrived at Sālavatikā.
Now at that time the brahmin Lohicca was living in Sālavatikā. It was a crown property given by King Pasenadi of Kosala, teeming with living creatures, full of hay, wood, water, and grain, a royal endowment of the highest quality.
Now at that time Lohicca had the following harmful misconception:
“Should an ascetic or brahmin achieve some skillful quality, they ought not inform anyone else. For what can one person do for another?
Suppose someone cut off an old bond, only to create another new bond.
That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one person do for another?”
Lohicca heard:
“It seems the ascetic Gotama—a Sakyan, gone forth from a Sakyan family—has arrived at Sālavatikā, together with a large Saṅgha of five hundred mendicants.
He has this good reputation:
‘That Blessed One is perfected, a fully awakened Buddha, accomplished in knowledge and conduct, holy, knower of the world, supreme guide for those who wish to train, teacher of gods and humans, awakened, blessed.’
He has realized with his own insight this world—with its gods, Māras and Brahmās, this population with its ascetics and brahmins, gods and humans—and he makes it known to others.
He teaches Dhamma that’s good in the beginning, good in the middle, and good in the end, meaningful and well-phrased. And he reveals a spiritual practice that’s entirely full and pure.
It’s good to see such perfected ones.”
Then Lohicca addressed his barber Rosika,
“Here, dear Rosika, go to the ascetic Gotama and in my name bow with your head to his feet. Ask him if he is healthy and well, nimble, strong, and living comfortably.
And then ask him whether he,
together with the mendicant Saṅgha, might please accept tomorrow’s meal from the brahmin Lohicca.”
“Yes, sir,” Rosika replied.
He did as he was asked, and
the Buddha consented in silence.
Then, knowing that the Buddha had consented, Rosika got up from his seat, went to Lohicca, and said to him,
“I gave the Buddha your message,
and he accepted.”
And when the night had passed Lohicca had a variety of delicious foods prepared in his own home. Then he had the Buddha informed of the time, saying,
“Here, dear Rosika, go to the ascetic Gotama and announce the time, saying:
‘Itʼs time, Master Gotama, the meal is ready.’”
“Yes, sir,” Rosika replied. He did as he was asked.
Then the Buddha robed up in the morning and, taking his bowl and robe, went to Sālavatikā together with the Saṅgha of mendicants.
Now, Rosika was following behind the Buddha,
and told him of Lohicca’s views, adding,
“Sir, please dissuade him from that harmful misconception.”
“Hopefully that’ll happen, Rosika, hopefully that’ll happen.”
Then the Buddha approached Lohicca’s home, where he sat on the seat spread out.
Then Lohicca served and satisfied the mendicant Saṅgha headed by the Buddha with his own hands with a variety of delicious foods.
Questioning Lohicca
When the Buddha had eaten and washed his hand and bowl, Lohicca took a low seat and sat to one side.
The Buddha said to him,
“Is it really true, Lohicca, that you have such a harmful misconception:
‘Should an ascetic or brahmin achieve some skillful quality, they ought not inform anyone else. For what can one person do for another?
Suppose someone cut off an old bond, only to create another new bond.
That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one person do for another?’”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“What do you think, Lohicca?
Do you reside in Sālavatikā?”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“Lohicca, suppose someone were to say:
‘The brahmin Lohicca reigns over Sālavatikā.
He alone should enjoy the revenues produced in Sālavatikā and not share them with anyone else.’
Would the person who spoke like that make it difficult for those whose living depends on you or not?”
“They would, Master Gotama.”
“But is someone who creates difficulties for others acting kindly or unkindly?”
“Unkindly, sir.”
“But does an unkind person have love in their heart or hostility?”
“Hostility, sir.”
“And when the heart is full of hostility, is there right view or wrong view?”
“Wrong view, Master Gotama.”
“An individual with wrong view is reborn in one of two places, I say:
hell or the animal realm.
What do you think, Lohicca?
Does King Pasenadi reign over Kāsī and Kosala?”
“Yes, Master Gotama.”
“Lohicca, suppose someone were to say:
‘King Pasenadi reigns over Kāsī and Kosala.
He alone should enjoy the revenues produced in Kāsī and Kosala and not share them with anyone else.’
Would the person who spoke like that make it difficult for yourself and others whose living depends on King Pasenadi or not?”
“They would, Master Gotama.”
“But is someone who creates difficulties for others acting kindly or unkindly?”
“Unkindly, sir.”
“But does an unkind person have love in their heart or hostility?”
“Hostility, sir.”
“And when the heart is full of hostility, is there right view or wrong view?”
“Wrong view, Master Gotama.”
“An individual with wrong view is reborn in one of two places, I say:
hell or the animal realm.
So it seems, Lohicca, that should someone say such a thing either of Lohicca or of King Pasenadi,
that is wrong view.
In the same way, suppose someone were to say:
‘Should an ascetic or brahmin achieve some skillful quality, they ought not inform anyone else. For what can one person do for another?
Suppose someone cut off an old bond, only to create another new bond.
That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one person do for another?’
Now, there are gentlemen who, relying on the teaching and training proclaimed by the Realized One, achieve a high distinction such as the following: they realize the fruit of stream-entry, the fruit of once-return, the fruit of non-return, or the fruit of perfection. And in addition, there are those who ripen the seeds for rebirth in a heavenly state. The person who spoke like that makes it difficult for them. They’re acting unkindly, their heart is full of hostility, and they have wrong view.
An individual with wrong view is reborn in one of two places, I say:
hell or the animal realm.
Three Teachers Who Deserve to Be Reprimanded
Lohicca, there are three kinds of teachers in the world who deserve to be reprimanded.
When someone reprimands such teachers, the reprimand is true, substantive, legitimate, and blameless.
What three?
Firstly, take a teacher who has not reached the goal of the ascetic life for which they went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
They teach their disciples:
‘This is for your welfare. This is for your happiness.’
But their disciples don’t want to listen. They don’t pay attention or apply their minds to understand. They proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
That teacher deserves to be reprimanded:
‘Venerable, you haven’t reached the goal of the ascetic life; and when you teach disciples
they proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
It’s like a man who makes advances on a woman though she pulls away, or embraces her though she turns her back.
That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one do for another?’
This is the first kind of teacher who deserves to be reprimanded.
Furthermore, take a teacher who has not reached the goal of the ascetic life for which they went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
They teach their disciples:
‘This is for your welfare. This is for your happiness.’
Their disciples do want to listen. They pay attention and apply their minds to understand. They don’t proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
That teacher deserves to be reprimanded:
‘Venerable, you haven’t reached the goal of the ascetic life; and when you teach disciples
they don’t proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
It’s like someone who abandons their own field and presumes to weed someone else’s field. That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one do for another?’
This is the second kind of teacher who deserves to be reprimanded.
Furthermore, take a teacher who has reached the goal of the ascetic life for which they went forth from the lay life to homelessness.
They teach their disciples:
‘This is for your welfare. This is for your happiness.’
But their disciples don’t want to listen. They don’t pay attention or apply their minds to understand. They proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
That teacher deserves to be reprimanded:
‘Venerable, you have reached the goal of the ascetic life; yet when you teach disciples
they proceed having turned away from the teacher’s instruction.
Suppose someone cut off an old bond, only to create another new bond.
That’s the consequence of such a wicked, greedy deed, I say. For what can one person do for another?’
This is the third kind of teacher who deserves to be reprimanded.
These are the three kinds of teachers in the world who deserve to be reprimanded.
When someone reprimands such teachers, the reprimand is true, substantive, legitimate, and blameless.”
A Teacher Who Does Not Deserve to Be Reprimanded
When he had spoken, Lohicca said to the Buddha,
“But Master Gotama, is there a teacher in the world who does not deserve to be reprimanded?”
“There is, Lohicca.”
“But who is that teacher?”
“It’s when a Realized One arises in the world, perfected, a fully awakened Buddha …
That’s how a mendicant is accomplished in ethics. …
They enter and remain in the first absorption …
A teacher under whom a disciple achieves such a high distinction is one who does not deserve to be reprimanded.
When someone reprimands such a teacher, the reprimand is false, baseless, illegitimate, and blameworthy.
They enter and remain in the second absorption …
third absorption …
fourth absorption.
A teacher under whom a disciple achieves such a high distinction is one who does not deserve to be reprimanded. …
They extend and project the mind toward knowledge and vision …
A teacher under whom a disciple achieves such a high distinction is one who does not deserve to be reprimanded. …
They understand: ‘… there is no return to any state of existence.’
A teacher under whom a disciple achieves such a high distinction is one who does not deserve to be reprimanded. When someone reprimands such a teacher, the reprimand is false, baseless, illegitimate, and blameworthy.”
When he had spoken, Lohicca said to the Buddha:
“Suppose, Master Gotama, a person was on the verge of falling off a cliff, and another person were to grab them by the hair, pull them up, and place them on firm ground.
In the same way, when I was falling off a cliff Master Gotama pulled me up and placed me on safe ground.
Excellent, Master Gotama! Excellent!
As if he were righting the overturned, or revealing the hidden, or pointing out the path to the lost, or lighting a lamp in the dark so people with good eyes can see what’s there, Master Gotama has made the Teaching clear in many ways.
I go for refuge to Master Gotama, to the teaching, and to the mendicant Saṅgha.
From this day forth, may Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge for life.”
Long Discourses
What Came First
So I have heard.
At one time the Buddha was staying near Sāvatthī in the Eastern Monastery, in the stilt longhouse of Migāra’s mother.
Now at that time Vāseṭṭha and Bhāradvāja were living on probation among the mendicants in hopes of being ordained.
Then in the late afternoon, the Buddha came downstairs from the longhouse and was walking mindfully in the open air, beneath the shade of the longhouse.
Vāseṭṭha saw him
and said to Bhāradvāja,
“Reverend Bhāradvāja, the Buddha is walking mindfully in the open air, beneath the shade of the longhouse.
Come, reverend, let’s go to the Buddha.
Hopefully we’ll get to hear a Dhamma talk from him.”
“Yes, reverend,” replied Bhāradvāja.
So they went to the Buddha, bowed, and walked beside him.
Then the Buddha said to Vāseṭṭha,
“Vāseṭṭha, you are both brahmins by birth and clan, and have gone forth from the lay life to homelessness from a brahmin family. I hope you don’t have to suffer abuse and insults from the brahmins.”
“Actually, sir, the brahmins do insult and abuse us with their typical insults to the fullest extent.”
“But how do the brahmins insult you?”
“Sir, the brahmins say:
‘Only brahmins are the first caste; other castes are inferior.
